--
-- File generated with SQLiteStudio v3.4.17 on Thu Nov 20 10:58:02 2025
--
-- Text encoding used: System
--
PRAGMA foreign_keys = off;
BEGIN TRANSACTION;

-- Table: book
CREATE TABLE book (
    id          INTEGER       NOT NULL,
    title       VARCHAR (150) NOT NULL,
    synopsis    TEXT          NOT NULL,
    cover_image VARCHAR (200),
    author_id   INTEGER,
    PRIMARY KEY (
        id
    ),
    FOREIGN KEY (
        author_id
    )
    REFERENCES user (id) 
);

INSERT INTO book (
                     id,
                     title,
                     synopsis,
                     cover_image,
                     author_id
                 )
                 VALUES (
                     1,
                     'Spectator',
                     'In a world overflowing with secrets and being shrouded in mysteries, the unknown eclipses everything we think we understand. Here, only the truly knowledgeable rise above the rest. This is the myth of the lone audience-an eternal witness to countless performers. But a question lingers in the silence:

Will he remain a mere observer?
Or will he rise and outshine every performer on the stage?',
                     'C:\Users\PC1\Downloads\drive-download-20251118T063918Z-1-001\instance\bookworm\static\uploads\Beige and Red Minimalist Eye Illustration Book Cover.png',
                     1
                 );

INSERT INTO book (
                     id,
                     title,
                     synopsis,
                     cover_image,
                     author_id
                 )
                 VALUES (
                     2,
                     'Animal Apocalypse',
                     'World where branch surrounds, mythical creature remains the tyrant. Humans fight for survival',
                     'ANIMAL_APOCALYPSE.png',
                     1
                 );

INSERT INTO book (
                     id,
                     title,
                     synopsis,
                     cover_image,
                     author_id
                 )
                 VALUES (
                     3,
                     'Lord of the Mysteries',
                     'In the waves of steam and machinery, who could achieve extraordinary? In the fogs of history and darkness, who was whispering? I woke up from the realm of mysteries and opened my eyes to the world.

Firearms, cannons, battleships, airships, and difference machines. Potions, divination, curses, hanged-man, and sealed artifacts… The lights shone brightly, yet the secrets of the world were never far away. This was a legend of the “fool”.',
                     'lotm-vol-4-i-just-finished-the-fourth-volume-and-i-am-in-v0-hj6884nujxoe1.webp',
                     8
                 );

INSERT INTO book (
                     id,
                     title,
                     synopsis,
                     cover_image,
                     author_id
                 )
                 VALUES (
                     4,
                     'Lord of the Mysteries 2: Circle of Inevitability',
                     'Sequel to Lord of the mysteries',
                     'li9r59b4fdrd1.jpeg',
                     8
                 );

INSERT INTO book (
                     id,
                     title,
                     synopsis,
                     cover_image,
                     author_id
                 )
                 VALUES (
                     5,
                     'Reverend Insanity',
                     'Humans are clever in tens of thousands of ways, Gu is the truly refined essences of Heaven and Earth. The Three Temples are unrighteous, the demon is reborn. Former days are but an old dream, an identical name is made anew. A story of a time traveler who keeps on being reborn. A unique world that grows, cultivates and uses Gu. The Spring and Autumn Cicada, the Venomous Moonlight Gu, the Wine Insect, All-Encompassing Golden Light Insect, Slender Black Hair Gu, Gu of Hope… And a great demon of the world that does exactly as his heart pleases!',
                     '300.webp',
                     9
                 );


-- Table: book_like
CREATE TABLE book_like (
    id        INTEGER      NOT NULL,
    user_id   INTEGER,
    book_id   INTEGER,
    like_type VARCHAR (10),
    PRIMARY KEY (
        id
    ),
    FOREIGN KEY (
        user_id
    )
    REFERENCES user (id),
    FOREIGN KEY (
        book_id
    )
    REFERENCES book (id) 
);


-- Table: chapter
CREATE TABLE chapter (
    id      INTEGER       NOT NULL,
    title   VARCHAR (150) NOT NULL,
    content TEXT          NOT NULL,
    book_id INTEGER,
    PRIMARY KEY (
        id
    ),
    FOREIGN KEY (
        book_id
    )
    REFERENCES book (id) 
);

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        1,
                        'Chapter 1',
                        'Chapter 1: The Return

?Surface engulfed with purple flames embracing the spark to meet its end, burning scent suffocates the throat that you can barely breathe alongside a couple of corpses wearing silver armor with their swords held in their grip lying down in the flames surrounding them. The triangular flag in a pole was burned, the walls of the castle was destroyed like it was merely a scatter of big rocks. ?

 He alone bore witness to this as he''s on his knees as he breathes to properly process the horrifying scene he''s seeing right now.

?Despair filled his emotion right now as he stays kneeling not moving a muscle not even his pupils are moving, only him barely breathing the burning scent in his surroundings. 

?He delusion himself that this is merely a bad nightmare clinging to hope that he''d open his eyes seeing the same old ceiling he used to sleep under and a bed he''s comfortable sleeping on since years. ?

Devastatingly speaking, the nightmare remained to be the reality itself. ?

A man floating above cloaked with dark violet robe with tattered ripped on the below part almost covering all his body hiding his face from the shadow of the hood of the robe he wore along with a mask concealing his chin, mouth, and nose. The mask was black designed with a silver wide smiling mouth. His skin is so pale white it''s almost decayed to rust. ?

He stood above the sky as if he''s a divine deity bringing judgment of humanity. He gazed upon the man on his knees, on a few seconds,  he slowly descends to the surface and stood in front of the man in despaired state..? 

"Wonderful sight to see, isn''t it?"

?The man in robe stated with ludicrous tone while extending his pale right hand to the side like he''s showing off his work. ?The man didn''t respond in return but stared blankly in the man like he''s not even in front of him.

? "abomination of an existence vanished to rust, eradicating the stupid invention of these lowly intelligent filth, you do know that someone will eventually put an end to all of this foolish chaos. And that the only way to end it is to end it"

?The man kept babbling on his words despite knowing that the man he''s talking didn''t listen a word. ?

"...."

?The man removed his hood and shows dark blue hair long enough to reach his neck and red pupil on the eyes, his face still hidden with a mask. ?

"You may call me a madman, Cyrus. But know that I''m never wrong"

 "...."?

Silence befall between the two men. ?The man so called Cyrus manages to slowly lift his head and face the man in robe eye to eye. ?A faint of determination and rage are seen through his eyes as tears are about to fall. ? 

"I will never call you a madman, you''re the most fucked up psychopathic irredeemable motherfucker in the cosmic universe. Your end shall be mine to deliver you delusional wannabe god crap"

?The man in robe remained silent as he hears these insulting words coming from his mouth. ?

"You''re the one that''s delusional right now if you think you can kill me, not even the whole entire world can put a bruise to me"

?He said seriously and the situation right now is literal proof of his statement. ?" 
I will be the one to do what the world couldn''t 
"?Driven by rage he grabbed his sword instinctively and dashed at him. ? The man in robe exhaled his breath and it made Cyrus being thrown to air, He stretched his right arm aiming at Cyrus and it made him stop midair. He gazed at Cyrus a few seconds as Cyrus looked at him with anger, the man in robe snapped his finger on his right arm and burned Cyrus to blue flames ?

"Aaaaaaaaaaaaaggghhhh!!!!"

? The scream of pain echoed across the surrounding. The man in robe lets the flame extinguished a few seconds later. Cyrus fell on the floor, he immediately attempts to heal himself from the burning scars and dashed yet again. The man in robe points his index finger at Cyrus and then points it downward, blue lightning stroke Cyrus down electrocuting him the most excruciating pain. Cyrus couldn''t instantly heal this time because of mental fatigue and physical exhaustion. But he still dashed at the man.

?Cyrus throws a diagonal wind slash using his sword towards the man but he simply extended his left arm to create a barrier to stop it. Cyrus took the little time stalling to slowly heal himself. 
?"Persistent, aren''t you?"?

The man used his index finger to payback a wind slash at Cyrus. He built a steel wall from the surface to block it and used the time to engulf his sword with bright yellow flames and jumped over at the wall he created. ? 

Cyrus saw the world froze in time as he''s about to deliver a slash, he saw hundreds of black crystallized spikes approach at him. In an instant he thought, ? 

no way I can take all that

The hundreds of spikes then pierce towards Cyrus flesh, blinding his eyes, he fell back and the spikes are pinning his body to the steel while some missed to penetrate him. As he is now a man without a sight, he felt the blood gushing out from his skin and the throbbing pain from being pierced from all of his body. The pain so excruciating he no longer screamed to it.

 ?He hears footstep slowly coming closer to him and then it stops. ? 

"I told you, you can''t beat me"?
"..."
?The man sighed at Cyrus and puts his palm on his forehead.

?"Just kill me right now, will you?"

?Cyrus slowly said it''s almost a whisper. Desperate to meet his end as he''s suffering through this. ?

"Hmmm"

?The man holds his chin pretending to think.

?"Cyrus"?

The man called out to Cyrus.

?"I''ll give you a chance to change all of this"

?Cyrus was a bit shock that he can still babble such lies.

 ?After he have done doing all of this crap, he thinks I have the chance to change all this???


Nonsensical statement remains nonsense 

?"Prove me wrong by changing the inevitable Cyrus"?

What''s this guy babbling about? just kill me already. ?

In a second, Cyrus hears a snap and everything became white and he felt that he''s being pulled back by great force. ?

"Will you get to see the world''s demise again? O spectator"

?In an instant, he woke his eyes open and gasped a breath. He saw a ceiling he''s accustomed to see every morning. he looks down and sees that he''s covering his body with a blue blanket he has been using and a comfortable feeling in his back as he''s lying down on a bed. He looked around and saw the room he''s been living in. 

?What happened? What''s going on? Wait, I can see????

He sat down on his bed and looked at his palm, arm, and even underneath his shirt. There was no wound or scars to be seen. ? 
Just what on earth is going on? 

?''Knock knock''?

"Cyruuuss!!"

?He pondered his thoughts and then someone called out to him outside his room.?

That voice??

It was a feminine and serene voice, and one he''s very familiar with, one he hasn''t heard for a long time. ?He couldn''t believe himself to be able to hear that person''s voice once more. ?

His lips curved as its quivering and immediately got off the bed to rush to open the door. ?He didn''t care if this turned out to be a dream or didn''t doubt about that it might be a trap or anything.

?He just wants to see the person behind that door. He then opened the wooden door and couldn''t still believe it.? The liquid in his eyes are about to flow and blur his sight. ?He couldn''t resist himself from curving his lips while biting it to stop himself from crying fully. 

?"What? Got a bad dream???"

?The woman looks in confuse at Cyrus of being about to burst to tears.

?The woman wears a brown plain shirt alongside a yellow and white stripe apron and a blue pajama with little cute design to it. She has a small waist, and black hair that reaches just below her wings, fair white skin and greenish eyes. Her height about 150cm. a bit shorter than Cyrus. 

?Its you. Its really you, I missed you so much. I can''t believe that I can see you again after such long time. I thought I lost you.?

She''s just a meter away and Cyrus immediately approach her opening his arm to embrace her.? The woman was confused a bit but didn''t mind it and returns the hug

?"A very very very bad dream"?
Cyrus gave up and cried himself out to the woman she''s embracing.? The woman tightened the hug a bit and closed her eyes.?

"Well, you''re awake now and see your pretty wife with you"

 ?The woman said to Cyrus as she smug.?

”I miss you Cass"

?Cassandra Morte, the wife of Cyrus Morte is now embracing him.

?"We were literally sleeping together just yesterday"?

That might be the case for you but not for me. ?Cyrus thought to himself as he continued to hug his own wife.?

"Well, I miss you. You weren''t there with me when I woke up"?

He pretends to be upset while he''s actually not.?

"I was cooking meal for both of us"?

Cassandra giggled and patted the back of the head of her husband.?

"What''s the food?"?

Cyrus now lets go of the hug asked to Cassandra ?

"Don''t worry, it''s your favorite one. Come on let''s eat now before it gets cold"?

They''re both holding hands as they went to the living room, Cyrus took a peek to the calendar and it shows that it''s March 1723.?

This was exactly three years ago.? I got diverted back in time of three years. ?And if I remember correctly, on exactly this day..........

 ?Cyrus embarrassingly thought about it

?Cassandra will reveal to me that she''s Pregnant?
',
                        1
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        2,
                        'Chapter 2',
                        'Chapter 2: The Forgotten 

Cassandra will reveal to me that she''s pregnant.

The embarassing thought from Cyrus continuously echoed throughout his mind as he walks towards the living room alongside his wife.

He vividly remembers the moment three years ago getting to know about his wife pregnancy.

Should I pretend to not know it? Should I open to it? Wait, is it even this day???

His thoughts are starting to overwhelm his mind. 

They arrived at the living room, it isn''t a luxurious living room but merely has a cushion with its fabric a bit rip alongside a wooden small table about the height of a year old baby. In the back is the kitchen not quite fancy design, only a few plates piled up and a spoon and fork grouped together in a cup. There''s a firestove at the right side kitchen and a pan above it. 

The table already served two plates facing each other and a fork and spoon besides it. The plates only has a meat and rice poured with soup to it.

The faint fragrance of the meal pass through his nostrils, his lips curved up and swallowed his saliva.

Been quite a while I last smelled this nice scent.

"Let''s sit down now shall we? Any longer will make our food cold"

Cassandra declared. Cyrus obliged to his wife.

They both sat to the floor on the opposite side of the table facing each other and dig the delicious meal.

Cyrus knew himself that they''re both not living in a dream house but living in a dream home.

Both of them are finally done eating their food.

"Do you have work today dear?"

Cassandra asked as she wiped her mouth with a white small towel.

Work? What was my job again??

Cyrus was confused for a moment as he ponder such questions on his mind.

He thought long hard a few seconds to remember 

Oh!

"Right, I do"

I was too immersed of the sight I''ve long missed that I forgot.

Cyrus got up from the floor and went to the hanging clothes close to the window''s sunlight and takes out white polo shirt and black long pants. 

While changing clothes he thought 

Is this a dream? Perhaps not, or I want to believe it''s not. Even if it is, I want to stay asleep.

As Cyrus ponders these thoughts in his mind, he felt a warmth figure attached to his back with arms that wraps his body on his stomach. He rotates his head to the side and gaze upon to discover it''s his wife embracing him and her head glued to his back from behind. 

His lips curved upwards slightly witnessing it. Cassandra''s head lift to see her husband''s face that''s looking at her in sideward. She responds with a smile in return and said in a lovely flirtatious tone.

"Better do good work in your profession, my dear"

Cyrus responded with a smile still visible to the eye 

"I shall"

Suddenly, he felt her wife''s embrace tightens with no signs of letting go. He felt his stomach in utter pain as if it''s a knot tightened and breathing becomes a struggle. 

He heard a voice of a stern demoness whisper slowly in his ears that says 

"DON''T OGLE AT OTHER WOMEN"

Cyrus at that moment despite struggling to breath thought

Yep. I''m definitely not dreaming. I feel physical pain. Which is I''m relief about. 

Most dreams are oblivious and often confusing to the core and is different setting from physical world. So no things that are tangible in a dream can be felt. It is only a trick to the consciousness that the dream felt like a reality despite it being too ideal or nightmarish but remains oblivious that we feel nothing that surrounds us in a dream. 

Having convince that Cyrus can feel physical pain acknowledges that he''s indeed not in a wonderland but in reality.

But another problem arises from this. Despite my wife being this beautiful, her jealousy is an ailment that no medicine could ever cure.

Like, you are carrying my kid Cass! I''d be more than a lecherous and scumbag of a man if I were to look at other women.

Thinking of a solution way out for the sake to not depart from the living. He immediately thought of an idea.

If I remember correctly, at this time of day aside from her revealing to me that she have conceived my child. It should be also.

Cyrus turned his body to properly look at his wife''s elegant figure and said calmly

"Cass. Our eleventh monthsary is next week. I wouldn''t dare ruin a future that we plan for life for a woman that can be found everywhere."

Upon hearing this, Cassandra''s stern face turns solemnly calm and heaved a sigh of relief and thought in joy to her mind

So he does remember when.

While in these thoughts, Cassandra subconsciously caress her womb and smiled

Well, that''s not the only thing you should know you know?

Witnessing his wife touching her own stomach, he concluded that it''s the signal he''s seeking now and smirked.

He leans his face close to his wife''s ear and whispered while slightly grinning.

"Besides, we gotta take care of what you''re carrying soon"

After this was said, he immediately puts a kiss to his wife''s cheek and immediately run towards the door.

He looks back and waves a goodbye with a wide smile and opens the door and went out and close it.

...

A second of total silence pass in the house that Cassandra was utterly speechless of what her husband recently stated in her ears.

Instantly, her face flushed red in heat and covers her mouth in agape. Her thoughts filled with trying to process what has just happened.

How''d he know I was pregnant? Was I that obvious? I tried hard to act like I''m not and planned to reveal it when he''s back from home. How''s he so confident about it? Was me touching my own stomach reveals it? 

Cassandra grips both sides of her hair and grits her teeth in frustration.

I''m an absolute idiot! I should''ve repressed my excitement. I even planned a surprise but I ruined it myself so early!!!

It was actually yesterday that Cassandra knew she''s carrying a child in her womb but she had to prepare a plan for a surprise to her husband that they''ll be a parents now as a reward from coming back to home.

She lets go of her hair and sighed.

I''m married to a man that reads me too well.

When thinking about this for a second, she curved her lips up and concluded in her mind that it''s not too bad.

It''s not that Cyrus reads Cassandra well, but that he knew of it.

---

On a bright light of the Sun, a man is walking in jumping pattern happily with a wide grin on his face. Cyrus was leisurely walking on a street joyfully.

The surrounding was filled with small houses with white paint with brownish chimneys and some on the side of the house has a small market outside that''s shaded under a curtain that''s taking care of mostly woman, there''s rarely a man guarding a market.

Right about this moment, Cass might be superly embarass that I know she''s pregnant of our own kid.

In the actual time before he teleported back in three years time, he''s actually surprised to have heard that Cassandra''s pregnant with a surprise of a small feast.

I''m very sorry to have ruin your surprise but I have no other way to have you assured.

He felt a bit of guilt from his act. 

Cyrus looks at the street ahead of him.

There''s quite a bit of crowd strolling in the open market, some bringing a plastic bag containing what they recently bought and some just window shopping not buying anything at all.

Despite it being a bit crowded, there was certain place filled with people ahead forward. Some were whispering in gossip. Some are merely spectating the scene.

Looks like there''s a commotion there

Out of curiosity, he went to take a look alongside the crowd.

He found that the crowd was surrounding a bar in wooden saloon door and wall was wood also and glass window on both side of the door.

I wonder what it''s about.

Having time travelled doesn''t mean he remembers every details that has happened in every day to pass.

He heard whispers on his side.

"A thief was captured threatening a bartender for wealth"

"Such despicable man"

"Wretched Human Being"

Cyrus added inwardly to himself 

If a theif was caught stealing in a bar, wouldn''t he be behind the "bars"?

Cyrus silently chuckled inside as to not stand out.

He slowly walks out of the crowd and gaze on the scene with his eyes sideways.

He saw two men walking out from the bar. One has his hands on his back and other was following behind clenching both the man''s hand in back.

The man captured has a stern and pissed expression shown on his face with pale white skin tone and black curvy bangs hair. His gray plain clothes has holes showing he doesn''t particularly have any wealth. The man was still quite on his adolescence period or early adulthood. About 17-19 if judge based on appearance. Accompanied by a dignified man wearing white polo and black necktie and black tuxedo along with black pants.

Cyrus added an inward judgment

I don''t blame the desperation to steal when one''s clearly in that state.

Cyrus felt empathetic to the thief.

He saw the dignified man wearing a pitch black gloves on his hand. It has the emblem of a blue crescent moon at the back of the gloves.

Cyrus felt familiar seeing that symbol. He tried hard to remember it.

But failed to do so.

He pinched his glabella and shuts his eyes tight cracking his brain to remember.

.....

Nothing came to mind.

Even if it''s familiarity and it''s a long time, he would have at least a fragment of remembering what occured in this time.

Upon this realization, it struck him hard.

Cyrus have forgotten all what will happen in the future.
 ',
                        1
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        3,
                        'Chapter 3',
                        'Chapter 3: Diary of the Demised 

I forgot

Those two words ingrained deeply in his thoughts. 

Did I have an amnesia? Or perhaps dementia at least? No no no. Forgetting what''ll happen in the future is paradoxical. Or is it natural to forget about it? I still know that I''m from future time.

Cyrus glanced at his arms and touched his cheeks. And thought as he walked normally

My physical appearance hasn''t changed far as I remember compare to three years of time to come.

Is my memory only in from three years before? Then why''d I remember that today is the day that Cassandra told me she''s pregnant? Does it take time to forget all eventually? 

This might be a paradox of time.

Cyrus ponders over these thoughts in his head and finally arrived at his workplace.

It''s a three story futuristic building with flat rooftop walls painted black with quadrilateral windows closed. The silver colored door in front accompanied with small cemented staircase and metalic black handrail on side of it.

He walked upward on the stairs and rotates the circular doorknob and push it open with a hinge sound.

The sight before him shows a lot crowded seated people tapping a lot in typewriter with white pale paper in front that it''s the only sound that can be heard.

Cyrus heard approaching footstep coming in his side. He shift his head sideward to see who it is but his shoulder is already wrapped in the arms of the person approaching Cyrus with a wide smile.

"Yo, Cyrus"

The man leaning and wraps Cyrus is a man on his middle twenties. Jawline is visibly sharp on his fair white skin. His black hair combed backwards that shows his forehead and oceanic eyes that is most conspicuous among all. Wearing white polo and brown long vest that reached his thighs. 

"Brian"

Brian''s holding a white cup that emits fragrance of a soothing aroma on his left hand.

"Want some tea?"

Brian lift his left hand that gestures him to take the tea in his hand.

"Sure"

Cyrus respond and attempts to take Brian''s tea he''s holding but Brian immediately pulls back his left hand and lets go of his right hand that''s clinging on Cyrus shoulder and shifts his back and walks away

"I''ll go make one"

Brian smirked

I thought you''d give it to me.

Cyrus sighed inwardly in disappointment.

Cyrus begins to walk forward amongst the seated crowd

And he finally arrived at his respected chair and table containing his own typewriter, beside the typewriters, it is a compilation of empty wrapped white paper.

Cyrus is a journalist.

He pulled his chair and sits on it comfortably and dragged it forward to properly positioned himself to begin writing.

Cyrus takes out a piece of paper and place it on the platen of the typewriter keyboard.

It wasn''t long before he saw Brian approaching him with a cup on each hand.

Brian puts on cup to left side of Cyrus table and continues walking leisurely.

Cyrus thanked Brian but never heard the words as he continues walking forward to finally go back to his seat.

Cyrus leisurely took a sip on his warm tea and continues.

....

After a few minutes passed.

"Cyrus!"

A female voice from a distance in the office calls out Cyrus'' name

Cyrus raise his head slightly to look and stands up from his sit to approach who''s calling out to him.

He walks towards the woman and arrives to see that it''s wearing a black long short-sleeved dress embroidered with blue flowers that reached her calves. Emerald eyes and pale white skin with visible pink lips. Her height is a tad bit shorter compare to Cyrus who''s a man with an average height. What stood out the most in Cyrus'' eyes is her unique pony-tailed dark blue hair that the below part of her hair is color silver. 

But he remembers his promise to his wife to never look at other woman and immediately stops looking at her in awe.

"What''s it Mary?"

The woman''s name is Mary. A colleague of Cyrus.

"Boss''s looking for you"

She said straightforwardly.

"I see, thanks"

Cyrus patted Mary''s shoulder and immediately jolted to pull back his hand and walks past her.

"Imma go smoke"

Hey, an elegant looking lady shouldn''t engage herself to such activity you know 

Cyrus added that judgment to his heart as he heard Mary''s footstep slowly disappear.

He stopped walking on his tracks and looks at his right hand that patted Mary''s shoulder remembering what he felt on touching it and mumbled softly.

"Cold"

He proceeds walking and went upstairs twice to go to the main office of his boss.

He encountered a closed silver door

He knocks thrice on the door and heard a male voice through the door a second after

"Come in"

He reached out the circular doorknob and rotates it and push it open but failed. He attempts it twice to thrice 

His mouth twitched.

He then pulled the door and it opens with a creak.

He thought embarassingly to himself

So it''s pull not push.

That slight clumsiness of him caused himself to awkwardly smile and scratches the back of his head as he enters his boss''s office.

I really did forgot mostly everything 

The only thing he knew was that he''s from future. Nothing more nothing less.

And three years of past time is quite long for an average person to remember clearly. Even if he didn''t forget, he''d only remember a fragment.

At the side of the wall was a wooden bookshelf that contains documents. Some are folded newspaper. And at the top were golden small sculpture or some might call it "trophies". In the floor is a two purple cushion fit for two people facing each other.

In front of Cyrus is a serious man on his thirties leaning backward of his chair his right arm relaxing on its armchair wearing a silver tuxedo and white polo with blue necktie. Beside him is a rectangular table, it has table place name holder that reads "Howard Deiter". And a lamp that radiates brightness to the office.

Cyrus muscle grew tense at the pressure being on a presence of his boss and bowed slightly as a greeting and standee firm and straight and asked politely 

"What''s it, Boss?"

A few seconds flew by in utter silence did Howard blurt out chuckled that broke the tense atmosphere.

"Hehehehe. Don''t be so tense now"

After Howard said this, he spread his arm

"Relax. Have a sit first before we begin"

Howard gestured Cyrus to sit on the cushion which he obediently obliged and sits. The cushion was soft and cold which is good for the feels.

A few second later, Howard got up from his sit and walked towards the bookshelf to take out something from there. He took out what he sought and approached Cyrus and hands it to him. Cyrus was confused but receives it.

A brown notebook with the cover torned and filled with dust. Looks quite old. It has a name written in curvy penmanship "Bruce Hill".

Cyrus blurted out his first thought

"A diary?"

Cyrus looked at his boss Howard only to see his back and walks towards his table to open his drawer and said.

"Apparently"

Howard then takes out a pile of white paper from his drawer and hands it to Cyrus.

In the paper holds people''s black and white picture and it''s information.

[Prince Blake: 23 Years old. Works as a delivery of mail at DMAA. Single]
[Anderson Silver: 21 Years old. Masseuse. Single]

These are people I totally know nothing about.

Cyrus scanned in total boredom

As a journalist, confidentiality is a must. And other people''s information is none of his concern and just write it without revealing their identity so he''s totally fitted to be one.

It was then that there''s a name that piqued his interest.

[May Hill: 22 Years old. Works at a dessert restaurant. Married]

Married. Hill.

Cyrus made a connection in his mind and looked at Howard who''s standing in front of him.

"That''s Bruce''s wife"

As I expected.

Cyrus looked at the notebook. He puts down the paper in the cushion to his side and starts flipping on the content inside the notebook to read.

[January 11th:

I was given a task to travel on a forest and take pictures of the scenery and describe it to publish for the company I work at. It''s said that it''d take a day worth of travel to get there with carriage alone. Coincidentally, both of my two friends are free. I asked Anderson and Prince to tag along with me since it''s a trip after all and fortunately speaking, they both agreed to me. My wife couldn''t tag along as she''s busy serving costumers in the restaurant she worked at. Well, I''m glad she didn''t. Because even if I trust my friends here with me, I can''t take any risk because they''re guys like me. We rented a carriage with a horse on it and took a departure with Prince as the driver knowing that he''s been working as a mail delivery. And night came by that we took rest, Anderson massaged Prince back and I fed the horse and we leisurely light a fire and eats the food prepared before we depart and slept]

This is the content of the first page

So those two men that I''ve recently read in paper are his friends.

He flips to the next page of the notebook

[January 12th:

It was noon that we finally arrived in the yellow leaf Forest. It''s sight sure is one to behold. I took pictures with my camera. We stopped on our tracks using the carriage and begins walking. We''re surrounded by yellow leaf Forest as if we''re embraced in sun''s warmth. This sure is one worthy to publish in newspaper. This''ll attract those who wants to travel. My friends and I decide to stay here for the night. In the night, we encountered four teenage boys with no upper clothes and lower part is covers with yellow fabric. Their skins are thin and pale. Looks like they''re lost within the woods and are starving. We invited them to eat with us. They sat beside us without a word. They''re shaking as they''re drooling. They refused to eat our meal. A few minutes after we''re done eating the meal. The four teenagers gestured us to follow them. And they guided us in a cave.]

The right part of the page

[Finally! A shelter! I thought we would''ve sleep outside. A cave isn''t so bad. My friends and I are happy to live in a cave compared to outside. The four teenagers smiled towards us without a word and invited us in. Such kind-hearted kids. We accepted the kind offer and went inside the cave to sleep]

I have a bad feeling about this one.

He flipped to the next one 

[In my sleep I smelled a burning flames and woke up thinking it''s finally daytime and in my sight tightens my heart with fear. Anderson was impaled from bottom to top rotating in the grasp of fire as if it''s a pig being cooked, his legs are amputated and is devoured by two men laughing maniacally like demons. Prince was hanging upside down in cross and head was butchered and face stabbed through the cross with sharpened wood making it still look connected to the body even if it''s not with blood gushing out. Two other men dancing around the cross chanting indescribable words as if summoning an evil entity. 

They''re a cannibal. A bloody cannibal. Monsters eating my friends. Out of deep fear I ran away from the cave as they''re still distracted. Desperate to escape and successfully did so that I arrived in the carriage. I rode it hastily sweat and tears running down to my face. I took a look back on the forest and saw the four man standing in the forest sinisterly smiling with red liquid dripping in their mouth with their hand holding the impaled parts of the body.]

[Nightmare. This is a nightmare]

Cyrus felt his skin tremble in fear and almost wants to throw the notebook away from him.

But he dares not to and flips on the next one. he saw that the letters are a bit scribbled but still can be read.

[JANUARY 13TH: 

I arrived home. Alone.. alone.... My wife is at home but yet I''m alone.]

......

[January 14th:

I told my wife what happened and she tried many ways to console me. None worked.]

[January 15th: 

Those faces I can''t escape in my mind!!!!!! I can''t escape them!!! I can''t escape!!!! The one who should''ve died is me!!!!!]

This page was torned and ripped

Cyrus flips to the next page and froze

[I should die]

That''s the end part of the notebook. There was a faint of redness in the page. The rest of the pages are empty.

Cyrus immediately closed the notebook and puts it beside him. He looks at Howard and said

"Is Bruce-"

Howard interrupted him before he''s done speaking 

"He''s dead"',
                        1
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        4,
                        'Chapter 4',
                        'Chapter 4: Diamond''s Charm

"He''s dead"

He''s dead.

The words echoed through the office. 

It''s within Cyrus'' expectation but hearing it outright left him dread.  

The trauma and intense guilt of Bruce witnessing his friend''s being devoured by the same species as him to commit suicide.

He totally left his own wife all alone now.

Cyrus'' felt empathize but it also angered him a bit that he left his wife just because of his trauma.

Silence befall the room for few seconds until Cyrus'' blurted out the natural question 

"How''d he die?"

It''s obviously a suicide but the method pique his curiosity.

"Shot his own double chin with a revolver"

Revolver? How''d he managed to get one? Did he bought it from a gun shop? He seriously bought a weapon just to use it on himself 

Cyrus sighed

Cyrus suddenly had a thought to himself.

I feel more like a detective than a journalist now.

He puts his index and thumb to his chin frowned his eyebrows as if he''s thinking deeply.

"Why''d you inform me this boss?"

Cyrus asked naturally the purpose.

Howard inhales a deep breath before saying.

"I want you to investigate it"

Hey, isn''t this notebook enough to alarm the deadly danger that lurks there? Why want me to investigate it? This is suicidal.

Isn''t this more suited for Exploration Corps? Why me?

Cyrus'' complained a lot in his heart and wanted to refuse the offer until Howard utter the words

And my memories from the future is erased. I don''t know what''ll happen to me there.

And besides I''m not paid enough to dive into my death. I have a wife that''s pregnant.

The lowest to highest currency of this world is copper and 10 copper is equivalent to 1 Silver and 100 Silver is equivalent to 1 gold and 25 Gold for a 1 Diamond.

And Cyrus was being paid for only 10 Gold and 75 silver a month just to barely manage to living properly with his wife.

Diving to his Demise with only that payment is beyond unfair and naturally he must refuse the proposal even if it''s from his boss.

(10,750 copper)

"5 Diamonds"

Diamond. Diamond. Diamond.

Cyrus'' mind went empty and only the words echoed in his ears continuously.

5 Diamonds is equivalent to 125,000 Copper

That''s more than ten times his monthly payment!

He could assure his food, his wife''s child delivery, can buy the toys for his future kid, his house will be decent.

Cyrus abruptly stand up from his sit and said

"It shall be done Sir!"

A man easily controlled by money. Cyrus happens to be one of it.

Danger? Nothing compared to Five Diamonds.

Hehehe.

Cyrus grins and it immediately fades a second after and scoffs a cough

I cannot be ignorant about the risk.

He looked at his boss and asked

"Will I be going now? Alone?"

He asked the latter question shakily showing faint fear.

Howard answers calmly.

"No, not right away. Inform your wife first of your departure. You''ll have two days before you go. If you wish, you can start with investigating the wife of Bruce. She mostly works weekdays and rests on weekends. But I''m guessing that even if two months has passed right now, she''s still mourning her husband''s passing"

He paused a second before he continues

"And no, you''ll not be going there alone. I hired one bodyguard to accompany you on your journey. Rest assured, I''m aware of the danger there."

Bodyguard. Only one? So far, there''s four cannibals in that forest you know? There might be more than that

"Where''s that person right now sir?"

Cyrus looks at the surrounding of the room but failed to see another person besides them.

"He''s quite a shy man, but he''s listening to our conversation somewhere"

He added with his eyes locked deep on Cyrus'' 

"You can''t see him if he doesn''t want you to"

Sounds like a ghost. Despite it being unbelievable, Cyrus is convinced somehow of his boss''s statement.

"That''s quite scary"

The tense atmosphere disappeared when Howard smiled warmly

"As I said, rest assured. If the one guarding you is dangerous then the danger that lurks is less dangerous"

Cyrus heaved a sigh of relief

But question arises inside his head.

He can''t be seen in sight but hears what we''re saying? Is he outside this door eavesdropping to us outside the office? Or somewhere near?

Cyrus took a glance of the door

"No, he''s not outside the office"

Is he a mind-reader? Or am I that obvious?

He shifts his gaze again towards his boss

"I see"

"That''s all, you can dismiss now*

Howard gestured his arm to the door expressing for Cyrus to leave the office now.

Cyrus turns his back begins walking towards the door and faced Howard once more and bowed a bit before pushing the door open.

As Cyrus is out of the office and closed the door he stand leaning on the door for some deep thought of consideration and sighed.

How should I tell my wife that I''m about to venture on a Deadly Forest?

Should I keep it a secret and just make it look like a business trip? Sounds unconvincing considering it''s a forest. Journalist rarely go beyond their scope and focus of research. My wife ain''t stupid enough to believe that.

Cyrus began walking downstairs with hands on his pocket of his pants. will still in internal conflict with himself.

Knowing her, even if she''s convince of my excuse, she''d definitely worry I would get lost. A worrywart.

Cyrus lips curled upwards slightly concluding that might not be a bad scenario to witness.

Desperate of thinking of an excuse he suddenly came to have an idea.

It''s what has been echoing in his mind since the agreement and mumbled silently

"5 Diamonds"

Perhaps, she''ll be convinced to let me go once she heard that much amount of money I''m going to get paid for going.

Cyrus went back to his respected chair and table and continued his work leisurely as if nothing happened and it was blink of an eye that night came and he and his colleagues have been dismissed and went out from their workplace.

Oceanic Blue Radiant Luna shines in the midst of the darkness. The sole light of the surrounding night.

Cyrus was strolling on side of the road and came across a market being lit by small fire as light.

He mumbles 

"There should still be food at home"

Despite saying this, his feet moved towards the market and bought a few ingredients and meat before continuing to head to his home.

He finally arrived at his house. A cement plain wall. It''s length is small about two and half meters of height only and a vintage colored roof. And a wooden door in his front.

He raised his right hand because his left hand is carrying a plastic bag containing the food and attempts to knock on the door but immediately backs away as he realized something and twitched his mouth upwards.

Oh right, I forgot that I ruined my wife''s surprise of her pregnancy.

Due to escape attempt from being strangled by his wife. He had to expose that he knows that Cassandra''s pregnant but now that it has come to this, sweat are visible and befall from his face.

Women are angry if exposed.

Lemme guess, she''s waiting for me behind the door right now.

As of this moment, Cyrus was convinced that the potential rage of his wife is far more horrifying than the cannibals yet to be seen from his eyes.

Preparing for the worst, Cyrus raised his hand to knock on the door but to his surprise before his fist reached the door, the door opened right before him.

Before his eyes was his beautiful wife who''s unusually wearing a visible stern expression from her face. 

She''s currently wearing a vintage wrap dress that reached her knees, her cleavage clearly seen. Her eyes directing towards his husband and instantly she greeted him with a smile and warmth.

"Welcome home"

In this moment, Cyrus was surprised but sighed a relief.

So she''s not mad, I''m glad then.

"I''m back"

Cassandra drew a stepped back to make way for her husband to enter and Cyrus did so.

"Food''s at table, same one"

He walked towards the living room and faced the small table dined with plates containing a few slice of meat yet again and spoon. Cyrus puts down the plastic bag he''s carrying to his side and sits down patiently waiting for his wife to come sit alongside him. 

Cassandra arrived in front of him and she lifts her dress to comfortably sit down. And they dine together silently as if nothing ever happened.

As they finished dining to their meal, Cassandra interrupted the last bite that her husband was eating by grabbing his wrist.

"Wait, I have something to ask from you first"

Cyrus has expected this scenario to happen and didn''t got mad that his wife interrupted the last bite of his meal and calmly puts the spoon down and gestured his hands to his wife indicating her to proceed with a smile.

The question she''s going to ask is quite obvious but he remains oblivious to wait.

With a faint red from her cheeks, she asked.

"How''d you know I was pregnant?"

Even though it''s expected, Cyrus still showed signs of blushing. With a deep inhalation and exhalation to compose his beating heart. He said calmly the natural answer 

"We did the deed, didn''t we?"

As embarassing as it is, it is the truth. The corner of Cassandra''s cheeks transforms into a color of a tomato and lets go of her grip slowly and awkwardly compose her posture as she plays with her own hair.

*Right, we did*

She pursed her lips shut subconsciously reminiscing of a certain night.

Cyrus is relieved to have witness that that answer convinced her and thought to himself.

*I still remember it you know*

As a man himself, it''s a great honor to have dived and explore the seductive figure beneath.

Another thought came to him in which was obvious.

*I''m going to be a father*

If only Cyrus had remembered what the baby''s gender was in the future and the decided name, he would''ve bought a toy in advance. But even if he does remember, that action would arouse suspicion from his wife that he knows what the baby''s gender is without even identifying it from a midwife.

She''s even already suspicious of him that he knew she has conceived a child before she informs him.

Gender prediction in this age is based on folk methods and keen observation of the pregnant woman.

"By the way Cass, I got a commission to depart on a forest"

Ignoring the plan, he decides to open himself about the recent event of his workplace.

Cassandra slightly frowns her eyebrows and arms crossed together in her body and reluctantly asked

"When? And how long?"

There was a sign of worry in her expression as if she doesnt want to let go of a treasure she possessed. But she knew this is a career stuff and she must refrain herself from being selfish as her husband carries the responsibility of managing their funds.

Cyrus slowly lowers his head and scratch the back of it awkwardly and said hesitantly 

"I''ll go in two days, it''s said that it takes a day worth of travel to get there. So it might take me three days to be back"

*Three days*

Cassandra''s heart tightened of the thought of not seeing her husband for three days or even more. A second of deep thought she sighed and continues asking to ease her mind.

"Are you going alone? Or you have a coworker to come with you?"

She lets out all question in her mind like an interrogator questioning a criminal

"There''s someone coming with me"

*Someone? So it''s not from work*

Doubts started to arise deep within her hearts thinking he might have lied to her.

Her calm demeanor transform into a stern and fierce one.

"Who''s it?"

*Even I want to know*

As he thought of this, He cracked his brain trying to give an realistic lie to that but he gave up and tells the truth to his beloved wife.

"I don''t know, my boss''s said that that person will work as my bodyguard"

Putting an effort to ease her mind by calmly telling her the truth but ended in failure. Her stern fierce face turned to the worse, she said with a ferocious tone.

"A woman?"

*You''re still worried about that?*

"It''s a he"

Cyrus has nothing to hide except one thing he cannot make himself to say.

Upon hearing her husband''s statement, she became calm and composed in an instant immediately believing him with no doubt 

"I see. Well, there are indeed wild animals that lurks in a forest. A bodyguard with you is a must measure."

*If by wild animals you mean is a fellow humans that dines itself with fellow humans, you''re not wrong*

Cyrus finally took the last bite to his mouth as he thought of this. He cannot risk of having his wife know what''s in there.

But all of Cassandra''s questions is not yet asked so she continued.

"How much are you paid for this though?"

She finally asked the anticipated questions in Cyrus'' mind and he smirked to speak.

"5 Diamonds"

Those words echoed in Cassandra''s ears and silence befall between them once more.

She compose herself and raised her right arm forward to Cyrus 

"You can go"',
                        1
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        5,
                        'Chapter 5',
                        'Chapter 5: Investigation 

Tomorrow arrived in a flash and Cyrus got up early in the morning and saw that his wife still didn''t rise from her slumber. 

Not wanting to awaken her, he goes out of their room and saw the window illuminates the outside where the sun still doesn''t rise. Pretty early literally.

If I had to speculate the time, it might still be 4:00 EC(early chrono).

Despite the fact that it''s not his working time yet which is 8:00 EC to 6:00 LC(late chrono). He took the liberty to cook his own meal, light up the fire and cook a soup with potato and carrot in a pot. It took only 10 minutes to cook it and he takes out a small bowl and spoon taking out a few scoop of soup to his plate. He left some for his wife.

He goes to the table and sits idly on the floor. Putting the bowl and spoon to the table he begins dining his own food. As the soup shows warm heat he gently blows the scooped food on the spoon and digest it.

It''s taste isn''t bad but not compared or rivaled to what his wife make. But due to not wanting to disturb her from her wonder dream, he decides to just refrain from it and just went on to eat it until none from the bowl left.

As he was finished dining his meal, faint golden light shines from his back and to the table. He shifts his gaze and discovers through the window that the Sun already rise. 

So I woke up at about 5:30 EC

The Sun mostly rise from 6:00 EC and sets at 6:00 LC which is a pattern known by everyone since ancient times.

His wife usually wakes up 6:30 EC to prepare the meal and literally everything for him. And he unusually woke up earlier than her.

Cyrus got up on the floor picks his Bowl and spoon to wash it on the kitchen. After doing so, he picks a piece of blank plain white paper and an ink pen to write something

After a few minutes of writing the details in the paper, he folds it twice and goes to the door of their room and stick it just beside the doorknob hoping that the moment the door open his wife would notice it.

After he''s done he went to the hanging clothes just beside the window and took out a white polo and Blazers and a brown long pants and change his clothes to them.

He goes to the window to see his own faint reflection. Small black hair, Brown eyes, ordinary facial features, average physical build. 

Considering what he witnessed he sighed to himself

My wife fell for this kind of face?

He went on to criticizing himself.

Despite being from the future and been married for almost a year from this time, it is still a mystery to him about his wife''s taste.

As he sighed once more, he walks towards the door. As he''s about to reach out for the doorknob, a scene instantly flashed in his mind.

The door was burning in flames alongside the wall and his surroundings and his head is aching in excruciating pain. He gripped his own hair tight as if he''s attempting to rip it apart as he groaned and abruptly stump his feet many times.

He felt his wife''s presence in his back and he shifts his body to look at her.

Cassandra''s forehead drenched in blood to her lips. The blue dress in the abdomen that''s bulging part is wet in crimson liquid. Her eyes empty but deep as abyss

Cyrus heart tightened in terror witnessing the scene before him and sees his wife''s mouth slightly opening wanting to say something

"None will be saved.... None!!!"

Her loud voice shrieks the entire house to tremble. Cyrus covers both his ears tightly from the deafening demonic time as he grit his teeth.

A split second later, everything came back to normal. Cyrus felt his cheek and forehead sweating. He wipes it with his wrist and palm hastily. And gasp for breath

Unable to utter a word and could only have his mouth slightly agape. Trying to process what just happened.

*Was that a future occurrence?*

Having completely forgotten what will occur soon, Cyrus can only conclude based on his assumption.

Taking a few deep breaths, he compose himself.

I can only think of three possible reason of this. One is that this might be what will happen in the unexpected times which I hope wouldn''t happen. Two is that the statement is a revelation and a warning to what will happen inevitably. Three is that I''m simply hallucinating due to unknown reason at all.

He mumbles 

"I shouldn''t think too much of this"

He turns his back to the door and reached out for the doorknob again. This time, nothing happens and he opens the door.

Radiant light shine upon him and he closed his eyes tight and shades his face with his wrist.

A second after, he opens his eyes again and lowers his wrist.

He felt something falling to his brown shoes and he looks down to see it was a mail letter.

*It fell from the door, did someone sent it and stick it to the door? Ain''t that what I just did? What a small coincidence*

He lowers his body to pick it up and unwraps it and takes out the inside which is a folded white piece of paper and begins reading the contents

[Apologies for the inconveniences this might cause you Cyrus, but I forgot to tell you the relevant details regarding the diary.]

*This is from my boss*

He proceeds on reading

[Bruce''s wife May works at a coffee tea restaurant just one kilometer Southwest to your house, She works usually 6 EC to 4 LC. She''s paid regularly just the right amount. And if you forgot her details, she has Brown long hair usually pony-tailed and green eyes fair white skin. I really doubt that she''s working right now due to her husband''s passing but I hope you''d stop by to that restaurant in hope you would encounter her. I''ll keep my word about the 5 Diamonds don''t worry about it. Thank you and sorry.

Sincerely: Howard Deiter]

*I didn''t really bother looking at the woman''s detail only because my promise is ingrained deeply to my mind*

But as duty calls, he knows that this time he must. Not ogle but look only. Yes, look only. Big difference between the two.

Obliging his boss demands, he began to walk Southwest from his house.

A few minutes walking leisurely he came across a small restaurant. Above the brown door was wood carved in emblem of a coffee. Accompanied with glass windows between the door.

*This must be it*

Without further ado, Cyrus goes to open the door and was welcomed warmly of the atmosphere inside. 

There are silver circular table with two white chair facing each other. As it was still early in the morning, looks like it''s only Cyrus here and a few workers wearing a brown apron.

Fortunately, what caught his eye the most was what''s in front of him.

There''s a woman standing idly behind a long wooden rectangular table wearing Brown apron also. Brown pony-tailed hair, green eyes.

Without a doubt

Her face is quite pale and somewhat thin showing signs of lack of digesting food. and she stares blankly into space as if Cyrus in front of her doesn''t exist. 

Cyrus felt empathetic of the thought witnessing he''s likely not seen. Trying to be thoughtful as possible, he politely and slowly approach May in front of him.

As he''s getting closer approaching her, he stopped at a decent distance. 

Upon seeing a figure in her sight, The woman suddenly jolt awake from staring to the blank space. She hastily made hand gesture in panic but it she immediately compose herself after after a deep breath and smiles faintly to Cyrus as she greets while taking out a pen and a small piece of paper about the size of palm.

"Morning Sir, May I have your order?"

*Order? I didn''t really come here to drink though*

He thought for a moment and concluded 

*But since I''m here anyway, might as well have a warm drink*

"Black coffee, two cubes of sugar please Ms"

She begins taking notes fast 

"And also"

The woman stops writing waiting patiently for Cyrus to continue. He paused for a second before proceeding and bows slightly towards her.

"May I bother you to let us talk about your husband. Mrs. May Hill?"

The woman is May Hills. Bruce Hill''s wife.

May''s smile faded and stares emptily at the man in front of her.

Cyrus raise his body from the bowl and said with and awkward chuckle.

"Where are my manners, I forgot to introduce myself. I''m Cyrus Velador, a journalist from Graven News Publishment Company"

May still stares a few seconds and slightly agape her mouth to exhale a breath.

She shift her gaze to her side

"Manager! I''m going to take a break now, is that fine?"

"It''s still early, we have not much costumers at this time."

A male old voice echoed in the front of the wall.

May shifts her eyes towards Cyrus again and said straight forwardly 

"Go to the table 3, we''ll talk there"

"Table where?"

Cyrus raised one of his eyebrows in confusion.

"The third table in the right just beside the wall"

Cyrus looks at his right direction and can only see that there''s five tables total in there.

He sits at the chair in the middle table and he leans his side in the wall comfortably while leisurely tapping his feet waiting for May to arrive.

A minute passed and a female wearing a brown apron approaches him holding a small plate with white cup above it with spoon. 

She placed it in the table in front of him and proceeds on sitting on the chair just opposite to Cyrus.

As an experienced journalist, Cyrus knew it''s just professional to be the one to initiate the conversation first when asking for a talk to a target. 

But before he could utter a word, May interrupted him.

"Haaaaa finally, after a few months waiting"

It could be seen that there''s a faint sign in her expression that it got brighten.

"Before I start, I am sorry for your husband''s passing Mrs."

While still sitting, Cyrus bowed to May once more as an etiquette to show respect to the one who''s lost someone dear.

"Huh?"

May raised an eyebrow in confusion.

Cyrus lifts his head while also confuse too when she state it.

*Was that a bit overdoing? I don''t think so*

But what she said afterwards left him struck.

"My husband''s not dead, you know?"

"..... Huh?"



',
                        1
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        6,
                        ' Chapter 6',
                        'Chapter 6: Divulge 

"Huh?"

Cyrus'' expression is visibly confused on the recent statement.

"What?"

"My husband''s not dead"

If your husband didn''t pass away then what am I being nosy about? Why did the boss hand me this job? Am I simply wasting time here? Was the diary merely made up full of nonsense?

Just as Cyrus ponders over these thoughts in his mind, May opens her mouth uttering something that only the two of them can hear.

"I want you to look for him"

Cyrus flinched surprise at her request. To a mere journalist like him to be tasked to look for someone instead of getting answers is quite confusing as it''s our of his realm of expertise.

And it''s quite a hassle of a work. Being a journalist is no joke.

"Why not commission it to some Investigator?"

He asked the natural question.

"I did that two months ago and it took me another month of waiting only for it to be in vain to know that none accepted it"

Is it because lack of payment perhaps? No, she lives quite decently with her husband as they both have profession to manage their living. And even if assumed that her husband is indeed dead, her husband''s company will compensate her of her loss. No investigator was free during that time? No, far too weird to assume all investigators are always occupied in their career in a span of a month. A freaking month at that.

With all that in his mind he asked the next question.

"How long did you hand over the diary to us?"

"Last week"

 Boss just assigned me this yesterday for me to get answers from the wife. The hell he''s been doing the last few days?

Cyrus grabbed his cup of black coffee and holds the spoon on the other hand to slowly stir it and gently blows to ease the temperature and took a sip to calm his thinking as he just insulted his boss in his mind.

Its taste is slightly bitter thanks to two cubes of sugar and it warms his esophagus straight to his stomach.

His anger calmed down from a sip.

He puts it back to the table and crossed his arms proceeding the conversation.

"Apologies for the delay"

"No no, it''s fine. In fact, I''m glad that you accepted it"

May hastily waved her hands as she said it and puts it back on table.

A few second passed she heaved a deep breath. She looks down to her thighs and said.

"It''s been two months since my husband has gone missing, all that''s he left me was that torned diary of his."

Immediately after, her body trembles and hesitant to continue talking as her mouth quivers to utter even a word.

"I''ve read his diary"

*Of course you did*

Cyrus can only let his inward thoughts remain inside.

"I was terrified. Terrified for him. Terrified of what he went through, it doesn''t even make sense."

Her tone shaking she held both her arms tight. The fright is visible as she became pale.

"It was few days after he came back that he''s gone missing, I noticed blood on the last page that he wrote and a loud sound at that night before. But he''s gone just right that, there''s not even a body of him. I''ll never accept that he''s dead without me seeing his corpse"

*The blood was on the last page declaring he would commit suicide but no body was found after? Doesn''t make sense at all. Even if Bruce didn''t really die, the blood and the sudden disappearance wouldn''t add up. How was there blood on it to begin with?  Failed suicide attempt? Ridiculous. And if he''s not dead, why would he leave his wife? Boss told me that Bruce shot himself, was that just false assumption? Did boss lied to me?*

Normally speaking, after experiencing a traumatizing event, any person would settle on the place with a person they''re most comfortable with. Not to forget it but to leave it.

Cyrus formed a fist for his cheek to rest as he contemplate trying to properly process his thoughts to make a logical assumption on these absurd nonsense.

"Sir"

Cyrus flinched and immediately looks at May.

"Are you okay?"

May asked worrily

*Quite kind of you to be worry to some strangers when you''re the one that''s in struggle*

Cyrus curved his lips upward slightly and compose himself once more by sitting properly.

"I''m fine, Don''t mind it. Continue, I''m listening"

May pursed her lips a second before continuing.

"Since it''s me that asked for this, and I know the potential grave danger. I''m willing to pay for this as to compensate you for the risk"

*Pay? I''m already paid to do it by my boss and you too would pay? Luck blessed me*

"That would be appreciated, how much would it be Ms.?"

It was at this moment Cyrus forgot that he''s just a mere journalist.

May pursed her lips shut once more that it took few seconds for her to open it.

"2 Diamonds."

Silence befall between them. And inside Cyrus mind, he smiled sinisterly but couldn''t afford to show it.

*I''m blessed by luck indeed*

Cyrus will only be paid 5 diamond from his company which is enough make him leave the stage of lower class and dive to middle class in the realms of wealth. Now that he''s also paid for 2 diamond as bonus. He could have an all out vacation with his wife with just that 7 diamonds that amounts to 175.000 copper.

But there''s one factor that couldn''t be ignored by him.

"That''d be appreciated but how can I trust it?"

 Cyrus raised his eyebrow to show suspicion.

*A female that only works at a coffee restaurant possessed a diamond that even I struggle to get? No way I wouldn''t doubt that*

Mostly speaking, working at a restaurant has low salary but manageable to live a life but also not enough to arose from lower class to middle class.

"It''s my husband''s and my wealth"

"Your husband''s?"

"Yes, he left some money in the diary before he''s gone missing. It was a diamond and 12 gold. The other 13 gold is mine"

"Your husband has that much money?"

Cyrus kept on going with his question to show his doubt.

May nodded slightly.

"Yes, he has a work that pays well"

"Do you know what his work is? Do you know what''s the company''s name that he work at?"

It wasn''t that he''s doubting that they could get that much wealth considering they both have work. But it''s the husband that posses a diamond and more that''s suspicious for him.

Upon hearing that question from Cyrus, May fell silent and looked down at her thighs as she shakily say

"I.. I don''t know"

This raised Cyrus suspicion more.

He knit his eyebrow and have his cheek rest on his hand.

"You don''t know?"

She nodded twice quickly.

"Yes, he never told me. We''re already 2 years married but he never told me about his job at all"

*His profession is a mystery, not even the name of his company is mentioned in the diary. All that''s known is that Bruce was planning to take pictures together on a trip with his deceased two friends.*

*It''s not even known if that two friend of his are dead. It''s only dictated at the diary that they are but it''s not even believable at this point considering May''s statement that Bruce might not be dead at all.*

*And most of all, he hid it even from his wife? Man, just what kind of sh*t did Bruce got into? I thought he''s only a photographer*

"That''s weird, ever thought why he''s hiding it?"

It took a second before May answered.

"At first, I thought that he might have a love affair at work but that doubt is gone knowing for two straight years together that after he''s done at work always he goes home immediately"

*A love affair at work can''t still be ruled out even if the husband comes home at time. But that''s beside the point*

"I see, what else have you thought?"

She thought for a few second and look around at her surroundings making sure no costumer or coworkers are eavesdropping. There''s still no costumer in sight.

"I think that he might be doing dangerous or illegal things. He might even earn than I thought he have and hid his money from me. The camera that he always bring might just be a disguise to cover it from me"

.....

*... The imagination of a woman is wild.*

Even with that thought to his mind, he didn''t rule out the possibility given by May.

He proceeds to the next and last question

"Why do you want to give me that much money?"

Without a second thought, she answered immediately with a sharp expression of resolve.

"It''s my husband"

Upon hearing that, Cyrus doubt ease and smiled slightly.

*Well, her husband has gone missing and presumed to be dead. The desperation might have drive her to give that much wealth... Even I would do the same if I were on her shoes.*

With that thought, he sighed and smiled after.

"It''s a deal then Ms"',
                        1
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        7,
                        'Chapter 7',
                        'Chapter 7: Bar

"It''s a deal then Ms."

May''s face was visibly delighted as she smiles happily from the statement. 

She got up instantly from her seat and reached out to Cyrus'' hands and bowed abruptly.

"Thank you, thank you sir... Thank you"

"Keep in mind that I can''t make promises that I might not see that husband of yours"

*As long as this case remains ridiculously mysterious, I can''t afford to make promises. Best I can do for it is put effort*

May''s smile slowly fades but not that of sadness but with resolve.

"Don''t worry, I''m already thankful that you''re helping me find him. And if you do failed to find him, I''ll still pay you those diamonds."

Cyrus fell silent.

*... Ma''am, with that method. You''re bound to be scammed. I could simply pretend to look for your husband when I actually didn''t and would still get the money and tell you I failed to find him. That''s what anyone would do if encountered with such commission.*

Upon thinking this, Cyrus sighed disappointedly and touched his forehead with his palm.

"All right, I shall take my leave now"

"Not gonna finish your tea?"

"I only want it to wake myself up"

Cyrus stand from his seat and reached out to his pockets in search of currency.

He took out a few silver to hand it to May but she interrupted by holding his hand that''s holding silvers.

"It''s on me, don''t mind it"

Quite generous

But that thought made him more convinced that May''s excessive generosity will be the result of her downfall someday. Not because of her kindness, but to the people she might share her kindness to.

So with this act. Cyrus insisted on handing the silvers to May, giving it to her palm.

"Being kind is nice, just be careful who you''re giving it to"

May fell silent for a second and then slowly accepts it.

Cyrus turned his back to walk away and noticed that there''s still no costumer that came even by this time.

*Not quite a trend coffee restaurant huh*

He walks with pockets in his hands and reached to the brown door but as he''s about to reach it, it opened itself.

He jolted a bit and was shocked to see the figure he bore his eyes upon.

The black hair hanged down going along with red delicate dress that reached down to its knees embroidered with silver curve and yellow high heels. Snow skin with shining eyes with its pink lips.

"Cass? What''re you doing here?"

"Cyrus? What''re you doing here?"

Both said in unison and Cassandra added.

"I thought you''re going to work today?"

"I was doing my work in here, you?"

"Work? I know the place you''re working at and it''s definitely not this. And besides I''m only here for a dessert."

*Dessert?*

Cyrus eyes constricted, clearly confused of what his wife just said.

"This is a coffee restaurant, what''re you talking about?"

*And I''m definitely not risking letting you have some caffeine with our baby in your tummy*

Cassandra paused and sighed and pointed her left index finger upward signing Cyrus to look upwards.

He goes outside to take a look.

He saw the logo sign of the restaurant, the coffee logo is seen but a few second of observation of the emblem on it, it resembles a cake.

"......"

Feeling embarrassed, he grew silent.

The quarrel grew so early in the morning and so early in the morning he''s defeated by it against his wife.

No husband can ever defeat their wife, if there''s one then it''s not a husband.

"I''m sorry"

Cyrus apologize to Cassandra.

"Now will you tell me the true reason why you''re here now?"

*You know I can use the same excuse as you, you know?*

Immediately resorting to what he''s thinking but was interrupted by a female voice.

"Your wife?"

Both Cassandra and Cyrus shift their gaze to see who''s speaking.

It''s May.

Seeing a woman, Cassandra grew more fierce and looks at Cyrus once more with a stern stare.

"Tell me straight Cyrus, who''s this woman?"

"Wait a minute Cass, it''s not what you think"

In panic, Cyrus gestures his hand wherever.

May bowed slightly to Cass.

"Please to meet you, I''m May Hills. Your husband''s only here to interview me regarding a case"

*My wife definitely isn''t pleased*

Cassandra looks back slowly at May.

"Case?"

"Yes, a case"

"What case?"

"Mind explaining me what that might be?"

*Oh my shit, it''s supposed to be held with strict confidentiality. I can''t let my wife know of this*

May smile slightly.

"It''s regards to my Husband"

....*I''m screwed*

But after hearing what she said, Cassandra calmed down and held her belly gently.

Seeing this, May smiled even more.

"Oh my"

"Hmm?"

May reached out to grab Cassandra''s wrist and dragged her inside the restaurant.

*Oh no*

May and Cassandra both went to the same table that Cyrus sat a minute before.

Cassandra sit gently to the chair while holding her stomach and May sit on the opposite side enthusiastically with a grin as if she almost forget the issue about her.

Cyrus followed but remained standing in Cassandra''s side.

May puts both her cheeks in her palms leaning on it as she looks as Cassandra with bright yes.

"Ms. You''re pregnant right?"

Cassandra flinched slightly and it''s visible that she''s to her expression that she''s flustered.

"Oh ah ahhhh"

Cassandra''s fidgeting playing with her hair clearly left speechless of the sudden statement.

She pursed her lips and utter.

"Yes"

May''s enthusiasm have only grown more.

She clasped her hands right and said energetically 

"Oh my god, Congratulations!!"

Cassandra''s feeling awkward by her excessive energy

"T-thanks"

*You gals have only met now and you''re both talking like you''ve been friends for over a decade?*

Cyrus felt weirded out by the atmosphere that it got him goosebumps and held his arms to brush off the stand up feathers.

*I guess this is good, good a change*

Cyrus eyes softened while pondering over these thoughts and smiled faintly

*I won''t leave*

"Well then, I''ll excuse myself. You ladies have fun on your girls talk"

Cyrus begins walking towards the exit.

"Ah"

Cassandra attempts to reach out by her hand to him but failed to do so.

Just as Cyrus was about to reach the exit, he turned his back and looked dearly at the sole woman he adores and gave out a wink before leaving.

He walked leisurely outside the street coming where the sun shine on his skin.

Cyrus stopped on his track when he came across a bar that had a commotion just a day ago.

*I should stop by for a bit*

He walked at the bar to approach the door and open it.

After all the stress so early in the morning, a beer could alleviate the pain.

There were a few massive or chubby man sitting at a chair chugging a wooden circular cup. Some even napped at the table snoring loudly.

In the front is a bartender and two men in their 30s that''s currently waiting for their drink to be served.

The bartender looks like it''s on his late 40s as white hairs are visible to his head. And wears a brown small vest with a white shirt. He''s currently taking out a drink to pour it to the cup of the two gentlemen.

Not wanting to disrupt their conversation by getting between them as they look like friends. Cyrus just sat at a chair besides the man on the left side.

The bartender is done serving the drink from two men.

"One samsour beer pls"

Cyrus took the opportunity to take his order.

"Right on"

Bartender began to take out a bottle of samsour to pour it on a wooden cup.

A second later, the man in Cyrus side begun laughing out of nowhere.

"Man, that kid sure has guts"

"What kid?"

Cyrus didn''t want to eavesdrop their conversation but he also didn''t want to stand up from his sit.

Despite his morality being harmed, his ears are still functional to listen even if he doesn''t want to.

"The kid who stole something from this bar."

"Ah, that kid. He''s quite a talk of the town after being caught"

"It''s quite amazing that it took 2 months to catch him after all"

Cyrus flinched when he heard the man''s statement.

*Two months?*

*Bruce disappearance was two months ago. No no no! I have no way of knowing of the exact date, so I can''t have such baseless accusations*

"What amazed me the most is what he stole"

"I never heard what it is"

The bartender was done serving the drink of Cyrus and put it at the table and he said sternly.

"A revolver"

Cyrus felt a chill run down his spine. Sweat ran across his face. Expression so pale to be recognized as alive.

"Did you recover it?"

The man asked to the bartender. 

"Yes, there''s one missing bullet in the Cylinder. The kid must''ve killed someone"

"......."

Cyrus covered his mouth with his right hand.

*Two months ago, a revolver was stolen from this bar. It lost a bullet from the cylinder which could possibly be used by Bruce to presumably fake his death and later was recovered by the bartender because the kid was caught by an officer*

This instant second, he felt fear.

*This is far too coincidental!!!!!*',
                        1
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        8,
                        'Introduction',
                        'Intro: I left my mom 
In a certain certain surface around the jungle where most of the animals surrounds in there, there lies a giant legendary bright tree that lives three centuries.

It even has story that it gives live on whoever goes inside the tree and drink the yellow green liquid.

It''s legend is known that it became a myth for people.

Year 2059

"Hey! Gian it''s time to go to your university school"

"mmgh" 

I stretch my arms and bend my back a bit while my eyes are still close tight

I got up from the bed go to the bath. 

After I finished taking a bath I take my uniform from the closet. 

Got out of my room and start heading to downstairs. 

And saw my mom preparing our dishes for both of us. 

Fresh smell of meat runs to my nostrils. 

I take my seat in the chair starts digging in the food with mom in front of me

I''m Gian Salderist 18 years old only child and my mom here with me is the only family I have left. 

"hey Gian" 

"hm?" 

My mom called out to me while we''re eating. 

"did you got a girlfriend?" 

"pfrgh" 

I almost cough out what''s inside my mouth I''m glad I prevent it by forcing it to close

"no" 

I''m unfortunately single in my life 

"I see, mom here is hoping that I can help you plan on your wedding plan" 

She looked down in her thigh in dissatisfied expression. 

"mom I''m still in school" 

How did she come to conclusions that I''ll get married when I can''t even have a woman.

I hastily eat my food I might be late to school if I waste my time here.

"your bag''s in the cushion, your lunch pack is already inside it"

She point out a finger targeting where it is.

I take my bag and go straight to the door in front of me

"take care son"

I left my mom hearing those words from her and dash out to the house running.
Even if I just got eat breakfast I can run fast enough as to not make my stomach throb.
The road is or rather the whole world is branch caused by the legendary tree in a jungle, there are still building and houses around it above from the branch. 

Some workers from the past tried to cut it but it was so thick like a unbreakable shield so the government have no choice but to embrace the whole new world. 
I better run for my life now or I''ll be late.

I finally see my school gate in front of me that is not close yet, thank God it''s not late time.
I can''t waste any time and I ran again straight to the school gate and stop there for a bit catching my breathe the moment I entered.

"Yo"

A familiar voice of a guy in my back puts his arm patting my shoulder

This guy''s name is Warren Recker a cheerful casual idiot friend of mine.

"did you watch the movie I recommend you?" 

"nopeace bro, I''m busy doing the assignment" 

"oh shit!" 

Warren put both of his hands in his hair gripping it. 

Don''t tell me that this idiot is

"dude, can you let me copy yours? Teach will get mad at me"

HE asked

"wouldn''t teach get more mad if you copy though?" 

I couldn''t help but grin at him being hopeless

"pls it''s a secret between us" 

HE clasped his hand and bow his head in front of me

I put my folded index finger on my chin pretending to think but still grinning. 

"what if I don''t want to?" 

His eyes went wide from surprised and despaired face 

I pat his hair and shake it to break his hairstyle and walk to the classroom 

"come on, prepare to be scolded by teach" 

I wish I could continue my tease on him but I don''t like wasting time. 

He beams smile of happiness and go to my side walking along with me. 
"thanks bro but pls don''t tell teach" 

Even I can feel how painful it is to be scold by that strict teacher. 

I open the door of our room and speaking of the devil. 

That strict teacher is already here before both of us but it looks like she isn''t starting the class yet because she''s just sitting in the room looking at some files she''s holding. 

She''s Marice Arion the most feared teacher in the school that even the principal have to be formal with her and the student won''t dare talk back to her unless she''s asking question. 

Despite her outstanding beauty there lies a menacing beast inside. 

"Salderist, Recker, you guys are 12 minutes early before the class starts" 

She knows we''re already here even when she''s still looking at the file and know what time it is without even a watch. 

Yup she''s really a beast, calculative one at that. 

"bro what should I do?" 

Warren whispered me from the back. 

"huh?" 

"I can''t copy your answers now that our teach is here" 

"all I can say to you Warren is, condolence" 

The circumstances left me no choice but to leave my comrade in arm even when he looks like he''s about to cry. 

"who''s doing what to whom now?" 

A serious scary voice is heard in our side

The two of us sync from flinching our body. 

"you two go to my office after school for attempt of cheating and don''t try to escape if you don''t want me to make it worse, especially you Recker" 
Both of us are doomed or should I be glad that I''m less punished? Anyway rest in peace Warren it''s nice to know you. 

(Marevick Salderist POV) 

I just finish shopping from the grocery store holding some plastic bag full of food in it. 

I cross path with a couple holding tight each other

Young people these days are adorable. 

I can''t help but got reminded how my son react when I ask if he have a girlfriend 
It appears there are still no girls that notices my boy''s charm. 

If there are then they have my full support if my son also have a spark in that girl
I open the gate in front of my house

I''m about to enter my house but I saw a brown stray dog in front of my house sitting sitting. 

Would Gian like to have a dog as a pet? 

I would gladly adopt this dog if he wants me to

I come closely to it trying to touch its fur when he looks at me about to cry
Or so I thought

"grrrck" 

"aaahh!!" 

I instantly fall back from sudden shock. 

W-what just happen? 

The cute dog I thought it was starts growling showing its sharp triangular teeth drooling 

The dog shakes its whole body and his fur became a little spike blade

I tried to walk back using my palm because I can''t stand up in my sit because of fear of what''s in front of me. 

"no please spare me, I have food here you can have it pls" 
I tried to convince the dog but it looks like he''s looking at me like a prey

"no! I still haven''t-" 

"graahh!" 

It jumps high right straight to me

"seen my son become a groom" 

(Gian Salderist''s POV) 

The school is finally over I sigh in exhaustion or at least less exhausted than this guy beside me who practically looks like a zombie now. 

I''m only giving a punishment of reportation the topic of class which I''m used to while he''s punishment is like a sole janitor for the whole 2 days. 

"you better learn your lesson now Warren" 

"I will definitely gonna answer the assignment starting now" 

He said with zero energy 

"you better be" 

I smile at him

"shut up" 

"oh, the cheerful Warren is now angry~" 

"let''s just go home pal" 

Oopsie looks like I crossed the line I shouldn''t be. 

"sorry" 

"it''s fine it''s my fault that you got involve anyway so I''m the one who''s sorry" 

"Gian!!"

Some guy running into me calling my name.

That guy is from our neighborhood I remember.

"what is it?"

"yo-your mother"

I freeze the moment he brought my mother into the topic.

"she she''s"

The guy is still panting from running that he can''t speak properly but my heart is beating fast.

I instinctively just run ignoring my friend and the guy

"hey Gian!" 

No no way right? 

Please let my assumptions be wrong 

There''s just no way my mom is sick! 

I keep running and running like I''m on a marathon race

Time I''m finally in the house made me unable to believe of what I saw. 

My mom wasn''t sick, my mom is just laying there outside of the house sleeping with red liquid on her clothes that is on her belly and also from her shoulder. 

Heh! So she''s just sleeping huh

Seriously mom why are you sleeping here outside of our house? 

I can hear Warren coming from my back and Pause for a bit when he see my mom

He pats me in the shoulder his head deep down

"I''m sorry" 
"hah? What are you sorry about, my mom is just sleeping there, come on help me carry her to the house" 

I come close to my mom and tried to carry her with Warren but

Warren is just Standing there from the place where he pats my shoulder looking at me about to cry. 

Don''t tell me that he feels sorry of himself for being punished by our teach? 

"Gian" 

"what?" 

For some reason I don''t want to hear what he''s about to say 
No please don''t say it please don''t! 
I hug my mom tightly her head latch in my chest

"your mom is already gone"
',
                        2
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        9,
                        'Chapter 1',
                        'In my silent dark normal room lights from the curtain of the window coming from the outside I just sit in my bed where I simply got woke up.

"Gian! it''s time for breakfast!!" 

I can hear my mom''s voice from the outside of this room. 

I stretch my body to wake it up and got up from the bed.

I opens the door and start heading down. 

I saw my mom''s back getting the food ready from the table of just two chair facing each front. 

I sit and was about to dig in on the food but
"Gian" 

I look up from my mom and freeze with shiver because of what I saw. 
"did you got a girlfriend?" 

Her eyes are not seen but it''s open completely dark and dripping with blood like tears 
Her shoulders and belly are making her clothes wet from red liquid 

I attempt to look away and looks at the plate from the table but it only made me more creep out. 

It was an intestine filled with blood and notice my hands holding some of it. 

"no NOOO!!!!" 

"Gian! Wake up!" 

I just opened my eyes suddenly with shock. 

I see a same ceiling but a different atmosphere like just a minute ago of what I''ve seen. 
I see Warren from beside the bed where I lay down sitting on the floor worried expression. 

"your having a nightmare dude" 
I sigh in relief. 
I see, so it''s just a dream huh. Of course its only a dream. 
There''s no way I would''ve seen my mom standing like a zombie full of her blood dripping open. 
I sit down from the bed

"so, Warren" 

"hm?"

"have you seen my mom?" 

Warren looks at me silently for a moment and shift his gaze away from me afterwards I see him biting his lips bitter face. 

"Gian" 

Warren is facing me but his eyes are down

"what?" 

For some reason it made my heart race a bit
"your mom is long dead" 

"noo!!!" 

I panicked and shouted at him subconsciously

"she died yesterday after you fainted" 

No no no 

I grip the both side of my hair tightly like I wanted it to seperate from my body. 
My mind is remembering exactly what happened, me holding her tightly seeing her not waking up and seeing her own blood in my own eyes
My breathing is like I''m on my limit at running fast. 

"Gian!" 

Warren shakes my arm to snap me out of it and it makes me calm a bit. 
I look down and just ask him on low tone

"can you leave me alone for a while?" 

Warren complied and silently walks straight to the door. 
After he opens it he looks at me a second and leave close the door
I was just here staring down blank at my blanket, after a few seconds I couldn''t hold it anymore. 
I put a palm on my one eye to cover it crying it all out endless tears coming from my eyes. 
memories of her coming to my mind wishing it will come back actually. 
But I know it won''t and never will come back because she- she''s not here with me anymore.
That mom of mine handled me since my birth, we ain''t rich but she manage to support me alone.
Now that she''s not around anywhere anymore, who would support me? What should I do now? Is there even something worthy to do?
I keep wondering these question in my mind and so on while it my heart is always throbbing in pain.
After some time I got out of the bed and step out of the room I saw Warren sitting and leaning on the wall just beside the door.

"you okay now?" 

"I don''t know" 

I responded with no energy coming out

"I see" 

Warren stands up

"just take your time to accept it it may be impossible to do it but, I''m here for you to have a shoulder to lean on" 

My mouth quivers, I bit it to force myself not to cry again.

"thanks but don''t you ever belittle me Mr janitor" 

I manage to put a sincere smile on my face

"don''t act tough you crybaby" 

Warren pats my arm

"shut up" 

"hehe" 

We''re just about to go down until 

"Aaaaaaaaahhhh!!!!" 

We hear loud scream coming from outside
We look at each other in curiosity and starts heading down fast wanting to know what''s happening 
After heading down and opens the door to the outside. 
We are both speechless and like a statue standing by what we see right now. 

"waaaaaah!!!" 

A lot of people are running around screaming with terror being chased by something many unnatural beings. 

"no don''t kill me please" 

There was something that looks like a cat but big size of a human claws like a lion scratching people fast. and a eagle flying around but everytime it flaps its wings it throws something sharp and stab it to people to death. Or even a alligator walking with two feet eats a person whole to his big mouth. 
There were many like others and different kinds but nevermind that. 
They are all begging for their lives to be spared by these unknown creatures. 
Blood gushing out everywhere we look . 
How I wish this is merely a dream but I instinctively know it isn''t a dream. 
What we see right now is like witnessing an end to the world',
                        2
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        10,
                        'Chapter 2',
                        'Chapter 2: ANNIHILATOR 
Fires spreading in chaos, chaos spreading like fire. 
Expressions of people are solely that of a deep deep pit of despair when they saw a lot of incomprehensible creatures taking their lives slowly but surely to make them agonize beyond excruciating pain. They''ve been given a chance to run that they think they could get away safely while it was just a mere trap that the animals creates to have more preys for themselves. 

The two of us just stand in terror shaky legs that we can barely stand up anymore. 

"caaaw!" 

A thing above on our side just lashed at us fast

"whoa!" 

I step back barely dodge and got my butt kissing the ground. 
I am looking at what was that thing that just goes at us like a spear being thrown. 
..... 
I don''t know what is ''that'' 
It was a big bird with black feathers 4 wings 2 each sides the mouth is point sharp like a harpoon red eyes chicken-like legs. 
I don''t know if that''s called a ''crow'' or ''raven'' when the appearance is like that.

"caaaaaw!!"

It spread its wings wide shouting now it dash at us having its mouth point at us.

"Gian let''s go"

Warren grabs my arm to lift me up.
We both runs straight back to the house fast.
I instantly closes the door and lock it. 

"haa haa, what in the hell of the world is going on?" 

"like I know haa" 

I am walking to the upstairs and Warren follows. Until we hear an thud and crack sound coming from the door, it got pierced by something thin and sharp. 
We know what that is
We run straight to my room door locks and is covered by cabinet and we pick some wood leaning on the wall that we could use as weapon against that thing. 
I''m making a stance to fight holding the wood both of my hands tightly even if my hands are trembling with fear and deep breathe to calm my racing heart a bit. 
Warren did the same and we simply wait in silence expecting that it would come. 
After some time it still didn''t made its entrance. 
It was kinda weird for me. 

[krsssshh!!] 

A loud sound coming from behind me, I look at it and fragments of glass from my window scattered broken and
The bird came right at me fast having its mouth point at me.
I tried to block it using the wood but its thickness is weak that it just got split into two after being pierce by that mouth and it stabs me on my left chest. 
It knew that we''re on guard of the door so it chose to invade on the window instead. 

"Gian!"

Warren dashes and hits the bird on its head and was thrown a bit. It got its mouth away from me 
The bird glares on scorn eyes and scream 

"CAAAAAAAA!!!!" 

"grrgh" 

We both covered our ears tight in pain
Its scream on close distance is seriously a ear-splitting one 
It now dashes at Warren 

"aah for god sake" 
Warren swing his wood vertically and hits the bird again on the head

"you''re annoying!!" 

Whoa! 

Since when did this guy work out to have such a strength? 
The bird still stands up again and flaps its wing towards us and pulls us away on great force of wind that we collide with the wall hard. 

"ugh"

I feel my back bone throbbing because of great sore muscle and its heavy to lift it myself. 
I lift my head to look
I notice that the bird is looking at me sharply. 
Even I instinctively know what''s its purpose. 
He''s aiming to target me first who is a weak one. 
Looks like I''m in a very bad situation right now. 
The bird is taking its stance to sprint aiming its mouth at me
It now jumps straight approaching me with his mouth wide open a little many sharp triangular teeth is shown.
Its gonna eat me, I''m gonna die. 

"Gian!!" 

Time seems to go slow 

[grshh] 

In a situation where time stopped for a moment. 
Warren just stands there mouth opens
I just wondered why. 
And until it came to my realization of what happened. 
I notice my hand is inside the bird''s mouth dripping with blood while I hold something. 
I stabbed it or more like pierced it using the broken wood. 
I slowly got my hand out on its mouth and the bird falls on the floor. 

"holy shit, Gian" 

I look at my hand full of blood and ask myself this

"what''d I done?" 
Even if I know what I did, I still asked it to myself. 
While in deep thoughts I can hear some cracks on the wood that it feels like something is coming up towards here. 

"oh God give me a break" 

Warren said so but. 
I can see it''s paws and it now climb to the window and stands right in front of us. 
It''s a cat human sized and a large claws on its paws.
I don''t know if that should be cute or creepy.

"myaaaa"

It now begins to try to scratch me

"aaaaaahh!"

[boom] 

I heard something like an explosion
I looks and saw the cat''s belly is seen a hole. 
It falls to the floor loudly due to its big size. 
Warren and I looks at the one in front of us
It was a man about in his twenty in a deep blue suit riding something like a board floating holding a big pistol 

"you two did a good job"

It winks at us and left
It left with the two of us in awe at him',
                        2
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        11,
                        'Chapter 3',
                        'Massacre spread around our hometown that the citizen of our place got killed by many things that looks like an animal.
But there are some that fight against it, it''s the group of people that uses a floating board to fly and a gun and sword on their hands.
It''s a complete war.
Slashing, biting, scratching, shooting, eating all over the place to be seen.
Time passes and the people in board won but with various casualties on their side.
No one among them celebrated the victory, but instead puts the people''s remain who passed away on a big bag.
The guy who saved us approach us with a tired face. Completely different from him minutes ago. A fresh wound is visible on his cheek. 
Ah, I got to thank him for saving us.

"Uhm"

"Are there any who survived except you two?"

He asked

"Ah, uhh. I don''t know"

"I see, get on board"

"Huh?"

"We''re transporting you to our airship. this ground has been annihilated by those animals. and if we found someone that survived aside from you two we''ll keep them there for safety"

"Uhhh"

I''m still processing of what he''s saying

"it seems you guys are still injured so we''ll be treating your wounds when we get there"

"How do we get there?"

Warren asked

The man adjusted his leg a bit and the board expanded that fits just for us three.
Whoa 

"Hop in"

Both of us paused for a minute and jumps on the board.
Our feet got locked from where we''re standing, maybe this is to prevent falling even if you lose balance. This is amazingly made
The man now moves upward alongside his fellow who are all injured. 
I''ve looked back at the town and still see my mom and the people in there who are already dead.
My years of memories in there are so good and it just got shattered in a mere hour.
I tightened the bite of my mouth to prevent the tears from falling
Goodbye guys, goodbye mom

"It really must be frustrating huh"

I shift at my gaze upwards looking at the man bit taller than me.

"You guys must have friends and families there who''s killed by those beings"

I remembered my mom''s corpse when he said that.
So the one who''ve killed my mom is one of those things huh.

"I have a proposal for you two"

Both of us look at him
I''m trying to hold something inside of me to not show it on my face.

"Why don''t you join our group?"

The man has just given me opportunity that I wanted.

"I''ve seen you two kill that bird, you''ve shown me you are definitely capable of it. So, you in?"

I clench my fist hard steeled my resolve and thought 
This is my chance

"Yes!"

The man looks at Warren

"How about you, boy?"

"....."

Warren looks down

"..I can''t"',
                        2
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        12,
                        'Chapter 4',
                        '"I can''t"

after warren said that it became silent of a sudden

"I see"

the man said.
well, i couldn''t blame him. after what we saw just now would trigger a fear of not wanting to join.
i just wanted to join for one purpose, and that''s to kill the being that killed my mom.
a few seconds pass a shade covered ourselves, and i look above to see a massive machine airship. it''s opening a circle triangular rotation beneath large enough to get many people inside.
We got inside of the ship and got amaze of what''s inside it

"Welcome to the 26th Annihilator''s basement"

It''s like a big place of advance technology.
There''s mechanics who are forging sword like swordsmith with unique features of mechanism and making guns with the bullets are not there but batteries instead.
There''s lot of men and women having a light spar using their fist.

"Hey, are they aliens of some sort?"

Warren said, I wonder what he meant by it and look at the direction he''s looking.
It shocked my life away. It''s absolutely something you''ve seen from a movies
There were people who are floating without the board and breaks things without even actually touching it and some are having their body like it has a large pierce of spike.
There are people looking at them holding a kind of document, looks like a observer.
anyway, what in the hell are they?

"No, they simply got experimented to become weapons themselves"

The guy said

"Huh? ain''t that cruel?"

"They volunteered themselves of it"

Would someone be even willing to??

"SIR, WELCOME TO YOUR RETURN!"

A guy instantly just come at us and bows to the man

"Ahaha, thanks. by the way this boys needs treatment of their wounds. take them to the doctor"

"Ah, ok sir"

"Boys, this man will guide you the way"

He said to us

"T-thank you"

Me and Warren passes through him

The man walks forward to guide us, I look at my behind to face him and said

"Thanks for saving us"

Bow to him, Warren did also but bit late and just slight one
Ow my wound hurts

"Hurry up now young man or you''ll die just because you bowed to me"

The man waves his hand with a smile

"Sounds like you''re a survivor from a war"

Can we be called a survivor when it''s just a luck that we got saved in time?

"That man''s name is Bracer Rick, this ship''s captain and the guy who just saved your butt. And I''m Alfred, no need to know the last name. and you two?"

"Gian Salderist" "Warren Recker"

"I have a feeling that you two will be joining this group, is it?"

"No, only me. Warren won''t join"

"Hmm, I see. Well, We''re here now"

The guy opens the door

So this is the clinic room. looks just like a normal hospital but, the patients lying full of blood won''t make it seem like one 
All of them are sleep from rest

"What are you doing?"

A nasty woman''s tone just came to my ears

"Sit down here"
"Ah"

It was a woman about in her 20''s white skin and dark blue hair in a nurse suit

"Sit Down!"

"HIEEEK"

This nasty tone reminded me of my teacher and we both just sit down in front of her

"We''ll start the treatment of you two right away"

"oh, ohm"

20 minutes later

We came out of the room dead, our injuries weren''t fatal so we manage to walk just fine

"Haaaah, if that''s how injuries are treated then I don''t want to get one from now on"

Warren seems deadlier than I am

"Seems you boys are done getting treated now huh"

Alfred was besides us waiting

"I''ll show you your room"

We just silently follow his back

"This is it"

We finally reached our room

"This is for Gian and this one''s for Warren"

We are seperated 4 room space

"Now rest easy now. By the way Gian, I have a question for you"

"Hmm?"

I turned back before I just touch the doorknob of my room and Warren just went Inside

"Since you will be joining us soon, I have to ask you to choose between the two"

"What is it"

"YOU WANT TO TRAIN OR GET EXPERIMENTED?"',
                        2
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        13,
                        'Chapter 5',
                        '"Want to train or get experimented?"

"Huh?"

"You don''t have to answer that right away. Pick one when you''re ready"

After 2 days pass of me recovering my wounds at my room resting I still haven''t decided.
Normally, I would choose to train but that what that guy said made me hesitate

"Both trainings are at the risk of losing your lives, so you just gonna choose what''s your preference of dying"

Was that a threat?
Is there something in training than just a physical exercise?
And naturally getting experimented would be a risk enough to kill me and I don''t even know how will they do it.
It made me hesitate.
......

"Haaaah, fine I choose this one"

Week and 3 days pass that I''ve recovered my injuries.
I got out of my room and looks beside to see if Warren is there.
His door is close, maybe still sleeping and recovering.
I walk on a patrol and coincidentally met the person I wanted to meet.
It''s Alfred.
He noticed my presence

"Yo Gian, finally recovered it seems"

"Haha, not fully yet though"

I just recovered enough that it doesn''t hurt if I touch the wound but it''s still bit open

"So"
He looks at me seriously now

"You decided now?"

He ask
I steeled my resolve even without knowing what''s the risk will I have to face.
There will be no hesitation this time.
This is what I decided to do
This is for the goal of kill the being that killed my mom and to keep Warren alive and safe

"I want to train sir"

"Ok, it starts next tomorrow"

"Huh? That late?"

"You''re still not fully recovered, rest up and be ready mentally cause it will be hellish training"

I guess he''s just being considerate

"Uhh ok"

"I''m looking forward to your training"

"Thank you sir"

I bowed my head to him

"No need to call me that, just Alfred is fine"

"...ok"

I raised my head and walk away with a wave
I wonder what Warren is doing right now
Tomorrow pass

(Warren''s POV)

I''m here in my room sitting at the bed thinking of what happened that day like it was just yesterday.
All those monsters eating a person is still engraved inside my memory.
And how Gian killed that bird still gives me chill. Maybe that was just his instinct to fight back.
And now there''s even people with supernatural powers like what I''ve seen in movies.
There''s still many things I have to process rather than recovering my wounds.
While I''m thinking of this, there''s a hinge on my door opening it.
Is it Gian? Alfred?

"Hello"

Ah, its Bracer.

"Hello sir"

I shouldn''t forget to be formal as he''s the man that saved my life and also the captain of this ship.
He comes in with a smile and closes the door

"What is it, Sir?"

"I have something to talk to you about Warren"

"Hmm?"

He sits down beside me on the bed with a sigh

"Ahh. The bed really feels nice after work"

Looks like he''s relieving his stress out

"What is it you want to talk about Sir?"

He looks at me seriously

"Gian will start training tomorrow"

Ah, I see. 

I looked down at the floor
So he''s really joining. Well, I can''t force him when his mother died. He''s probably after revenge.

"He will die"

"Huh?"

I instantly looks back at him when he said that

"Not in the training probably, but he''ll soon face war that not anyone could survive"

"Wait, what are you talking abo-?"

"You know what I''m talking about after what you witnessed 2 weeks ago"

"..."

I stayed silent

"At this rate, Gian will definitely die at war before he knows it"

It lefts me upset with confusion

Gian will die? How am I supposed to cope that one

"... What should I do?"

"Join us"

Bracer Said

"Huh?"

"I want you to join to protect Gian. You guys are bestfriend right?"

".... But I''m afraid to battle those monsters"

I bit my mouth out of fear

"Everyone is afraid, even me"

I look at Bracer

"How do you handle it?"

I ask

Bracer pause for a few seconds and opens his mouth

"By accepting the fact that you''ll eventually die and fight to the fullest strength"

"Heh. What''s with that saying, doesn''t motivate me at all"

"It doesn''t have to"

"...."

I give some thoughts on my mind and decided 

"Ok"

If I can protect my friend even a little bit then I will walk the depth of damnation if that''s what it takes.

"There''s two types and you''re gonna pick one before you will be officially become one of us"

"What is it?"

"You wanna train or get experimented?"

Far as I remember, getting experimented will give you an supernatural powers. and training is like those with strong physique who can match those beings as Bracer is obviously one of being trained. and what else is

"Gian picked training right?"

"Apparently, yes"

It''s decided then

"Get me experimented"',
                        2
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        14,
                        'Chapter 6',
                        '(Warren Recker''s POV)

In a dark green laboratory lots of coffin that looks like a capsule and unknown chemicals inside of it. Scientist at the side transparent mirror that can easily monitor someone.
Meanwhile Bracer is on my back talking a scientist inside the lab.
I looked at them and they seemed to be done talking and the scientist approach me.
He looks like a young man still on his early 20s wearing eyeglasses a bit of eyebags underneath his eyes.

"Nice to meet you Warren, I''m Allen"

"Uh, me too"

I greeted back in return.

"Hmm, you look like you''re not afraid. Are you even aware of what you will go through? What you might feel? What might be the risk?"

He said in a thornful tone.
Of course I''m afraid. I will go through some intense suffering here that I wanna take back of what I said.
But letting Gian go through it alone is not something I can swallow.

"I''m aware, Sir"

I said it with resolve but my hands and legs are trembling 

"That''s why I''m gonna do it"

"Hmm, you are energetic than I expected"

I''m energetic? I could collapse for any second here.

"But that will be gone once its done boy, I warn that to you"

You''re scaring me with that warning

"Are you really sure you wanna go through it?"

I close my eyes for few seconds and think to my self «there''s no going back for me» and open it.

"Yes sir!"

"Come follow me then"

2 hours later

(Gian Salderist''s POV)

My training starts tomorrow huh.

I was patrolling the ship and damn this is a amazing technogy. all foods are answered and nice baths are guaranteed and fancy clothes are everywhere.
As I was patrolling, I saw a familiar person.
Its Warren.
I came to rush to him
I slapped his back

"Ow"

"Dude, where have you been?"

"uhh, just walking around"

he said it in low voice

I look at him and he''s somewhat pale.

"What happened dude? not used to this place yet?"

"No, I already am. This is an amazing place actually"

He said with bit of smile.

"So, you''re training starts tomorrow huh"

"I guess so, I''m quite nervous dude"

"...Good Luck"

Warren just turn his back and walk away with that.

Tomorrow Starts

I go to the place that Alfred and I have agreed on.

And saw his presence just few meters.

he see me too

"yo"

"Hi, Alfred"

"Pshh"

He raise his index finger at me 

"This time, Adress me as «sir»"

"Yes Sir"

he smiles and puts his hand on his hips

"So, are you ready now? you can back out if you want to"

he grins at me

"No, I don''t want to turn back now Sir"

"Are you sure?"

"Yes sir!"

"Attaboy, now come in from this door. this will be where your training starts"

he grabs the door and opens it as it gives a hinging sound so is my racing heart.
I give a deep breath and take a step from entering.
this will be the first step of getting revenge of my mother.
I do hope they will come easy at me.

"I hope you''ll live"

huh?
Alfred kicks my butt and I entered inside. I fell of the ground on my knee
oww that hurts, I scratches my butt.
What''s wrong with him? I''ll get him next time.
But before that I take a look at my surroundings and it colors me surprise.
Its a full white room that I can''t get to know where this ends.
This is where I will train?
I''ll get mental sickness if I stay here for long.

"Hello"

A female voice comes from my side, I shift my gaze at her.
A beautiful snow skin woman with black hair and eyeglasses wearing blue suit.

"I''m Janna Frelind, I''ll be your training partner or you could say mentor"

"n-nice to meet you too, I''m Gi-"

"Gian Salderist"

ah She knows me

"I''ve heard of you from Bracer"

"I see.... Anyway looking forward train-"

a gush of wind rush fast to me
it pushes me to the wall hard
a massive impactful sound from my back.

"agh"

I''m still stucked in the wall like I''m glued.

"Let''s start right away"

She said as her hand is facing towards me
She''s doing it?
She''s experimented???
A few seconds pass she lets go
I fall to my knees having struggles to breath.
Is this training or torture?
1 hour later.
I got out of the door fully beaten up, bruises from my body.
haaaa haaaaa
I lived. I lived. I lived!! 

"Still willing to continue?"

Alfred was beside the door leaning the wall arm crossed.

"you were watching?"

"monitoring you would be more professional way of saying it"

I don''t even have energy left to be angry at him

"good job on surviving the first day"

Alfred whispered

I walked slowly

"Gian? Is that you dude? I barely even recognize you"

I see Warren in front of me.

He''s more pale than Ever

"you''re more unrecognizable bro"

I slowly fall into the ground closing my eyes.

Tomorrow Comes
I wake up from the familiar ceiling where I usually wake up from.
This is my room.
No one is here
I slowly get up. my body still throb a bit from pain that I''m surprise I manage to move when I just got tort- I mean trained hard by that Woman.
I opened my door and saw Warren walking
He''s seriously pale right now

"Hey, Warren"

I try to reach out to him

He looks at me with scorn eyes.

"Do I know you?"',
                        2
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        15,
                        'Chapter 7',
                        'In the White Room
(Gian Salderist''s POV)
A massive force is pulling me back into the wall gluing me to it.
A throbbing Pain in my back occurs 

"gh"
10 seconds pass I''m finally free from getting stucked on the wall, I always got out of breath even if its just a mere few seconds.

"You did kill one of those monsters, but a second one won''t be the same when you''re still like that on your knees giving your head out to your enemy"

As I was in my knee struggling to breath my mentor was in front of me about 14 meters away.
I create a surprise rush at her.
and she just steb back and runs away from me. and she''s freaking fast.
Damn it!!
(Yesterday)

"Do I know you?"

That shocked me a bit.

"Nice joke dude, come on."

I tried to pat his shoulder but it freezes me of what he showed to me
A sharp blade is just a few inches from getting to my neck.
What shocked me isn''t the blade but where the blade came from.
Its on his arm.
A blade''s on his arm starting from his elbow to his hand and it still has a tip after it goes through the hand.

"Wa-Warren, What is this? this joke isn''t good bro"

"I don''t know who you are and how you know me but don''t ever get friendly with me"

"Dude! its me Gian, Get a fucking grip of yourself!!!"

I wasn''t afraid of the blade but furios at him.
He push the blade that I''ll be dead if I move my neck forward.

"I said.. I don''t know who you are"

"...You were expereminted aren''t you? you said that you won''t join, Did they force you!?"

"I don''t know what you''re talking about but no one forces me to do something, and even the killing"

He looks at me with scary eyes.
..............
He changed.
The Warren I once know is gone.
He now puts the blade away from me and the blade gets inside of his arm.

"I regret thinking that I could protect you and I could revenge my mother''s death."

"You really do talk like you know me but no you don''t and I don''t know you or your mother"

he keeps talking that he really don''t remember me. and all that I''ve been thinking is to protect him and avenge my mom. 
but now that also has change

"now all that''s in my mind is to avenge my mother, nothing more nothing less"

"good luck on that."

"forget we ever talked right now"

I turned my back on him to go on a grocery and we walked seperate ways.

(Present time)

I keep trying to catch her back but she''s always faster.
its like the more I''m trying to get near her the more she gets further.
this keeps going and then she stops and looks at me serious face.
wait I''m not ready yet
She raises her hand towards me
And then I got pulled back strongly back to the wall stuck again. 
Janna Frelind is an experimented woman who can pull object and beings in whatever her hand directs it to.
the pattern of this training is that in every 2 minutes I have to get to catch her while she''s running. and every two minutes pass and I didn''t achieve the goal, she pulls me using her ability back to the wall suffocating me for 10 seconds. I do this in 2 days straight duration of 1 hour and 1 day rest.
I do think she''s a beautiful woman but ain''t she a bit too cruel towards me?
A flower has thorns as they say.
10 seconds pass and she lets go.
it''s still making me struggle to breath

"two minutes is starting Gian"

but I have no time to rest right now.
I immediately got up and runs towards her
I have to avenge my mother.

"You''re doing good"
She smiles at me.',
                        2
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        16,
                        'Chapter 8',
                        '(Janna Frelind''s POV)
In the dark room where I lay down on side, A throbbing excruciating pain at the side of my stomach a dripping blood keeps pouring while I hold tight of it. In front me, there lies a man holding a knife with blood at the tip of it

"You''re a big failure of a woman!!!" 

I slowly open my eyes regaining my conciousness seeing a ceiling of light.
I''m dreaming of that again huh
I''m touching the right side of my stomach.
It hurts.
No pain was phyiscally felt but I can still feel the hurt inside my mind whenever I touch it.
I got up from my bed to go take a bath and start cooking.
It''s been three weeks since I trained Gian
So far, he''s made improvement so little. Well, I had the advantage to begin.
He''s doing good for being able to stay this long.
I better go train that kid again in a few days but I must add new rule to our training system

(Gian Salderist''s POV)
It has been three weeks since I started training and my trainer Janna gives me a 5 days break and I haven''t talk to Warren these days as he keeps ignoring me.
I have only 2 days left of break and my pain is still with me a bit.
I often saw Alfred doing some mechanic fixing and when he saw me, he always gives me a smirk mocking me a bit.
I haven''t seen Bracer these days, must have been a busy dude. Well, he''s the captain of this after all.
I am currently on a patrol through grocery from the ship.

"Excuse me Ms. I want a Carrot and a Potato pls"

"Coming right up Sir"

I''m planning for a curry this day
The woman starts putting the carrot and potato in a plastic bag and hands it out to me

"it''ll be .8 dollar sir"

"here"

I''m almost out of money right now.

"you''re quite beaten up sir, what happened?"

She ask

"This was just from training"

"oh! sorry Sir"

"it''s nothing and my trainer was actually-"
"A noodle pls"

A familiar feminine voice is heard beside me, I froze when I heard it
I slowly shift my gaze towards the direction of the voice.
A silky black short hair wing length and snow white skin.
It''s Janna.
she turns towards me
I immediately rotate my face to the opposite direction.

"oh, Gian"

Shit, she recognize me

"how''s your break? enjoying it?"

"ah, uhh I''m fine as it is"

"here''s the noodles Ms. it''ll be .2 dollar only"

"here"

she gives the money

"thank you"

I remembered all the pain that I felt when I heard her voice. Like all of it came through me at once.

"Is that what you would eat?"

She ask

"I don''t have much money left so"

"oh ok"

She took out her wallet
and pulls out a few dollars from it

"Here you go, that''s 30 dollars"

She hands it out towards me

"wa- wait, I can''t accept that"

"I''m your mentor, my job is to train you and assures you that you get to live safe until my job''s done"
"......"

I''m left speechless and after a few second I just accepted it slowly with grattitude.

"Thank you"

I guess the flower has a nice scent despite the thorny vines
She''s only harsh to me when she trains to me.

"Be ready for next two days soldier"

"Yes Ms.!"

"I''ll be heading my way now, see ya"

She waves her hand at me.
I just watch her as her figure dissapear in my sight.

"Heeey Giaan!!!"

Alfred calls out to me running and leans his arm into my shoulder.
It hurts a bit when he touch my shoulder.
he''s still trying to catch his breath

"what''s up with you?"

"Gian, do you know what day will it be tommorow?"

"nope, I don''t"

today''s date is January 23 is there a special event on the 24th? If so then I don''t know what it is.

"What? you''ve been together for 3 weeks and you don''t know what day will it be tomorrow?"

"Wait, what are you talking about?"

Alfred sighs

"It''s Janna''s Birthday tomorrow"',
                        2
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        17,
                        'Chapter 9',
                        '"It''s Janna''s Birthday Tomorrow"

"wait, really?"

I''m still processing of what''s happening

"yeah dude, I thought you''d know. Anyway, I''m planning to have a birthday celebration party"

I couldn''t remember anything that she told me aside from the training thing and stuff.
We barely even talked and that talk is just her saying continuosly how weak I am even if she know she has the advantage to begin with.
I didn''t know that it''d be her birthday tomorrow.

"did you start proceeding to that plan of yours?"

"nope, it won''t start unless you will join"

huh?

"what do you mean?"

"you have the most important role in this"

"..continue"

I couldn''t help but listen

"ask her out on a date"

"........"

I''m sorry, what?

"I''m sorry, what?"

"Ask her out on a date"

"I heard you first time, what do you mean I should ask her out?"

"You need to distract her for us to start preparing"

"NO!!"

I said loudly

(Tomorrow Comes)

"So, What are we doing here Gian?"

"..."

This is awkward.

I can''t believe that I''ve gain the guts to ask her out!!

I gripped my hair from embarassment of this awkward atmosphere.

I''m even amaze to myself that I did it.

That shithead Alfred manipulated me into agreeing into it.

(Back into yesterday)

"Please Gian, for the sake of your handsome friend and also for your pretty mentor. Do it for us the good of all of us"

Back when we first met, I thought of you as a cool good looking dude. But now you look like just an abomination of a black orc to me.
I do think Janna looks like a beautiful flower though, but that flower has the sharpest thorn.

"And besides, Janna has been helping you not just in your training has she not?"

"......"

I couldn''t say anything back

I remembered the 30 dollars she gave me just a few minutes ago.

"I take that as a yes alright"

"..yeah, got it. I''ll help"

Just in case, I ain''t doing it for you. It''s my payback to Janna''s lil kindness.

"I love that you still have a good heart despite what you''ve been through bro"

"haa just tell me what to do SIR"

"ok, Soldier. Here''s my order to you" 

Alfred smiles

(Back to the present)

We''re currently inside the mall patrolling.
Alfred told me where Janna live and that time where I have to ask her out when I visited her room was so nerve-wrecking that I could collapse in any second that time. Now that we''re together in the mall triples my nervousness. I never actually expected that she''d agree.

Her only reason that she agree was

"I''m bored anyways so I''ll tag along with you"

Did she even know it''s her birthday today? or she knows but not the type to celebrate it.
Anyways the plan was that I distract her from getting inside of her house while Alfred and others will start the preparation inside her house to start the celebration.
In other words, this was just me stalling time for them.
Alfred said he needs me to at least to buy them 40 minutes.
The time today is 10:45
That means I must distract her atleast until 11:25.
While, I''m here I could buy my own present to her.
My own budget is merely 42 dollars including the 30 dollars she gave me yesterday.

"Are you prepared for tomorrow''s training Gian?"

I was just thinking of buying you a gift and you remind me of tomorrow''s training?

"umm I need a bit of time to rest so I guess not yet"

"oh, I see. By the way what were we doing here in the mall?"

"uhh, I want a companion of my shopping you see"

These question never stop flowing

"What about Warren? I heard you guys are friends"

"....."

A silence is created

"I- I don''t know who that is"

"I see, What Alfred told to me seems to be false huh"

I grit my teeth a bit hard out of frustration.

"So, what are you gonna buy?"

"uhh I still haven''t decided yet"

"What am I gonna do here then?"

"accompanying me?"

Janna sighs

time passes and I finally found something that might be good.
I picked it up.

"that''s what you''re gonna buy? looks expensive?"

"I think I can manage it"

"you sure?" 

Janna frowns her eyes doubting me.

"yeh"

I confidently said so.

(After Buying)

"haaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa"

"looks like you did manage to buy that one thing huh.... barely"

I already expected that it would be somehow expensive but not much that it would cost me almost all of my money.
The food they prepare better be delicious especially the cake.
We were walking towards her house
I take a look at the big clock from the side of the ship
its still 11:15
Shit, it''s still half an hour of time-stalling.
We''re already in the door of her house.
She gets closer to open it
This is bad

"Wait Janna!"

she stops a bit and turns her face to me
"what?"

she''s somewhat annoyed.
what topic would I choose
... 
I can''t think of anything!

"If you''ve nothing to say I''m coming in, see ya"

she now opens her door

"wait"

Sorry guys I failed you all.

the room was dark when she opens it

she switches the light and turn it on

A bunch of confetti are exploded
about 12 people surrounding her room including Alfred with food and cakes on the table
with a poster above said 

"HAPPY BIRTHDAY!!!"

....

Janna froze into seconds.
phew its a success.
She turns to me again

"did you plan this?"

"ah uhh no it was-"

"yes he planned this, because he wants to celebrate the birthday of his great trainer"

Alfred interrupts with a smirk

Fu*k you Alfred!

"I see"

she comes inside her house.
I just follow along too
A few seconds a silence is created
Janna just stood looking at them and the food.

(Janna Frelind''s POV)

13 People in my room came to celebrate my 19th birthday.
They all just look at me with smiles and clapping at me.
A cake and a bunch of delicious food is on my table.
I remembered all of my 18 years before I joined this group.
Are birthdays should be celebrated ? Because it''s different for me. Birthdays are just days we were born, nothing special to it I never celebrated it with anyone nor I celebrate my own.
So why are they here being happy just because it''s my birthday??

"Janna"

Gian Called out to me
He gives me something from his hand

"Happy birthday"

its a necklace with a pendant of circle with big letter J inside of it.
wait, this is what he bought from that mall.
he barely manage to buy it why''s he giving it to me?
I fluttered my heads out processing my mind

"wait, I can''t accept this. It''s too expensive"

"it''s a gift, pls accept it"
...
I just took it and wears it myself.
I never thought that a birthday would be like this. that it''d make me happy
I almost let the water from my eyes drop but I swipe it off.
I can see all twelve of them smirking at us.

"hey, am I the only one who has a gift for her?"

Gian said

all came to be speechless

"we were busy preparing"

"bunch of idiots"

"it''s fine Gian, they made this food anyway"

Alfred said so
"oh speaking of food, do you have a candle and lighter right now?"

"yes"

"then we better start right through it"

"ok"

They put a candle above the cake and lights it up.

"ok guys sing!!"

"Happy birthday to you 5x"

They all sang and clap towards me.

I tried to

"Gian you hold this"

Alfred hands out the lighted candle cake to Gian

"wait what woops"

"do it for your trainer"

Gian now looks at me and puts the cake towards me

"Make a wish and blow it"

he said

...

I blow the candle and wipes my tears from my eyes preventing it from dropping.

"yahaaaaayy!!"

"th- thank you all"

My shaky tone makes me hard to talk.

"Let us now start digging in"

they all start taking out food and I put down the cake and split it.
After a few minutes of us done eating and drinking
Someone suddenly opens my door
its Allen
I haven''t seen him in a while
he looks more tired than usual.

"I''m very sorry to interrupt the party but our boss is in critical condition right now"',
                        2
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        18,
                        'Chapter 10',
                        '(Gian Salderist''s POV)

"Our boss is in critical condition right now"

We all froze for a moment and rushes out from the room including Janna.

"He''s in the clinic right now"

Even if it''s her birthday today, she couldn''t forget what her duty is.
After we all arrive at the clinic room
We all just stand there frozen afraid to open the door.
Janna shakingly approach the door and slowly tries to open it.

"Just what in the hell happened to our captain?"

Alfred said so.
Exact same question comes to my mind.
My racing heart beats loud that I can hear it.
Janna finally opens the door

"Oouch!! That hurts!!!!"

A loud scream all of us hear.

"Stay still blockhead! I''m not done yet on stitching your wound"

"You could''ve done some anesthesia for me you know!"

"That built of yours does not require one!"

A quarrel that can only be heard between married couple.
Bracer sits on a chair gritting his teeth in pain a fresh horizontal wound in his cheek and big slant wound from his chest to his rib three diagonal scratch on his right biceps.
He''s currently half naked.
And the doctor woman who stitched our wound month ago sits close to Bracer stitching his wound.
Bracer looks at us and smiles a bit with a wave
"oh, hey guys. Ouch!"

"Don''t move or else it''ll reopen"

We all just went inside

"What happened?"

Alfred asked the natural question.

"......"

Bracer went silent for a moment and looked down

"It''s one of the ten servants"

"!!"

All of them are shocked by what he said

"There, it''s done"

"Thanks"

The doctor woman is done on her stitch and walks away.

Anyway, what Servant?

Did he got beaten up by an servant or what?

"What servant?"

I asked
Janna says

"The 10 Servants is just like those monsters but much stronger than them and they serve the 4 Guardians whose much worse. Because the Guardians are the protectors of the tree"

"what??"

I''m left confused.
Servants are those much stronger than those monsters? and what guardians? 
By looking at Janna''s expression. It doesn''t look good
She looks upset for some reason.

"Far as the rumours said. I didn''t actually believe they exist"
"Did you beat it, Boss?"

Alfred asked Bracer

"...yeah"

"It''s a good thing th-"

"with the cost of 36 of our men only to defeat one monster and I''m the only one who lives to kill it"

"Then why didn''t you sent us!?"

Janna furiously said

"We would''ve saved few more companions if you just sent me and Alfred there. WHY!!?"

"..It''s your birthday today"

"SO WHAT!?"

Janna couldn''t control her anger at Bracer

"It should be celebrated."

"I couldn''t care about that when our men are dying just because I celebrate shit"

"Janna, It was capt decision"

Alfred interrupts

"And I don''t buy it"

She almost let her tears out.
She walks out of the room running.

"...."

"I''m sorry everyone"

Bracer apologize looking down
He have suffered massive loss by buying a little victory

"It''s fine boss"

"Should I go after her?"

I''m considering on doing so

"No, let her have time alone"

Got a point there

"If one of the ten servants are defeated, doesn''t that make them nine now?"

one of the man who celebrated birthday with us said
He has a point

"no"

Bracer Said

"What? Why?"

"I did kill one of them but that doesn''t decrease their numbers, For they are 10 servants and always will be 10. Same as the 4 guardians"

"What''s that mean?"

"...."

I hate this feeling

"It means if we did defeat one of the 10 servants or 4 guardians or even by low chance all of them, they will be replace in no time to become 10 and 4 again and the strength will be no doubt equal than the previous"

"!"

"What the hell?"

So that means they are impossible to extinct?
What would be a way to win?? 

"How can we win against them then?"

"We can win against them but their numbers won''t change"

"..."

We all feel despair right now
If those monsters are just easily replace in no time, then we are no doubt doom.
"There is one way to make them gone though"

Bracer said
A sparkle of hope sprung to me

"What is it?"

"To kill what the guardians protect"

"What?"

"It''s only rumors but if it exist then they''ll be gone for good"

"Just tell us"

"To kill what the 4 guardians protect their life for"

Bracer continues

"THE MYTHICAL TREE"

(A FEW MINUTES PASS)

All of them have walked out including Alfred with them saying to Bracer that to get well soon.
Except me.
I''m still in the clinic with Bracer
We''re seating in front of each other
He said he have something to say to me

"You''ve been training well huh"

I don''t think that''s something anyone would say when they look at my beaten up body.

"haha I don''t think I''ve improved though"

"I guess Janna has been rough to you"

"I can''t quite deny that"

It''s true anyway

"So, what did you want to talk about, Boss?"

"...."

He stayed silent for a moment
"You might get angry when I say this but its about Warren"

"!"

I''m shocked a bit there

"What about that guy??"

"Have you taken a look at the guy''s change?"

I remembered the sharp blade he pointed at me at his hands 
And that he don''t remember who I am, not even recognizing me a bit and looks at me like I''m his archenemy
Don''t tell me

"It was me who made him like that"

A rage comes instantly right at me',
                        2
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        19,
                        'Chapter 11',
                        'A rage comes directly to me
I grabbed the neck of Bracer attempting to choke him

"What''d you do to Warren!?"

"Gian! Don''t harm my Patient!!"

The doctor said so
But I couldn''t just let go until I got the answer that I want to hear

"Answer Me!"

I let my emotion to control my entire body and thoughts

"..."

Bracer gets up from his seat
He grabs my wrist and twist it to let my arm go from his neck

"aw"

It hurts.
He grabs my elbow to straighten my arm pull it and rotates his entire body backwards and lifted my entire body and got thrown to the ground.
My back hits the ground with loud impact from a throw.
All of the pain in my back is returning back to me.
I didn''t get to shout because of so much pain throbbing in my back
Shit, it hurts.

"Calm down, Soldier. LET. ME. TALK. FIRST"

A scary menacing beast disguising as a human is seen right in front of me standing with blood all over him looking down at me.
I got silenced real quick 
Bracer sits back to his chair again

"Warren volunteered to join in order to protect you"

"What?"

"But unfortunately the hippocampus on his brain couldn''t handle the needed chemistry for the experiment Allen have provided for him"

!?

"And that''s why he have lost his memory cells except that he still remember his own name."

.....

"hah?"

"The experiment that Allen have given to him is to change a part of his body to become a sharpened sword"

....

I remembered his arms becoming a sword extracting from his skin
And that Allen guy was that guy who told us about the captain''s condition outside the door huh
So he''s the one who experimented Warren and made him forget his memory

"I never expected that he''d get his memory gone but nothing I could do about it..... I deeply apologize for this"

Bracer bows his head while I''m still laying down from pain listening
I despaired once again.
Warren have lost his memory who''s my only friend, and my mom died who''ve cared for me since I was little.
Who else do I have now??
What should I do right now?
An idea hit to me
I have gained another purpose now.

(Tomorrow Comes)

My training starts now on the white room 
I was chasing Janna endlessly all over the room 
Her expression is that of an emotionless person
I guess I''m not surprise when she heard of her fellow soldiers passed away.
Even I feel the same when my mom died but how big of a suffering would she be in right now if a bunch of people she knows died.
I couldn''t even imagine that.
As I was having these kind of thoughts while chasing her
I''m now a few inches in my hand to reach her
Finally, I already did it.
Or so I thought...
as I barely almost touch her, her figure disappeared.

"What?"

I look side by side looking for her.

"Another rule will be added"

I heard a voice from above
I shift my head upward to see and shock of what I see right now
What?
She''s floating??

"I will fly for about 3 meters height and you will try to catch me while I''m floating and of course 2 minutes pass and your body will not be crush in the wall but be buried on the ground"

"WHAT!? That''s unf-"

As I was about to finish my sentence a gush of strong force from above cause me to instantly be glued to the ground

"GHHK"

"Two minutes have passed by the way"

"grkk"

I can''t breathe
I tried to use all of my strength to get up.

"!?"
I manage to move lift both my arm.
I guess I did improve a bit huh
For I have gained another purpose since my talk with Captain
I gained motivation and strength
My new purpose is to revive that idiot of a friend his memory.
Ten seconds is already gone and Janna stopped using her powers.
I created that opportunity to immediately stand up and jump right to her
I raised my arm and got to catch her leg

"!?"

I can see that Janna''s shock by it
I finally got to catch her
Yes! Finally I did it
Wait for me Warren, I will get your memories back for sure. 
With my own method of course.',
                        2
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        20,
                        'Chapter 12',
                        'YES!!!

I finally got to touch her. It means I succeed at my training.

!?

Janna Pulls her legs to lift me up the air and kicks my face by using her other free leg.
It hit me right at my cheeks and I let go of her legs and falls into the ground again.

“ow”

What was that? I thought I passed already.
After a few seconds she looks down towards me and starts descending at the floor.
I sat on the ground managing to get up.
She still looks at me deeply and silently
….
What? Don’t tell me it’s not done yet

“You passed”

“!?”

Haah, finally thank God. I can finally have a bit of peace

“But your training doesn’t here, you only passed at my trial and there’s still last two left”
“………………..” 

I’m speechless of what she said.

There’s still more left???

“Remember to rest up for now, your next mentor is more harsher than me”

“..uh ok”

“You better be prepare or you might die just from the second training that you’ll get”

I feel threatened there now and absolute fear is instilled in me.

“Rest for four days and your new training will start”

(TOMORROW COMES)

A moment of peace and silence in my life has come. A natural routine of my life where chaos is sealed.
I get to take a bath in my room, eat delicious, go to shopping freely.
But then again I can’t deny that it hasn’t end yet, My training that is. And what’s more is that I’ll get new mentor. Janna did say that my new mentor is harsher than her. I hope I can survive if that’s the case.
I still haven’t seen Warren around yet, I wonder where that idiot is.
After what Bracer told me I can’t just ignore him the way he currently is now. 
And also Alfred is nowhere to be seen, After knowing him a bit I’m guessing He’s just doing some mechanical work.
As this peace of a day and my resting time continue 3 days passed
I went to my usual training room and saw Janna standing beside the door Probably waiting for me
She noticed my presence and waves at me a little.

“Is my mentor there now?”

“Yeah, hope you the best”

“……..”

“What? Go inside now”

She said but I can’t ignore what I see when I looked at her
I just notice the thing that’s on her neck.
It’s the necklace I gave her as a birthday gift.
So she decided to wore it huh
It made me smile a bit

“Thank you for taking care of me”

I expressed my gratitude to her sincerely as a student of her

“It’s nothing really, Just doing what I’m told”

I went past her as I see that she’s touching the necklace and looks down at it

“Like I always do”

That’s the last word I hear from her the moment I open the door
I got inside of my training room.
It’s all white. I’ve gotten used to this place right now like it’s my own house but I might get sick I get used at this too much.
But the question is.
Where’s my new mentor?
I looked everywhere around and couldn’t see him or her
And then a sudden thing throws at me the moment I shift my face at that direction
I managed to dodge barely but It made a loud sound as it impacts behind my back on the wall.
I thought that if whatever that thing is if it hit me, I’m dead.

“Good Reflex”

A familiar manly voice is heard
Don’t tell me it’s that bastard
I feel my heart pounding so fast
I turn my head to face the guy 

“Hello, Gian. Been a while eh”

A Clair tone skin man with a smirk that somehow irritates me and a brown hair with a cut side hair

It’s Alfred

“I’m your new mentor on this training”

I damn didn’t expect that that he would be my new mentor of all people in here

“Think Fast”

He tries to toss something toward me like giving me it
I received it and was shock a bit of what it is
It’s a sword.
I tried to unsheathe the scabbard in hoping it’s fake one
And nope, it’s freaking real.
“What is this?”

“Never seen a sword?”

“I know what a sword is but what am I gonna do about this?”

“That will be your new training”

“hah?”

He walks toward me and past right me
I turned my gaze to follow him and he was trying to get the thing he tried to kill me with by throwing it
I never knew what it is but I know now and speechless of it
He grabs it and 

“Hippyeoh!”

He got the thing that got stuck in the wall 
It’s a wooden sword

“Now then”

He turns the sword point towards me

“Let’s start now shall we?”

“Bu- but”

There’s still a lot of question in my mind

“You’re gonna use the wooden sword and I use a sharp one?”

No matter what it is a big of a handicap of a training and a dangerous one

“uh Yeah what about it?”

“Doesn’t that seem unfair for you?”

“UNFAIR? Try to touch your cheeks first”

I touch it and there was some kind of liquid on it. I look at it and I’m shock. 

It’s my blood.

The moment I touch it it’s starting to throb. It hurts me

Aside from that, It made me bleed from that wooden stick?
Unbelievable. How is it even possible to begin with?

“I think we’re on equal term here OR”
I look at him and a bit of fear is now a feeling that is inside me

“It would be UNFAIR for you”
Alfred smiles at me as the wooden sword still points at me.
I hope I survive this
',
                        2
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        21,
                        'Chapter 1',
                        'Painful!

How painful!

My head hurts so badly!

A gaudy and dazzling dreamworld filled with murmurs instantly shattered. The sound asleep Zhou Mingrui felt an abnormal throbbing pain in his head as though someone had ruthlessly lashed at him with a pole again and again. No, it was more like a sharp object pierced right through his temples followed by a twist!

Ouch… In his stupor, Zhou Mingrui attempted to turn around, look up, and sit up; however, he was completely unable to move his limbs as though he had lost control over his body.

From the looks of it, I’m still not awake. I’m still in a dream… Who knows, perhaps the next scene will be of me thinking I’m already awake, but in fact, am actually still sleeping…

Zhou Mingrui, who was not unfamiliar with similar encounters, tried his best to focus in order to escape the shackles placed upon him by the darkness and confusion.

However, while still in his reverie, whatever will he could summon was ethereal like a fleeting fog. He found his thoughts difficult to control and introspect. No matter how much he tried, he still lost his focus as random thoughts surfaced in his mind.

Why would I suddenly have such an excruciating headache in the middle of the night?

And it’s really painful!

Could it be something like a cerebral hemorrhage?

F**k, don’t tell me I’m going to die young?

I need to wake up! Now!

Eh? Why doesn’t it seem to hurt as much as before? But why does it still feel like a blunt knife is slicing through my brains…

From the looks of it, sleep is impossible. How am I to show up for work tomorrow?

Why am I still thinking about work? This is some authentic headache. Of course I have to take time off! I don’t have to worry about my manager’s grumblings!

Hey, putting it that way, it doesn’t seem too bad. Hehe, I can end up getting some spare time for myself!

Throbbing pain inundated Zhou Mingrui, allowing him to slowly accumulate immaterial strength until he was finally able to move his back and open his eyes. He finally broke free from his reverie.

His vision first blurred before it was screened by a faint crimson red. All he could see was a study desk made of burly wood in front of him. Right in the middle was an opened notebook with coarse, yellow pages. The title was eye-catchingly written with strange, deep black lettering.

To the left of the notebook was a stack of neatly arranged books, numbering about eight. The wall on their right was inset with grayish-white pipes with wall lamps connected to them.

The lamp had a classical Western style to it. It was about half the size of an adult’s head with an inner layer of transparent glass and an exterior gridded with black metal.

Diagonally beneath the lamp was a black ink bottle shrouded in a pale red glow. Its embossed surface formed a blurry angel pattern.

In front of the ink bottle and to the right of the notebook sat a dark-colored pen with a fully circular body. Its tip shimmered with a faint glint while its cap rested right beside a brass revolver.

A gun? A revolver? Zhou Mingrui was completely taken aback. The things laid before him were alien to him. It looked nothing like his room!

While feeling shocked and confused, he discovered that the desk, notebook, ink bottle, and revolver were covered in a layer of crimson ‘veil,’ a result of the light shining from the window.

Subconsciously, he looked up and shifted his gaze up bit by bit.

In midair, a crimson moon hung high above the backdrop of a ‘black velvet curtain,’ glowing in silence.

This… Zhou Mingrui felt inexplicably horrified as he stood up abruptly. However, before his feet fully straightened, his brain protested with throbbing pain. It made him temporarily lose his strength as he fell uncontrollably. His buttocks slammed heavily onto the burly wood chair.

Pa!

The pain did little. Zhou Mingrui stood up again by propping himself up. He turned around in a fluster as he began to size up the environment he was in.

The room was not very large, with a brown door on each side of the room. Close to an opposite wall was a low wooden bed.

Between the bed and the left door was a cabinet. Its two doors were swung open and beneath it were five drawers.

To the side of the cabinet, there was the same grayish-white pipe on the wall at the height of a person. However, it was connected to a strange mechanical device with exposed gears and bearings in several spots.

Items resembling coal stoves sat in the right corner of the room near the table, along with soup pots, iron pots, and other kitchen utensils.

Across the right door was a dressing mirror with two cracks. Its bottom was made of wood and the patterns were simple and plain.

With a sweep of his gaze, Zhou Mingrui noticed himself in the mirror—the present him.

Black hair, brown pupils, a linen shirt, thinly built, average-looking features and a rather deep outline…

This… Zhou Mingrui immediately drew a gasp as many helpless and confused guesses surfaced in his mind.

The revolver in ancient European style and the crimson moon that looked different from Earth’s moon could only mean one thing!

C-could I have transmigrated? Zhou Mingrui widened his mouth slightly.

He had grown up reading web novels and had often fantasized over such scenes. However, he momentarily found it hard to accept the situation when he found himself in one.

This was probably what it meant to love a fantasy 1 ? In a minute, Zhou Mingrui had already cursed himself while trying to make the best out of his adverse situation.

If not for the still throbbing headache that made his thoughts high strung but clear, he would have definitely suspected that he was dreaming.

Calm down, calm down, calm down… After taking a few deep breaths, Zhou Mingrui worked hard to stop panicking.

At that moment, as his mind and body calmed down, memories began flooding him as they slowly appeared in his mind!

Klein Moretti, a citizen of the Northern Continent’s Loen Kingdom, Awwa County, City of Tingen. He is also a recent graduate from the Department of History at Khoy University…

His father was a sergeant of the Royal Army who had sacrificed himself during a colonial conflict with the Southern Continent. The bereavement allowance gave Klein the opportunity to study at a private language school and laid the foundation for his admission into university…

His mother was a devotee of the Evernight Goddess. She passed away the year Klein passed the entrance examinations to Khoy University…

He also had an elder brother and a younger sister. They stayed in a two bedroom apartment together…

Their family was not wealthy and its situation could even be described as somewhat wanting. At present, the family was supported solely by the elder brother who worked at an import and export company as a clerk…

As a history graduate, Klein grasped knowledge of the ancient Feysac language—deemed the origin of all languages in the Northern Continent—as well as the Hermes language which often appeared in ancient mausoleums as well as text regarding sacrificial and praying rituals…

Hermes language? Zhou Mingrui’s mind stirred as he reached out to rub his throbbing temples. He cast his gaze toward the table at the opened notebook. He noticed that the text on the yellowed paper turned from strange to alien, before turning from alien to something familiar. It then turned into something readable.

It was text written in Hermes language!

The dark ink wrote the following:

“Everyone will die, including me.”

Hiss! Zhou Mingrui felt inexplicably horrified. He instinctively leaned back in an attempt to widen the distance between him and the notebook, as well as the text on it.

Being very weak, he nearly fell down but managed to extend his hands in a fluster to hold onto the edge of the table. He felt that the surrounding air was turbulent as though there were faint murmurings resounding in it. The feeling was akin to hearing horror stories being recounted by elders when he was young.

He shook his head, believing that everything was an illusion. Zhou Mingrui found his balance and shifted his gaze from the notebook as he heaved for breath.

This time, his gaze landed on the shimmering brass revolver. He suddenly had a question arise in him.

With Klein’s family situation, how can they have the money or means to buy a revolver?

Zhou Mingrui could not help but frown.

While in deep thought, he suddenly discovered a red handprint to the side of the table. Its color was deeper than the moonlight and much thicker than the ‘veil.’

It was a bloody handprint!

“A bloody handprint?” Zhou Mingrui subconsciously flipped his right hand that had been holding the edge of the table. Looking down, he saw that his palm and fingers were covered in blood.

At the same time, the throbbing pain in his head continued. Although it had weakened a little, it continued incessantly.

Did I smash my head open?

Zhou Mingrui guessed as he turned around and walked towards a cracked dressing mirror.

A few steps later, a black-haired figure of medium build and brown eyes appeared clearly in front of him. The person had a distinct scholarly air to him.

Is this the present me? Klein Moretti?

Zhou Mingrui was stunned momentarily. Since there was insufficient lighting at night, he failed to see something clearly. He continued forward until he was just a step short from colliding with the mirror.

Using the crimson veil-like moonlight as illumination, he turned his head and examined the corner of his forehead.

A clear reflection appeared in the mirror. His temple had a grotesque wound with burn marks along its periphery. Blood stained the wound’s surroundings and there were grayish-white brain juices squirming slowly within.',
                        3
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        22,
                        'Chapter 2',
                        'Tap! Tap! Tap!

Zhou Mingrui reeled back in fear at the sight that greeted him. It was as though the person in the dressing mirror was not himself, but a dessicated corpse.

How could a person with such grievous wounds be still alive!?

He turned his head in disbelief again and checked the other side. Even though he was a distance away and the lighting was poor, he could still see the penetrating wound and dark red blood stains.

“This…”

Zhou Mingrui drew a deep breath as he tried hard to calm himself.

He reached out to press his left chest and sensed his racing heart that exuded immense vitality.

He then touched his exposed skin. Beneath the slight coldness was flowing warmth.

When he squatted down and after verifying that his knees could bend, Zhou Mingrui stood up again and calmed down.

“What’s happening?” he muttered with a frown. He planned to inspect his head injury seriously once more.

He took two steps forward and suddenly paused. The moonlight of the sanguine moon was relatively dark, so it was insufficient for his ‘serious inspection.’

A memory fragment triggered as Zhou Mingrui turned his head to look at the grayish-white pipes and the metallic-gridded lamp on the wall right beside the study desk.

This was the most common gas lamp of the times. Its flame was stable and its illumination capabilities were excellent.

With Klein Moretti’s family situation, even a kerosene lamp was a dream, much less a gas lamp. Using candles was most apt for their standing and stature. However, back when he burned the midnight oil four years ago to be admitted into Khoy University, his elder brother, Benson, felt that it was an important matter which their family’s future depended upon. Therefore, he insisted on creating conducive studying conditions for Klein even if it meant taking on debt.

Of course, Benson, who was literate and had worked for several years, was not a rash person who did not think of the consequences. He had quite some tricks up his sleeve. He reasoned with the landlord to ‘raise the apartment’s standards by installing gas pipes to improve the likelihood of rentals in the future.’ The landlord was convinced and provided the money to complete the basic modifications. Then, using the convenience of working at an import and export company, he purchased a brand new gas lamp which was nearly at cost price. In the end, all he needed was to use his savings and did not need to borrow money.

After the memory fragment flashed past his mind, Zhou Mingrui came to the desk where he turned the pipe’s valve and began twisting the gas lamp’s switch.

With a sputtering sound, a spark sounded from friction. Light did not descend upon Zhou Mingrui as he had expected.

He twisted the switch a few more times, but all the gas lamp did was sputter and remain dark.

“Hmm…” Retracting his hand and pressing on his left temple, Zhou Mingrui sought for the reason by rummaging through his memory fragments.

A few seconds later, he turned around and walked toward the door. He arrived at the machine installation which was similarly inset into the wall and had grayish-white pipes connected to it.

This was a gas meter!

After seeing the exposed gears and bearings, Zhou Mingrui took out a coin from his trousers’ pocket.

It was dark yellow in color and had a bronze shimmer to it. The front of the coin was engraved with a portrait of a crown-wearing man, and there was a ‘1’ on a clump of wheat on the back.

Zhou Mingrui knew that this was the most basic currency of the Loen Kingdom. It was called a copper penny. One penny’s purchasing power was roughly three to four yuan before his transmigration. Such coins had other denominations such as the five pence, a halfpence and a quarterpence. Despite the three types, the denominations were not in small-enough units. In everyday life, one had to buy several different things just to spend a single coin from time to time.

After flipping the coin—which was only minted and circulated after King George III ascended to the throne—a few times, Zhou Mingrui inserted it into the gas meter’s thin vertical ‘mouth.’

Clink! Clang!

After the penny fell to the bottom of the meter, the sound of grinding gears sounded immediately, producing a short but melodious mechanical rhythm.

Zhou Mingrui stared at the meter for a few seconds before returning to the burly wood desk. He then reached out to twist the gas lamp’s switch.

After some sputtering, there was a sharp sound!

A fire plume ignited and rapidly grew. Bright light first occupied the internals of the wall lamp before penetrating the transparent glass, blanketing the room with a warm glow.

The darkness quickly receded as the crimson retreated out the window. Zhou Mingrui felt at ease for a baffling reason as he quickly came in front of the dressing mirror.

This time, he seriously inspected his temple and did not miss a single detail.

After a few rounds of inspection, he realized that apart from the original blood stain, liquid was no longer flowing out of the grotesque wound. It appeared like it had received the best hemostasis and bandaging. As for the slowly squirming grayish-white brain and the discernible growth of flesh and blood around the wound, it meant that the wound might take thirty to forty minutes, or maybe even two to three hours before it would only leave a light scar.

“The restorative effects that transmigration brings?” Zhou Mingrui curled up the right corner of his mouth as he muttered silently.

Following that, he let out a long sigh. Regardless, he was still alive!

After settling his mind, he pulled open a drawer and took out a tiny piece of soap. He took one of the old and tattered towels hanging by the side of the cupboard and opened the door. He then walked to the public bathroom which was shared by the tenants on the second floor.

Yes, I should clean up the blood stains on my head, or I’ll keep looking like a crime scene. It’s fine scaring myself, but if I were to scare my sister, Melissa, when she gets up early in the morning tomorrow, it would be quite problematic!

The corridor outside was pitch black. Silhouettes were barely accentuated by the crimson moonlight from the window at the end of the corridor. They looked like a pair of monster eyes that silently observed the living late into the night.

Zhou Mingrui lightened his footsteps as he walked towards the communal bathroom with a shuddering fear.

When he entered, there was even more moonlight, allowing him to see everything clearly. Zhou Mingrui stood in front of a wash basin and turned the tap’s knob.

Upon hearing the gushing sound of water, he suddenly recalled his landlord, Mr. Franky.

As water was included in the rent, this short and thin gentleman who wore a top hat, a vest, and a black suit, always inspected the bathroom actively to take note of any sounds of flowing water.

If the water gushed too loudly, Mr. Franky would ignore all of his gentlemanly traits by flailing his walking stick and striking the bathroom’s door, shouting things like ‘Darn thief,’ ‘Wastage is a shameless matter,’ ‘I’ll remember you,’ ‘If I see this happen another time, scram along with your filthy luggage,’ ‘Mark my words, this is the most value-for-money apartment in Tingen City. You will not find a more kindly landlord anywhere else!’

Putting away those thoughts, Zhou Mingrui used a moist towel to clean the blood stains from his face again and again.

After checking himself using the rundown mirror in the bathroom and verifying that all that was left were a hideous wound and a pale face did Zhou Mingrui relax. Then, he took off his linen shirt and used a bar of soap to wash away the bloodstains.

At that moment, he knitted his brows and recalled of a possible problem.

The wound was too exaggerated and there was too much blood. Apart from his body, his room likely still had signs of his injury!

After Zhou Mingrui was done with his linen shirt a few minutes later, he briskly returned to his apartment with a moist towel. He first wiped the blood handprint on the desk and then, using the gas lamp’s illumination, sought out spots which he missed out.

He immediately discovered that quite a substantial amount of blood had splattered onto the floor beneath the desk. And there was a yellow bullet to the left side of the wall.

“Releasing a round with a revolver pointed at the temple?” After mixing and matching the clues from before, Zhou Mingrui had a rough idea how Klein had died.

He was in no hurry to verify his guess. Instead, he seriously wiped away the blood stains and cleaned up the ‘scene.’ Following that, he took the bullet and returned to the side of his desk. He opened the revolver’s cylinder and poured out the rounds inside.

A total of five rounds and a cartridge shell all had a brass luster to them.

“Indeed…” Zhou Mingrui looked at the empty cartridge shell in front of him and stuffed the rounds back into the cylinder while nodding.

He shifted his gaze to the left and it landed on the notebook’s words: ‘Everyone will die, including me.’ Following that, even more questions arose in him.

Where did the gun come from?

Was it suicide or a faked suicide?

What kind of trouble could a history graduate of humble origins get himself into?

Why would such a suicide method only leave behind so little blood? Was it because I transmigrated in a timely manner and it came with healing benefits?

After pondering for a moment, Zhou Mingrui changed into another linen shirt. He sat on the chair and began pondering over more important matters.

Klein’s experience was still not something he needed to concern himself with. The true problem was to figure out the reason for his transmigration and if he could return!

His parents, relatives, best buddies, and friends. The fascinating world of the Internet and all sorts of delicious delicacies… These were reasons that prompted his desire to return!

Click. Click. Click… Zhou Mingrui’s right hand was subconsciously pulling out the revolver’s cylinder and slamming it back into place, again and again.

Yea, there has not been much difference for me between this period of time and the past. I was just a little unlucky, but why would I transmigrate for no baffling reason?

Bad luck… Yes, I tried a luck enhancement ritual before dinner today!

A thought flashed in Zhou Mingrui’s mind, illuminating the memories which were concealed by a fog of confusion.

As a qualified keyboard politician, keyboard historian, keyboard economist, keyboard biologist, and keyboard folklorist, he had always deemed himself as ‘knowing something of everything.’ Of course, his best buddy would often mock him as ‘only knowing a little of everything.’

And one of them was Chinese Divination.

When he visited his hometown last year, he had discovered a thread-bound book titled ‘Quintessential Divination and Arcane Arts of the Qin and Han Dynasty’ at an old bookstore. It looked pretty interesting and could aid him in posturing on the Internet, so he bought it. Unfortunately, his interest was short-lived. The vertical script it used made the reading experience horrible. All he did was flip through the beginning pages before he threw it into a corner.

He had experienced a spate of bad luck in the past month—losing his cell phone, customers running away after cheating him, and mistakes at work. Only then did he suddenly recall the luck enhancement ritual written at the beginning of ‘Quintessential Divination and Arcane Arts.’ Furthermore, the requirements were extremely simple, without any basic foundation requirements.

All he needed was to get four portions of the staple food in his area and place them in the four corners of his room. They could be placed on furniture such as tables and cupboards. Then, standing in the middle of the room, he had to take four steps in a counter-clockwise fashion to make a square. The first step required him to sincerely chant ‘Blessings Stem From The Immortal Lord of Heaven and Earth.’ The second step was to silently chant, ‘Blessings Stem From The Sky Lord of Heaven and Earth.’ The third step was ‘Blessings Stem From The Exalted Thearch of Heaven and Earth,’ and the fourth step was ‘Blessings Stem From The Celestial Worthy of Heaven and Earth.’ After the four steps were taken, he needed to close his eyes and wait five minutes in his original spot. Only then would the ritual be considered complete.

Since it did not cost him any money, he found the book, followed what was stipulated, and did it before dinner. However… nothing happened back then.

Who would have guessed that he would actually transmigrate in the middle of the night!

Transmigration!

“There is a distinct possibility that it’s due to that luck enhancement ritual… Yes, I should give it a try here tomorrow. If it’s really because of that, I stand a chance of transmigrating back!” Zhou Mingrui stopped flicking the revolver’s cylinder and suddenly sat straight up.

Regardless, he had to give it a try!

He had to attempt a Hail Mary!',
                        3
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        23,
                        'Chapter 3',
                        'After confirming his plan, Zhou Mingrui immediately felt he had a mental crutch. His fear and unease were all swept away into a corner of his mind.

Only then did he had the mood to carefully study Klein’s memory fragments.

Zhou Mingrui habitually stood up before turning off the pipe’s valve. He watched the wall lamp gradually dim until its flame extinguished before sitting back down. As he subconsciously fiddled with the revolver’s brass cylinder, he pressed the side of his head. He slowly recalled his memories in the crimson-dyed darkness as though he was the most attentive viewer in a movie theater.

Perhaps as a result of having a bullet pass through his head, Klein’s memories were like shattered glass. Not only were the memories not contiguous, there were many spots which were clearly missing. For example, memories pertaining to how the exquisite revolver appeared in his possession, whether he had committed suicide, or was killed, as well as the meaning of the words ‘Everyone will die, including me’ on the notebook, or whether he had participated in anything odd two days before the incident.

Not only had these particular memories become fragmented, there were also missing pieces. It was the same even for knowledge he ought to know. In light of the present situation, Zhou Mingrui believed that if Klein were to return to university, it was unlikely he could graduate. This was despite him having left campus just days ago without relaxing one bit.

He needs to participate in the Tingen University’s History department interview two days later…

The university graduates of Loen Kingdom do not have the tradition of staying at their alma mater… His mentor had given him a recommendation letter for Tingen University and Backlund University…

…

Through the window, Zhou Mingrui silently observed the red moon setting in the west. The gradual sinking of the moon continued until faint light glowed from the east, dyeing the horizon golden.

At that moment, there was a commotion inside the apartment. Soon, the sound of footsteps approached his door.

“Melissa is awake… She’s really as punctual as always.” Zhou Mingrui smiled. Due to Klein’s memories, seeing Melissa made him feel as though she was really his younger sister.

However, I do not have a younger sister… He immediately contradicted himself.

Melissa was different from Benson and Klein. Her rudimentary education was not completed at the Sunday school classes offered by the Church of the Evernight Goddess. When she reached schooling age, the Loen Kingdom had enacted the ‘Basic Education Law.’ A Primary and Secondary Education Committee was established and was specially provided with funding, increasing the kingdom’s investment into education.

In less than three years, under the premise that numerous church schools would be incorporated, many public primary schools were established to strictly maintain the principle of religious neutrality. This was to prevent education from involving itself in the conflicts between the Lord of Storms, Evernight Goddess, and the God of Steam and Machinery.

Compared to Sunday school that only cost a copper penny a week, a public primary school’s cost of three pence a week appeared rather expensive. However, the former only provided education every Sunday, whereas the latter provided six days of classes a week. In conclusion, the price was so low that it was almost free.

Melissa was different from most girls. From a young age, she enjoyed things like gears, springs, and bearings. Her ambition was to be a steam mechanic.

Having suffered from a lack of culture, Benson, who knew the importance of education, supported his sister’s dreams just like how he supported Klein’s university education. After all, Tingen Technical School was only considered secondary education. There was no need for her to attend language school or a public school for more knowledge.

In July last year, fifteen-year-old Melissa passed her entrance examinations and fulfilled her dreams of becoming a student at the Tingen Technical School’s Steam and Machinery department. As such, her weekly school fees raised to nine pence.

Meanwhile, Benson’s company was affected by the situation in the Southern Continent. There was a drastic drop both in profit and business transactions. More than a third of the employees were retrenched. In order to keep his job and maintain their livelihood, Benson could only accept more arduous tasks. He had to work overtime more frequently or head to places with harsh environments. That was what he was occupied with the past few days.

It was not that Klein did not think of helping share his elder brother’s burden but being born a commoner and having been admitted into an average language school, he felt a strong sense of inadequacy when he enrolled into university. For example, as the origin of all languages in the Northern Continent, the ancient language of Feysac was something all the children of nobles and of the wealthy class would learn from a young age. In contrast, he only made first contact with it in university.

He faced many similar aspects during his schooling career. Klein nearly gave his all and often stayed up late into the night and woke up early before barely managing to catch up to the others, eventually allowing him to graduate with average results.

Memories regarding his elder brother and younger sister remained active in Zhou Mingrui’s mind until he turned the doorknob open. Only then did he jolt awake and remember that he held a revolver in his hand.

This was a semi-regulated item!

It will scare children!

Also, there’s still the wound on my head!

With Melissa arriving at any moment, Zhou Mingrui pressed onto his temple and hurriedly pulled open a desk drawer and threw the revolver in before slamming it close.

“What happened?” Melissa looked over curiously when she heard the commotion.

She was still in the prime of her youth. Even though she did not have much nutritious food to eat, making her face thin and slightly pale, her skin remained lustrous as it exuded the vibes of a young girl.

When Zhou Mingrui saw his sister’s brown eyes look over, he forcibly composed himself and picked up an item beside his hand before calmly closing the drawer to conceal the existence of the revolver. He placed his other hand on his temple, the texture confirming that his wound had already healed!

He took out a silver vine-leaf pocket watch and pressed the top gently, causing its cover to flip open.

It was a picture of the siblings’ father. It was the most valuable item the Royal Army sergeant left behind, but being a second-hand item, it would often malfunction from time to time in recent years even though he had gotten a watchsmith to fix it. It had embarrassed Benson who enjoyed bringing it with him to elevate his status many a time, so it was thrown away back at home in the end.

It had to be said that perhaps Melissa did have talent in machinery. After grasping the principles behind the watch, she borrowed the tools from her Technical School to fiddle with the pocket watch. Recently, she even claimed to have fixed it!

Zhou Mingrui looked at the watch’s open cover and saw that the second hand was not moving. Subconsciously, he twisted the top dial to wind the pocket watch.

However, despite winding it a few times, he did not hear the sound of taut springs. The second hand remained motionless.

“It looks like it’s broken again.” He looked at his sister while trying to find a topic of conversation.

Melissa shot him an expressionless glance and briskly walked over to take the pocket watch away.

She stood in her spot and pulled up the button sitting atop the pocket watch. With a few simple turns, the tick-tocking of the second hand sounded.

Isn’t pulling the button up usually meant to adjust the time… Zhou Mingrui’s expression immediately turned blank.

At that moment, a bell chimed from a faraway cathedral. It chimed six times, sounding distant and ethereal.

Melissa tilted her head to listen to it and pulled the button up once again. Following that, she turned it to synchronize the time.

“It’s okay now,” she said simply without emotion. She then pressed the top button back and handed the pocket watch back to Zhou Mingrui.

Zhou Mingrui returned a smile politely in embarrassment.

Melissa gave her elder brother a piercing stare before turning to walk to the cupboard. She took her toiletries and towel before opening the door to leave. She headed for the public bathroom.

Why did her expression have a look of disparagement and resignation?

Is it a look of love and concern for a retarded brother?

Zhou Mingrui lowered his head and chuckled. He closed the pocket watch’s cover with a click before opening it again.

He repeated this action as his idle thoughts focused on a question.

Klein committed suicide without a silencer. Well, I’ll consider it as suicide for now. His suicide should have caused quite a commotion; yet, Melissa, who was just a wall away, did not notice it at all.

Was she sleeping too soundly? Or is Klein’s suicide shrouded in mystery to begin with?

Click! The pocket watch opened. Clack! The pocket watch closed… Melissa returned from washing up and saw her brother’s subconscious act of constantly opening and closing the pocket watch.

Her gaze was once again glazed with exasperation as she said with a sweet voice, “Klein, take out all the remaining bread. Remember to buy fresh ones today. There’s meat and peas too. Your interview is soon. I’ll make you mutton stewed with peas.”

As she spoke, she moved a stove out from a corner. With some charcoal, she boiled a pot of hot water.

Before the water boiled, she opened the cupboard’s lowest drawer and took out what seemed like a treasure—a can of inferior tea leaves. She threw about ten leaves into the pot and pretended that it was real tea.

Melissa poured two big cups of tea as she shared two pieces of rye bread with Zhou Mingrui over tea.

There is no sawdust or excessive gluten mixed in, but it is unappetizing… Zhou Mingrui still felt weak and was starving. He forced himself to swallow the bread with the tea while complaining inwardly.

Melissa finished eating a few minutes later. After she adjusted her black hair that reached down to her vest, she looked at Zhou Mingrui and said, “Remember to buy fresh bread. All we need is eight pounds. The weather is hot, so the bread will easily spoil. Also, buy the mutton and peas. Remember to buy them!”

Indeed, she was showing concern for her dull brother. She even had to repeat to emphasize it another time… Zhou Mingrui nodded with a smile.

“Alright.”

Regarding the Loen Kingdom’s pound, Zhou Mingrui matched Klein’s muscle memory with his. He believed it was close to half a kilogram of what he was accustomed to.

Melissa did not say anything further. She stood up and tidied the area. After packing away the last bit of bread for lunch, she put on a tattered veil cap that their mother left behind, picked up a self-sewn bag used to carry her books and stationery, and prepared to leave.

It was not Sunday, so she had an entire day of classes to attend.

Walking from their apartment to Tingen Technical School took about fifty minutes. There were public horse carriages that cost a penny a kilometer with a limit of four pence in the city and six pence in the city outskirts. In order to save money, Melissa would leave ahead of time and walk to school.

Moments after she opened the main door, she paused in her footsteps and turned her body halfway, saying, “Klein, don’t buy too much mutton or peas. Benson might come back on Sunday. Oh, and remember we only need eight pounds of bread.”

“Alright. Sure thing,” answered Zhou Mingrui exasperatedly.

Simultaneously, he repeated the word ‘Sunday’ a few times in his head.

In the Northern Continent, a year was similarly split into twelve months. Every year, there was 365 or 366 days. A week was similarly split into seven days.

The splitting of months was a result of astronomical observations. It made Zhou Mingrui suspect whether he was in a parallel world. As for the splitting of days, it was a result of religion. This was because Northern Continent had seven orthodox gods—the Eternal Blazing Sun, the Lord of Storms, the God of Knowledge and Wisdom, the Evernight Goddess, Mother Earth, the God of War, and the God of Steam and Machinery.

Watching his sister close the door and leave, Zhou Mingrui suddenly sighed. Soon, his thoughts focused onto the luck enhancement ritual.

Sorry, I really wish to return home…',
                        3
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        24,
                        'Chapter 4',
                        'Returning to his chair again, he heard the faraway cathedral’s bells chime again. It continued seven times before Zhou Mingrui slowly stood up. He went up front to the cupboard and took out his clothes.

A black vest with a matching suit, trousers that clung tightly to his legs, a halved top hat and his faint scholarly air made Zhou Mingrui feel like he was watching an English drama set in the Victorian era.

He suddenly muttered softly as he shook his head with a wry smile, “I’m not going for an interview. All I’m doing is buying some ingredients to prepare for my luck enhancement ritual…”

Klein was so concerned about his impending interview that it became instinct. When he was not focused enough, he habitually wore his only decent set of clothing.

After taking a breath, Zhou Mingrui took off his suit and vest, switching to a brownish-yellow coat. He also changed to a felt hat with a rounded edge of the same color.

With his outfit done, he walked to the side of the bed and lifted a square cushion. He reached his hand into an inconspicuous hole beneath and rummaged around before finding an intermediate layer.

When he retracted his right hand, there was a roll of notes in his palm. There were about eight notes with faded dark green colors.

These were all the savings Benson had at the moment. It even included the living expenses for the next three days. Two of them were five-soli notes and the remaining were one-soli notes.

In the Loen Kingdom’s currency system, soli was ranked second. It originated from ancient silver coins. One soli was equivalent to twelve copper pence. They had denominations of one and five soli.

At the top of the currency system was the gold pound. They were also paper based but were guaranteed by gold and pegged directly. A gold pound was equivalent to twenty soli. They had denominations of one, five, and ten gold pounds.

Zhou Mingrui spread a note and caught a whiff of the faint unique ink.

This was the smell of money.

Perhaps a result of Klein’s memory fragments or his constant desire for money, Zhou Mingrui felt like he had instantly fallen in love with these notes.

Look, their designs are so beautiful. It makes the stern and old-fashioned George III and his two mustaches appear especially adorable…

Look, the watermark that can be seen when the note is placed against sunlight is so alluring. The exquisite design for the anti-counterfeit label makes it completely different from those fake fancy schlocks!

Zhou Mingrui admired it for nearly a minute before pulling out two one-soli notes. He then rolled up the remaining notes and stuffed them back into the cushion’s concealed layer.

After arranging and flattening the cloth around the hole, Zhou Mingrui folded the two notes he had taken out neatly and placed them into the left pocket of his brownish-yellow jacket. He separated the notes from the few pence he had in his trouser pocket.

With all of this done, he placed a key into his right pocket and brought a dark brownish paper bag along with him and quickly walked toward the door.

His shuffling footsteps slowed down from a brisk pace until it eventually stopped.

Zhou Mingrui stood by the door and was unsure when he had already begun to frown.

Klein’s suicide was fraught with peculiarities. Would he encounter any ‘accidents’ if he were to leave just like that?

After some deep thought, Zhou Mingrui returned to his desk and pulled open the drawer. He then took out the shimmering brass revolver.

This was the only defensive weapon he could think of, and it was the only weapon with sufficient power!

Although he had never practicing shooting, just pulling such a revolver out would definitely daunt anyone!

He caressed the revolver’s cold metal before stuffing his revolver into the pocket where his notes were. He clasped the money in his palm as his fingers pressed onto the gun’s handle. It was perfectly concealed.

Feeling secure, he who knew a little of everything suddenly had a worry.

Would I end up misfiring?

Being deluged with such a thought, Zhou Mingrui quickly thought of a solution. He drew the revolver and released the cylinder. He then aligned the empty chamber which was a result of the ‘suicide’ along the gun’s hammer before closing it.

This way, even if there was a misfire, he would discharge an ’empty round!’

After stuffing his revolver back into his pocket, Zhou Mingrui kept his left hand in there.

He pressed down on his hat with his right hand and pulled open the door before leaving.

The corridor during the day remained dim as limited sunlight shone in from the window situated at the end of the corridor. Zhou Mingrui quickly went down the stairs and left the apartment before taking in the brilliance and warmth of the sun.

Although it was almost July, it was still considered the middle of summer. However, Tingen was situated north of the Loen Kingdom, so it had unique climate characteristics. The highest annual temperature was not even 30°C on Earth, with even cooler mornings. However, the streets were awash with filthy water and strewn junk. From Klein’s memories, this was not a rare sight in low-income communities, even if there were sewers. After all, there were just too many people and people needed to survive.

“Come and try our delicious roasted fish!”

“Hot and fresh oyster soup. Drink a bowl in the morning and feel invigorated all day!”

“Fresh fish from the port for just five pence apiece!”

“Muffins and eel soup make the perfect combination!”

“Conch! Conch! Conch!”

“Vegetables freshly plucked from the farms outside the city. Cheap and fresh!”

…

The mobile hawkers who sold vegetables, fruits, and hot food shouted along the streets as they beckoned the rushing pedestrians. Some of them would stop and carefully compare before purchasing. Others would impatiently wave their hands as they had yet to find work for the day.

Zhou Mingrui took in a whiff of the air that mixed both noxious and fragrant aromas. As he clenched the revolver tightly in his left hand, he held the notes tight. He pressed down on his hat with his right hand while passing through the busy street, slouching a little.

There was bound to be thieves in populated areas. Furthermore, this street had no lack of poor citizens who were working part time after losing their previous jobs. There were also starving children that were exploited by adults to do their bidding.

He proceeded forward until he reached a point where the crowdedness around him restored to normal. He straightened his back and raised his head to look down the street.

There was a vagrant accordionist busking. The melody was sometimes pleasant, sometimes fervent.

Beside him were several children in ragged clothes with sallow complexions due to malnutrition.

They listened to the music and moved to the beat, dancing self-made choreographies. Their faces were filled with joy as though they were a prince or an angel.

A deadpan woman passed by; her skirt was dirty and her skin was dull.

Her gaze appeared dull and sluggish. Only when she looked at the bunch of children did a faint glow flash. It was as though she had seen herself from three decades ago.

Zhou Mingrui overtook her and turned into another street before stopping at Smyrin Bakery.

The owner of the bakery was a seventy-plus year old granny named Wendy Smyrin. Her hair was completely grayish-white and she always wore a genial smile. From the beginning of Klein’s memories, she had been here selling bread and pastries.

Oh, the Tingen biscuits and lemon cakes she bakes are very delicious…

Zhou Mingrui gulped a mouthful of saliva and smiled.

“Mrs. Smyrin, eight pounds of rye bread.”

“Oh. Dear Klein, where’s Benson? Is he not back?” Wendy asked smilingly.

“In a few more days,” answered Zhou Mingrui vaguely.

As Wendy took the rye bread, she sighed. “He sure is a hardworking lad. He will have a good wife.”

Upon saying this, the corners of her lips curled up as she said playfully, “All is good now. You have already graduated. You are a history graduate of our Khoy University~ Oh, you will soon be able to earn money. You should not be staying in the apartment you are currently living in. At the very least, you should have a bathroom you can call your own.”

“Mrs. Smyrin, you seem to be a young and energetic woman today.” All Zhou Mingrui could do was respond with a dry smile.

If Klein were to successfully pass his interview and become a lecturer at Tingen University, it was true that his family would immediately be pushed up to a higher socioeconomic status!

In his memory fragments, he had once fantasized about renting a bungalow in the suburbs. There would be five or six rooms, two bathrooms, a huge balcony upstairs, two rooms, a dining room, a living room, a kitchen, a bathroom, and an underground storage room on the first floor.

This was not a wishful dream. Even a lecturer on probation at Tingen University would have a weekly salary of two gold pounds. After the probationary period, the salary would be raised to three gold pounds and ten soli. One had to know that despite working for so many years, Klein’s brother, Benson, only had a weekly salary of one pound and ten soli. Ordinary workers at a factory did not even get a pound or, at best, a little more. And rent for a bungalow was about nineteen soli to one pound and eighteen soli.

“This is the difference between earning three to four thousand yuan and earning fourteen to fifteen thousand yuan a month…” Zhou Mingrui mumbled to himself.

However, all of this was under the premise that he passed either the Tingen University or Backlund University interviews.

There were not many other opportunities. People without any connections were unable to get recommendations to become a public servant. And those who studied history were more limited in job opportunities. There was not much demand for private consultants from the aristocrats, banks, or industrial magnates.

Taking into account that the knowledge Klein grasped were fragmented and incomplete, Zhou Mingrui felt awkward and guilty towards Mrs. Smyrin’s expectations of him.

“No, I have always been this young,” answered Wendy humorously.

As she spoke, she packed the sixteen rye bread she had weighed into the brown paper bag that Zhou Mingrui had brought. She stretched out her right hand and said, “Nine pence.”

Every rye bread weighted about half a pound as differences were inevitable.

“Nine pence? Wasn’t it eleven pence two days ago?” Zhou Mingrui asked subconsciously.

It cost 15 pence the month before the previous month.

“You have to thank the people who protested on the streets for the repeal of the Grain Act,” said Wendy as she shrugged.

Zhou Mingrui nodded in vague acknowledgment. Klein’s memories regarding this was incomplete. All he remembered was that the core tenet of the Grain Act was to protect the prices of domestic agriculture products. Once the prices rose to a certain level, grain imports from Southern nations like Feynapotter, Masin, Lenburg were stopped.

Why would people protest the act?

Without saying much, Zhou Mingrui, afraid he would end up pulling out the revolver, carefully took out his notes and handed one of them over to Mrs. Smyrin.

He was given three copper pence in change. Stuffing them into his trouser pocket, he took the paper bag containing the bread and headed for the ‘Lettuce and Meat’ market across the street. He was working hard for the mutton stewed with peas his sister had exhorted.

There was a municipal square at the intersection of Iron Cross Street and Daffodil Street. Many tents were erected there, and clowns dressed in odd and funny attires were distributing fliers.

“There’s a circus performance tomorrow night?” Zhou Mingrui glanced at the fliers in the hands of others as he read their contents under his breath.

Melissa would definitely like it. However, how much is the entrance fee?

With that thought, Zhou Mingrui went closer.

Just as he was about to ask a clown with a red and yellow painted face, a hoarse woman’s voice sounded from beside him.

“Would you like to try a divination?”

Zhou Mingrui subconsciously turned his head and saw a woman wearing a pointed hat and a long black dress standing in front of a short tent.

Her face was smeared with red and yellow paint and her eyes were a profound grayish-blue.

“No,” Zhou Mingrui shook his head in response. He did not have the spare cash for divination.

The woman laughed and said, “My tarot divination is very accurate.”

“Tarot…” Zhou Mingrui was instantly dumbfounded.

This pronunciation was almost identical to the tarot cards on Earth!

And tarot cards from Earth were a set of cards used for divination. They just had graphics that represented different omens.

Wait… He suddenly recalled the origins of tarot divination in this world.

It did not originate from the seven orthodox gods nor was it an ancient legacy. Instead, it was created by the Intis Republic’s Consul of that era, Roselle Gusta, more than 170 years ago.

This Mr. Roselle invented the steam engine, improved the sailing boat, overthrew the Intis Kingdom’s imperial rule, and was recognized by the God of Craftsmanship. He also became the first Consul of the Intis Republic.

Later, he invaded other nations and placed Lenburg and other nations under his protection. He made the Loen Kingdom, Feynapotter, Feysac Empire and other powerful Northern Continent nations bow down to the Intis Republic. Following that, the Republic was then changed to an Empire and he became the self-proclaimed ‘Emperor Caesar.’

It was during Roselle’s rule that the Church of Craftsmanship received its first public holy revelation since the Fifth Epoch. Ever since, the God of Craftsmanship was changed to the God of Steam and Machinery.

Roselle also invented tarot divination. He also established the contemporary system of paper-based cards and their playstyles. There were many familiar styles that Zhou Mingrui was familiar with, such as Upgrade, Fighting the Landlord, Texas Poker, and Quint…

In addition, the marine fleets he sent out discovered a sea route that led to the Southern Continent through the stormy and turbulent seas. This also began the era of colonialism.

Unfortunately, he was betrayed in his old age. In the year 1198 of the Fifth Epoch, he was assassinated by the combined forces of the Church of the Eternal Blazing Sun, the former Intis royal family—the Sauron family, and other aristocrats. He eventually died in the White Maple Palace.

This… To recall such general knowledge suddenly made him facepalm.

Could this be a transmigration senior?

With this in mind, Zhou Mingrui was intrigued to see what tarot cards looked like. Therefore, he nodded at the pointy hat woman with the painted face and said, “If the… well… price is reasonable, I’ll give it a try.”

The woman immediately said with a laugh, “Sir, you are the first one here today, so it’s on the house.”',
                        3
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        25,
                        'Chapter 5',
                        'Free? Free things cost the most!

Zhou Mingrui silently mumbled and decided that he would not purchase any additional services whatever they were. He would firmly refuse them all.

If you are really that capable, try divining that I transmigrated here!

With this in mind, Zhou Mingrui followed behind the woman whose face was painted red and yellow, stooping low to enter the low tent.

The tent’s interior was extremely dark, illuminated only by several beams of light that managed to seep inside. A table covered with paper cards could be made out faintly in the low illumination.

The woman with the sharp pointy hat was not affected by this at all. Her long black dress glided as though it was moving over water while she went around to the table. She sat on the opposite side and lighted a candle.

The dim yellow light flickered, causing the inside of the tent to appear bright and dark at the same time. It instantly added a much more mysterious feel to the atmosphere.

Zhou Mingrui sat down quietly, his gaze sweeping over the tarot cards on the table where he discovered familiar cards like “The Magician,” “The Emperor,” “The Hanged Man,” and “Temperance,” etc.

Could Roselle have been a ‘senior’… I wonder if he was also a fellow countryman of mine… Zhou Mingrui mumbled to himself subconsciously.

Before he could finish looking at the opened cards on the table, the woman who claimed to have accurate divinations had already reached out her hands to gather all of the cards together. She stacked them into a deck and pushed it in front of him.

“Shuffle the cards first and cut the deck,” the circus fortune-teller said in a muted voice.

“Me? Shuffle?” Zhou Mingrui asked reflexively.

The yellow and red paint on the fortune-teller’s face squirmed together as she revealed a slight smile, saying, “Of course, everyone’s destiny can only be unraveled by themselves. I only serve as a reader of it.”

Zhou Mingrui immediately questioned her warily, “This reading does not require additional fees, right?”

As a keyboard folklorist, I’ve already seen too many of such tricks!

The fortune-teller was visibly taken aback before finally saying muffledly, “It’s free.”

Zhou Mingrui, relieved, stuffed the revolver further back into his pocket. Thereafter, he calmly reached out his two hands to shuffle and cut the deck skillfully.

“It’s done.” He placed the already shuffled tarot cards in the middle of the table.

The fortune-teller clasped the cards with both her hands and carefully looked at cards for a while. Then, she suddenly opened her mouth and said, “I’m sorry, I forgot to ask, but what would you like to ask about?”

Back when he was wooing his first love, Zhou Mingrui had also done research on tarot cards. He asked unhesitatingly, “Past, present, and future.”

This was a type of divination as part of tarot card interpretation—three cards when opened sequentially symbolized one’s past, present, and future.

The fortune-teller nodded first, then curled her lips to reveal a smile and said, “Then please reshuffle the deck. You can only truly get the cards you want if you know what you would like to ask about.”

Were you fooling me just now? Do you have to be this petty? Didn’t I only ask a few times if this would be a free service? Zhou Mingrui’s cheeks twitched a little. He took a deep breath and took the tarot deck back to reshuffle and cut it.

“There won’t be any problems this time, right?” He placed the already cut deck back onto the table.

“No problem.” The fortune-teller reached out her fingers and picked a card from the top of the deck. Then she placed it on the left side of Zhou Mingrui. Her voice was going lower and lower as she spoke, “This card symbolizes your past.”

“This card symbolize your present.” The fortune-teller placed the second card right in front of Zhou Mingrui.

Then, she picked the third card and put it on the right side of Zhou Mingrui.

“This card symbolizes the future.”

“Alright, which card would you like to see first?” The fortune-teller raised her head up after completing her placement of the cards and gazed deeply at Zhou Mingrui with her grayish-blue eyes.

“I’ll have a look at the ‘present’ first,” Zhou Mingrui said after giving it some thought.

The fortune-teller nodded slowly and flipped over the tarot card that was directly in front of Zhou Mingrui.

A colorfully dressed character was depicted on this card, wearing ragged headgear with a stick over his shoulder. There was a bindle hanging on the end of the stick and a puppy was following behind him. It was numbered “0.”

“The Fool,” the fortune-teller lightly read out the name of the card with her grayish-blue eyes affixed on Zhou Mingrui.

The Fool? The “0” card of tarot? A start? A fresh beginning with all kinds of possibilities? Zhou Mingrui was not even considered an amateur enthusiast of tarot, so he could only make a rough interpretation based on his own impressions of tarot.

Just as the fortune-teller was about to say something, the cloth curtains of the tent was suddenly lifted open. The ray of sunlight that shone in was so blinding that it caused the back-facing Zhou Mingrui to instinctively narrow his eyes.

“Why are you impersonating me again! It’s my job to handle the divination for people!” a woman’s voice growled angrily. “Return to your post quickly! You must remember that you’re just an animal trainer!”

An animal trainer? Zhou Mingrui’s eyes had already adapted to the light by now. He saw a similar-looking woman who was also wearing a sharp pointy hat in a black dress, with her face painted in red and yellow as well. The only difference was that she was taller and had a slimmer physique.

The woman who was seating in front of him immediately stood up and said disgruntledly, “Don’t mind this, it’s just that I like doing this. But I have to say, my divination and interpretation can be really accurate sometimes. I’m serious…”

She spoke and lifted up her dress to go around from the side of the table before quickly trotting away from the tent.

“Sir, would you like me to interpret your cards for you?” the real fortune-teller looked at Zhou Mingrui and asked with a smile.

Zhou Mingrui’s lips twitched and asked her sincerely, “Is it free?”

“…No,” the real fortune-teller answered.

“Then forget it.” Zhou Mingrui pulled his hands back and put them into his pockets. He clutched his revolver and money before stooping again to exit the tent.

Damn! He actually got an animal trainer to be his fortune-teller?

Was an animal trainer who didn’t want to be a fortune-teller not a good clown?

Zhou Mingrui very quickly put this matter behind him. He spent seven pence at the ‘Lettuce and Meat’ market for a pound of not-so-great mutton. Then, he also bought some tender broad beans, cabbage, onions, potatoes, and other items. Together with the bread that he bought earlier, he spent a total of 25 copper pennies, which converted to two soli and one pence.

“There is really not enough to go around for spending. Poor Benson…” Not only had Zhou Mingrui spent the two notes that he had brought with him, but it was also necessary for him top it up with the one penny he had in his pocket.

He just sighed and did not think further about it as he hurried back home.

With the staple food, he could now carry out the luck enhancement ritual!

…

After the second-floor tenants gradually left, Zhou Mingrui was still in no hurry to carry out the ritual. Instead, he translated the “Blessings Stem From The Immortal Lord of Heaven and Earth” and related phrases into the ancient Feysac language, as well as the Loen language. He was intending to try the ritual again the next day in those local languages if the original incantation did not take effect!

After all, he had to take into consideration the differences between the two worlds. In Rome, do as the Romans do!

As for translating it into an ancient ritual prayer that used the dedicated Hermes language, Zhou Mingrui had a difficult time completing it due to his lack of vocabulary.

After readying everything, he finally took out the four loaves of rye bread. He placed one in the corner where the coal stove was originally, one at the bottom inner side of the dress mirror, one at the top of the cupboard where two walls met, and one at the right side of the study table where miscellaneous items were kept.

With a deep breath, Zhou Mingrui came to the center of the room and spent a few minutes to calm himself. Then, he took a solemn step forward and went in a counter-clockwise direction in the shape of a square.

When he took the first step, he chanted in a low whisper, “Blessings Stem From The Immortal Lord of Heaven and Earth.”

The second step, he sincerely chanted, “Blessings Stem From The Sky Lord of Heaven and Earth.”

The third step, Zhou Mingrui breathed out a whisper. “Blessings Stem From The Exalted Thearch of Heaven and Earth.”

At the fourth step, he spat out a foul breath and meditated in concentration. “Blessings Stem From The Celestial Worthy of Heaven and Earth.”

When he returned back to the original spot, Zhou Mingrui closed his eyes and waited in his place for an outcome. He had some anticipation in him, some unease, some hope, and some fear.

Could he make it back?

Was there going to be any effect?

Could there be some unexpected situation?

The unknown in front of him was tainted with the crimson light of hope. Zhou Mingrui’s thoughts were swirling in his head and was finding it difficult to quell it.

It was at this time that he suddenly felt the surrounding air seem to stop, becoming thick and mysterious.

Immediately after, a low whisper could be heard beside his ears that sounded at times real, at times sharp, at times imaginary, at times alluring, at times maniacal, and at times crazy.

He clearly did not understand the murmuring that went on, but Zhou Mingrui still couldn’t help himself from wanting to listen to it and distinguish what it was saying.

His head was in pain again. It was so painful that it felt like someone had stuck a steel drill rod into it.

Zhou Mingrui only felt like his head was going to explode. His thoughts were filled with a psychedelic of colors.

He knew that something was wrong and tried to open his eyes. However, he wasn’t even able to complete such a simple action.

His entire body was getting tighter and tighter and it felt like he could just break apart at any time. At this time, a self-mocking thought came up in Zhou Mingrui’s mind:

“If you didn’t seek death, you wouldn’t die…”

He could no longer bear with it. Just as his mind was going to break, the murmuring of voices faded away and his surroundings became very quiet. The mood was an erratic one.

It was not only the mood; Zhou Mingrui felt his own body going through the same sensations as well.

He tried once more to open his eyes, an extremely easy task this time.

A gray fog appeared over his eyes—haziness, vague, and endless.

“What’s with this situation?” Zhou Mingrui suddenly looked around him and then lowered his head down to discover that he was floating at the edge of an endless fog.

The fog was flowing like water and was dotted with a lot of crimson ‘stars.’ Some of them were enormous while others were tiny. There was a sense of them being hidden in the deep depths, while others floated over the surface of this water-like fog.

Looking at the seemingly holographic sight, Zhou Mingrui reached out his right hand in a half-confused, half-exploring manner to try to touch the crimson ‘star’ that was seemingly floating on the surface. He was trying to find a way to leave this place.

When his hand touched the surface of that star, a water mark suddenly appeared from within his body and agitated the stars into a “crimson” burst. It looked like a dreamlike burning of flames.

Zhou Mingrui got a fright from it. He retracted his right hand in a panic, but accidentally touched yet another crimson star.

As a result, this star burst with splendid light as well.

In turn, Zhou Mingrui felt his mind empty and his spirit dissipated.

…

In the Loen Kingdom’s capital, Backlund. Inside a luxurious looking villa at the royal district.

Audrey Hall sat in front of a dresser. The markings on it were antiquated and there was a cracked bronze mirror on the surface.

“Mirror, mirror, awaken…

“In the name of the Hall family, I command you to awaken!”

…

She switched between many different sayings, but there was no reaction from the mirror at all.

After more than 10 minutes, she finally chose to give up and pouted her lips in grievance. She said in a soft murmur, “Father was indeed lying to me. He always tells me that this mirror was the treasure of the Roman Empire’s Dark Emperor, and that it is an extraordinary item…”

Her voice trailed off. The bronze mirror which rested on the dresser suddenly glowed with a crimson light that shrouded her completely.

…

In the Sonia Sea, a three-masted sailboat that looked like an obvious relic was navigating through a storm.

Alger Wilson stood on deck, his body undulating with the currents at sea, maintaining his balance easily.

He wore a robe embroidered with lightning patterns, and in his hand was a quirky-shaped glass bottle. Bubbles billowed inside the bottle at times, frost turned into snow at times, and signs of gusting wind could be seen at times.

“We’re still short on the Ghost Shark’s blood…” Alger murmured.

Then at this moment, a crimson burst appeared in the space between the glass bottle and the surface of his palm. In an instant, it enveloped the surroundings as well.

…

In the fog of gray mist, Audrey Hall regained her sight. She started reckoning the situation in a state of horror and confusion when she noticed the blurry image of a man on the opposite side of her doing the same as well.

Immediately after, the both of them discovered another mystery person standing not far from them who was shrouded in a gray mist.

The ‘mysterious person’ was none other than Zhou Mingrui. He was similarly dumbfounded.

“Sir, where is this?”

Audrey and Alger were startled at first, falling silent in the process. Then, they immediately started speaking in unison.

“What are you planning on doing?”

',
                        3
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        26,
                        'Chapter 6',
                        'Not only did they speak the same Loen language, they also shared the same grim and tense vibes.

Where am I? What do I plan to do here? I would like to know too… Calming himself down, Zhou Mingrui silently repeated the questions posed by the two.

What left the deepest impression on him were neither the sentences formed by words nor the meanings behind them, but the display of bewilderment, vigilance, panic, and reverence by the couple!

For some baffling reason, two people had been mysteriously dragged into this world surrounded by gray fog. As the perpetrator, Zhou Mingrui was already feeling abnormally dumbfounded and startled, let alone the couple who was pulled into this mess completely passively!

For them, such events and encounters might already be beyond their imaginations, right?

Momentarily, Zhou Mingrui thought of two options: The first option was feigning victimhood to hide his true identity, and in turn gain a considerable amount of trust. He could then take a wait-and-see approach and take advantage of his circumstances where necessary. The other option was to maintain his mysterious identity in the eyes of the couple. He could then affect the subsequent development while gleaning valuable information from them.

Without the luxury of time to deliberate over the situation, he grasped hold of the thought that flashed across his mind. He made an immediate decision to try out the second idea.

Exploit the psychological state of the others to gain the greatest advantage for himself!

After a few seconds of silence in the fog, Zhou Mingrui chuckled. With a low but not heavy tone, he calmly spoke as though he was replying to the polite greetings from the visitors, “An attempt.”

An attempt… an attempt? Audrey Hall looked at the mysterious guy veiled in the grayish-white fog, and the only thought was that whatever was happening was absurd, funny, horrifying, and weird.

She was at the dressing table inside her bedroom only moments ago. But just by turning around, she had “come” into this place that was filled with gray fog!

How inconceivable!

Audrey took a breath, revealing an impeccable, courteous smile. She asked in a somewhat perturbed way, “Sir, is the attempt over? Might you permit our return?”

Alger Wilson also had the intentions to probe Zhou Mingrui in a similar fashion, but his rich experience made him statelier. He held back his impulse and only took on the role of a silent onlooker.

Zhou Mingrui looked at the questioner. Looking through the hazy mist, he could roughly see the silhouette of the person in question. It was a tall girl with smooth blond hair, but her exact countenance could not be seen clearly.

He did not rush to reply the girl’s question but turned around to look at the man. He had messy dark-blue hair, as well as a medium stature that was not considered stout.

Zhou Mingrui suddenly realized something. Once he became stronger or had a deeper understanding of the foggy world, perhaps it was possible for him to see through the fog and discern the girl and the man.

In this situation, they are the visitors, and I’m the master!

After changing his mindset, Zhou Mingrui instantly noticed details that he had neglected earlier on.

The girl with a melodious voice and the mature, withdrawn man both looked considerably incorporeal. Tainted by a faint crimson red, they resembled a projected image of the two crimson red “stars” beyond the gray fog.

This projection was based on the connection between the crimson red and himself, an intangible connection that only he himself could realistically grasp hold of.

The projection would disappear once the connection was cut, and the couple would then return… Zhou Mingrui nodded mildly and looked at the blond, chuckling. “Of course, if you make a formal request, you can return this very moment.”

When she did not identify any ill intention from his tone, Audrey heaved a sigh of relief. She believed that since a gentleman who was capable of such miraculous things had given his word, he would definitely abide by it stringently.

With her mind somewhat mollified, she surprisingly was in no hurry to request her leave. She rolled her virid eyes left and right, which sparkled with an abnormal radiance.

She said in an anxious, anticipative and tempted manner, “This is such a wonderful experience… Yes, I have always been hoping that something like this would happen. I mean—I like mysteries and supernatural miracles. No, my point is—what I mean is that, Sir, what can I do to become a Beyonder?”

She got more excited as she spoke, so much so she was fumbling over her words. The dream that sprouted in her as a result of listening to thrilling fantasies as told by her elders finally saw the possibility of being materialized.

However, with just a few words, she had already forgotten all her previous fears and horrors.

Good question! I would also like to know the answer… Zhou Mingrui complained inwardly.

He started to ponder on an answer to the question to maintain his unfathomable image.

At the same time, he felt that it was quite unbecoming of him to talk while standing. Shouldn’t he be in a palace, sitting at the head of a long table, and on a mysterious high-back chair engraved with ancient patterns, while silently observing his visitors?

As soon as this thought surfaced, the gray fog started to churn, giving both Audrey and Alger a shock.

In an instant, they saw a number of towering stone pillars around them. Above them was a vast dome that encapsulated them.

This entire edifice looked magnificent, grand and lofty, just like a legendary palace for giants.

Directly under the dome where the gray fog gathered, a long, bronze table appeared with ten high-back chairs on either side in a symmetrical arrangement. The back of each chair dazzled and shone faintly with crimson red, drawing the outlines of weird constellations that differed from reality.

Audrey and Alger sat face-to-face, sitting next to the Seat of Honor.

The girl looked to her sides, and could not help but mumble, “How fascinating…”

It is certainly fascinating… Zhou Mingrui extended his right hand and caressed the edge of the bronze table a little while maintaining an unperturbed expression.

Alger inspected the surroundings, and after a few seconds of silence, he suddenly opened his mouth, and answered Audrey’s question in place of Zhou Mingrui.

“Are you a Loen?

“If you want to become a Beyonder, join the Churches of either the Evernight Goddess, the Lord of Storms, or the God of Steam and Machinery.

“The majority of us will not meet a Beyonder our entire lives. This has caused churches, and even some clergies within some of the biggest churches, to suspect the same. While this is the case, I am certain to tell you that Beyonders still exist in courts, tribunals, and execution agencies. They are still fighting against the dangers that grow in the dark, only that their numbers are much fewer as compared to before and during the early days of the Iron Age.”

Zhou Mingrui listened attentively, but he tried his best to present himself as paying little attention to Alger’s words, much like how young kids listened to stories.

Relying on Klein’s fragmented general knowledge of history, Zhou Mingrui knew clearly that the “Iron Age” referred to the current epoch, which was the Fifth Epoch that began 1349 years ago.

Audrey silently listened to Alger finish his sentence before sighing.

“Mister, I know all about what you just said; I even know more than that, including the Nighthawks, the Mandated Punisher, and the Machinery Hivemind, but I don’t want to lose my freedom.”

Alger gave a low-sounding laugh, and said vaguely, “You can’t become a Beyonder without sacrifices. If you don’t consider joining churches and accepting their given challenges, you can only seek the royal families and the few nobles with family histories of more than a thousand years. If not, you can rely on your luck to search for clandestine evil organizations.”

Audrey puffed her cheeks subconsciously and looked around in a fluster. After confirming that both the “mysterious man” and Audrey did not notice her tic, she pressed, “Are there no other solutions?”

Alger sank into silence. About half a minute later, he turned around to look at the “mysterious man” who was watching the two of them in silence.

Realizing that Zhou Mingrui had no plans to make any comment, he looked back at Audrey and said with deliberation, “I have two sets of Sequence 9 Potion formulas.”

Sequence 9? Zhou Mingrui muttered to himself.

“Really? Which two sets?” Audrey clearly knew what the Sequence 9 Potion formulas meant.

Alger leaned back slightly, and replied unhurriedly, “As you know, humanity can only depend on potions to become real Beyonders, while the names of potions come from the ‘Blasphemy Slate.’ After constant translations intoJotun 1 , Elvish, ancient and modern Hermes, and ancient Feysac, they have undergone changes to match the day and age of that era. The essence is not in their names, but whether they portray the ‘core characteristics’ of the potions.

“I have a Sequence 9 Potion named ‘Sailor.’ It enables you to have excellent balancing capabilities. Even if you were on a boat in a rainstorm, you will be able to walk about freely as though you were on land. You will also gain immense strength and illusory scales under your skin. They will enable you to swim like a fish and be difficult to catch. You will move agilely underwater just like marine animals. Even without any equipment, you will be able to easily submerge underwater for at least ten minutes.”

“Sounds great… the ‘Keepers of the Seas’ from the Lord of Storms?”

“It was called by that name in the past.” Alger did not pause and continued. “The second set of Sequence 9 Potions is called ‘Spectator,’ although I am not sure what it was called in the past. This set of potions enables you to have an exceptionally sharp mind with acute observational abilities. I believe you can understand by what ‘spectator’ means from watching operas and plays. Just like an audience, spectators judge the ‘actors’ in the secular world, catching a glimpse of the real thoughts of them through their emotions, conduct, and mantras.”

At this point, Alger emphasized, “You must remember, regardless of whether you are at an extravagant banquet or a crowded street, spectators can only be spectators forever.”

Audrey’s eyes shone as she listened, and spoke after a long while, “Why? Alright, this is a follow-up question. I-I think I have fallen in love with this feeling—of being a ‘spectator.’ How can I get this potion’s formula? What can I use to trade with you for it?”

Alger looked like he was already prepared as he said in a deep voice, “The blood of Ghost Sharks, at least 100 milliliters of it.”

Audrey nodded her head excitedly, but subsequently asked worriedly, “If I can get it—and I’m saying if—how do I hand it to you? How can you promise me that you can give the potion’s formula to me in return for the Ghost Shark’s blood, as well as the authenticity of the formula?”

Alger said calmly, “I’ll give you an address. I’ll mail the formula to you, or tell you directly here, once I receive the blood of the Ghost Shark.”

“As for promises, I think that both you and I can feel rest assured under the witness of the mysterious sir.”

As he said this, he swept his eyes towards Zhou Mingrui who was sitting up straight at the Seat of Honor.

“Sir, the fact that you brought us here shows that you have tremendous strength unimaginable to us. Neither one of us would dare violate a promise with you as witness.”

“That’s right!” Audrey’s eyes sparkled and agreed with excitement.

From her perspective, the mysterious gentleman who had unimaginable abilities was definitely an “authoritative” witness.

How could I or the guy opposite me dare trick him!

Audrey half-turned her body and looked at Zhou Mingrui earnestly.

“Sir, please be the witness of our trade.”

At that moment, she then realized that she was all too impolite, having forgotten all along to ask a particular question. She asked hurriedly, “Sir, how should we address you?”

Alger nodded slightly, and echoed the same question in a serious manner, “Sir, how should we address you?”

Zhou Mingrui was taken aback. He gently rapped his fingers on the bronze table. The contents of the earlier divination flashed across his mind suddenly.

He leaned back, withdrew his right hand, and crossed his ten fingers, placing them below his chin. He gave the duo a faint smile.

“You can address me as…”

Upon saying this, he paused for a moment. He said amiably and calmly, “The Fool.”',
                        3
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        27,
                        'Chapter 7',
                        '“You can address me as The Fool.”

The simple answer soon emanated through the grand hall and dissipated into the fog. However, the voice kept resonating in Audrey’s and Alger’s hearts, stirring up one ripple after another.

They never expected such a designation, but they felt that he was deserving of it. The designation perfectly embodied his image as someone mysterious, powerful, and bizarre!

After a few seconds of silence, Audrey stood up, held up her skirt slightly and bent her knees, curtseying to Zhou Mingrui.

“Honorable Mr. Fool, would you please permit me to take the liberty of requesting you to be the witness of our trade?”

“It’s nothing.” Zhou Mingrui’s mind whirred as he answered in a way that matched his status.

“It’s our honor, Mr. Fool.” Alger stood up as well. He bent his back slightly with his right palm over his chest.

Zhou Mingrui lowered his right palm and smiled.

“Continue, the both of you.”

Alger nodded and sat back down before looking at Audrey.

“If you can obtain the Ghost Shark’s blood, get someone to send it to the Warrior & Sea Bar at Pelican Street, in the White Rose Borough of Pritz Harbor. Tell the boss, Williams, that it’s what the ‘Captain’ wants.

“Once I acknowledge receipt, will you be giving me an address to mail the potion formula to or do you want me to tell it to you here directly?”

Audrey thought for a moment before saying with a smile, “I will choose the more secure method. Let’s do it here, although it’s a test of my memory.”

Since Mr. Fool had agreed to bear witness for the trade, it also represented that there would be a similar ‘Gathering’ the next time.

With this in mind, she suddenly turned her head as she looked at Zhou Mingrui with sparkling eyes. With a tone of interest, she suggested, “Mr. Fool, would you mind making a few more ‘attempts’ like this?”

Alger listened to her suggestion calmly; he was tempted by the suggestion as well. He hurriedly echoed, “Mr. Fool, don’t you find such ‘Gatherings’ interesting? Although your powers exceed our imaginations, there has to be certain domains that you don’t understand or excel in. The person across me is obviously a young lady of lofty stature. I also have my unique set of experiences, insights, mediums, and resources. Perhaps there will come a day when both of us can help you complete something trivial that might be inconvenient for you.”

From his point of view, the fact that he had been pulled into this space without any warning or any means to resist meant that the mysterious Mr. Fool was in control. Participating in the ‘Gatherings’ was not necessarily something he could refuse. Therefore, it was better to reap the benefits of this encounter as much as he could to make up for his passive and disadvantaged state.

The trio at the long table had different backgrounds, resources, information channels, and comprehension of the mystical domain. If they interacted and enjoyed some limited cooperation, they could produce unpredictable and immeasurable effects!

The resource trade that had just been negotiated was one example. Another example would be if he wished to kill someone. He could easily request the Gathering’s members who did not appear to be related to him both on the surface and in reality for help. He could perfectly misdirect any investigators.

A young lady of lofty stature… Was my behavior and accent that obvious? Audrey stared blankly, mouth slightly agape, but she soon jolted back to her senses and nodded her head without any hesitation.

“Mr. Fool, I think it’s a very good suggestion. As long as this Gathering becomes regular, you can totally leave certain things that are inconvenient for you to us. Of course, it has to be something within our capacities.”

From the moment he heard the suggestion, Zhou Mingrui was already weighing the pros and cons. More gatherings definitely allowed him to gain more knowledge of the secrets of the Beyonders or other mysteries, a boon for his transmigration back. For example, it was likely that the potion formula would appear at the next gathering because of the ‘spectators.’ Similarly, the information he gained was bound to be helpful for his present life.

However, more gatherings meant it was easier to expose himself!

Indeed, regardless of the world, there is no such thing as a free lunch… Zhou Mingrui extended his right hand again as he rapped the side of the long table with his finger gently.

Considering the fact that he was in control of the gathering’s summoning and dismissal, any threat of exposure was within the confines of his control. The pros clearly exceeded the cons, so Zhou Mingrui rapidly made a decision.

He stopped his rapping as he smiled at the anticipative and perturbed gazes of the duo.

“I’m a person who likes a fair and equal exchange.

“Your help will not go unrewarded.

“Every Monday at three in the afternoon, try your best to be alone. After I make a few more attempts and figure out certain things, perhaps you can apply for a leave of absence ahead of time. You will no longer need to worry about being in inappropriate situations.”

This was a form of agreement to Alger’s and Audrey’s suggestions.

Audrey had just turned seventeen. Having been taken care of her entire life, she had the character of a young girl. Therefore, she could not help but clench her fist and gradually pump it in front of her chest when she heard The Fool’s reply.

Without waiting for Alger to say a word, Audrey said in excitement, her eyes glowing, “Then, shall we give ourselves call signs? After all, we can’t use our real names for conversation.”

Although I might not be able to deceive Mr. Fool regarding my true identity, the person opposite me poses some danger. I must not let him know who I am!

“Good idea,” answered Zhou Mingrui in a simple and relaxed manner.

Audrey’s mind immediately began whirring as she aired her thoughts as they came to her.

“You are Mr. Fool which is derived from tarot cards. Then, as a fixed, long-term, and secretive ‘Gathering,’ we should be uniform in our designations. Yes, I’ll also choose one from the tarot cards.”

Her tone slowly turned joyous.

“I’ve decided. My designation shall be ‘Justice!’”

It was one of the twenty-two Major Arcana tarot cards.

“What about you, Mister?” Audrey cheekily smiled at her ‘partner’ sitting across her.

Alger frowned slightly before relaxing it immediately.

“The Hanged Man.”

It was another Major Arcana card.

“Alright, then we can be considered as the founding members of the Tarot Club!” Audrey was the first to blurt it out happily, only to look fearfully at the fog-concealed Zhou Mingrui. “Will that be alright, Mr. Fool?”

Zhou Mingrui shook his head in amusement.

“You can decide on such trivial matters by yourselves.”

“Thank you!” Audrey was clearly thrilled.

Following that, she looked at Alger.

“Mr. Hanged Man, can you repeat the address again once more? I’m afraid that my memories will fail me.”

“No problem.” Alger was very pleased with Audrey’s seriousness as he repeated the address once more.

After repeating it to herself silently thrice, Audrey said again in excitement, “I heard that tarot cards were invented by Emperor Roselle as a game. In fact, doesn’t it come equipped with the power to divine the future?”

“No. Most of the time, divination stems from one’s self. Everyone has something spiritual about themselves, allowing them to attune to the spiritual world and connect to information about themselves at an even higher level. However, ordinary folks are unable to notice this, much less be able to interpret the ‘signs’ they receive. This information will present itself with the help of divination tools. Let me raise a simple example, dreams and dream interpreters.” Alger took a glance at Zhou Mingrui and seeing no response from him, he refuted Audrey’s claim. “Tarot cards are, in fact, such a tool. It uses more symbolism and more logical elements to help us in conveniently and accurately interpreting the signs.”

Although Zhou Mingrui appeared indifferent, he was actually listening very carefully. It was only at this point that his empty mind slowly became heavy as his head began to feel a throbbing pain.

“Got it.” Audrey nodded in agreement. Following that, she emphasized, “That’s not what I meant. I’m not doubting the tarot cards, but I heard that Emperor Roselle had actually created another set of cards, secret and mysterious ones. They were paper cards which symbolized a particular unknown power. There was a total of twenty-two cards that he completed. Later on in life, he referenced them to create the twenty-two Major Arcana tarot cards which are used as a gaming tool. Was what I said correct?”

She looked at Zhou Mingrui as though she was attempting to get an answer from the mysterious Mr. Fool.

All Zhou Mingrui did was smile without saying a word. He cast his gaze at The Hanged Man as though he was putting him to the test.

Alger subconsciously straightened his back and said in a deep voice, “That’s right. It is said that Emperor Roselle had seen the Blasphemy Slate and that set of paper cards contain the profound mysteries of the twenty-two paths of the divine.”

“Twenty-two paths of the divine…” repeated Audrey with a longing tone.

At that moment, Zhou Mingrui’s headache intensified. He felt that his invisible connection with the crimson stars and grayish-white fog was beginning to falter.

“Alright, that will be all for today’s gathering,” he said in a deep voice after making the decision immediately.

“By your will.” Alger bowed his head respectfully.

“By your will.” Audrey mimicked The Hanged Man.

She still had many questions and thoughts; thus, she was unwilling to have it end so soon.

As Zhou Mingrui severed the connection, he said with a smile, “Let us look forward to the next gathering.”

The ‘stars’ brightened once more as the crimson light receded like water. Just as Audrey and Alger heard Mr. Fool’s words, their figures turned into a blur as they phased away.

In a second, the ‘projection’ shattered as the gray fog restored its silence.

As for Zhou Mingrui, he felt himself turning heavy rapidly. His surroundings turned fleeting as his eyes met darkness before changing into dazzling sunlight.

He was still standing in the middle of his apartment.

“It was like a dream… What the heck was that foggy world… Who or what sort of power created the changes that just happened…” Zhou Mingrui sighed softly. He was completely puzzled as he walked towards the study desk as though his legs were filled with lead.

He picked up the pocket watch he placed outside to determine how much time had passed.

“Time flowed at the same pace.” Zhou Mingrui made a rough judgment.

After putting down his pocket watch, he found himself unable to endure the splitting headache any further. He sat on the chair and lowered his head, using his left thumb and middle finger to massage his temples.

After a long while, he suddenly let out a sigh and said in Mandarin, “From the looks of it, I won’t be able to return any time soon…”

Only the clueless could be fearless. After witnessing such a fascinating event and learning the situation regarding Beyonders and the mysterious world, Zhou Mingrui no longer dared to rashly try the luck enhancement ritual using ancient Feysac or Loen language.

Who knew what other kinds of situation would happen. Perhaps, it would be more bizarre, horrifying, or even a living hell!

“At the very least, I should attempt only when I have a deep mastery of mysticism,” thought Zhou Mingrui helplessly.

Thankfully, the so-called Gathering could provide him with help.

After another bout of silence, he muttered to himself with a tone of dismay, disappointment, agony, and grief, “From this moment forth, I’m Klein.”

…

Klein tried his best to refocus his solutions and plans so as to purge the negative emotions in him.

Perhaps, he could learn the potion formula for ‘Spectator’ from the side…

The ‘Gathering’ that just happened sure is fascinating. People who reside in different places across the world can reduce hundreds of kilometers to just mere inches and discuss face-to-face while supplying each other’s needs. Uh, speaking of which, this does sound a little familiar…

Klein was stunned for a few seconds before he burst out in laughter. Pressing against his temple, he jested under his breath, “Wasn’t that a social networking platform?”',
                        3
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        28,
                        'Chapter 8',
                        'Whoosh!

Howling wind accompanied a downpour. The three-mast sailboat was tossed around by the crests and troughs of the incoming waves, as if it was being toyed by a giant.

The crimson glow in Alger Wilson’s eyes faded. He found himself still remaining on the deck and nothing appeared to have changed.

Almost immediately, the quirky-shaped glass bottle in his palm shattered and the frost within melted into the rain. In seconds, there were no longer any traces left that suggested the existence of the wondrous antique.

A hexagonal crystal-like snowflake emerged on Alger’s palm. It then faded rapidly until it was seemingly absorbed by the flesh, vanishing completely in the process. Alger nodded his head in a hardly noticeable manner, as if he was thinking about something. He remained still and silent for a full five minutes.

He turned around and headed for the cabin. As he was about to enter, a man who wore a similar robe embroidered with lightning patterns emerged from inside.

This man, who had soft blond hair, paused and looked at Alger. He held his right fist to his chest and said, “May the Storm be with you.”

Alger replied with the same words and gesture. There were no emotions on his rough face which had a well-defined structure.

Alger entered the cabin after the greeting and proceeded to the captain’s cabin situated at the far end of the corridor.

Surprisingly, he did not encounter any sailors on the way. The whole place was as quiet as a graveyard.

Behind the door to the captain’s cabin, a soft brown carpet overlaid the floor. A bookshelf and a wine rack took the opposite side walls of the room. The books with their yellowish covers and wine bottles with their dark red color looked peculiar under the flickering candlelight.

On the desk with the candle, there was a bottle of ink, a quill, a pair of black metallic telescope, and a sextant made of brass.

Behind the desk sat a pale middle-aged man wearing a captain’s hat which had a skull on it. As Alger approached him, he said menacingly, “I will not give in!”

“I believe you can do it,” Alger said calmly, so calm that it felt like he was commenting on the weather.

“You…” The man seemed to be stunned by the unexpected answer.

At this very moment, Alger leaned forward slightly and suddenly dashed across the room until they were only separated by the desk.

Pa!

Alger tightened his shoulder and reached out his right hand to choke the man.

Illusory fish scales appeared on the back of his hand as he crazily mustered more strength to choke the man, giving him no time to respond.

Crack!

Amid the crisp cracking sound, the man’s eyes widened as his body was lifted up.

His legs twitched furiously before they soon became motionless. His pupils began to widen as he stared aimlessly. There was a stench from between his legs as his pants gradually turned moist.

While lifting the man, Alger lowered his back and strode toward the wall.

Bang! He used the man as a shield and smashed forward at the wall. His extremely muscular arm was monstrous.

A hole cracked open in the wooden wall, and rain poured in, accompanied by the scent of the ocean.

Alger flung the man out of the cabin, straight into the giant waves that resembled mountains.

The wind continued to howl in the dark as almighty nature devoured everything.

Alger took out a white handkerchief and wiped his right hand carefully before throwing it into the sea as well.

He stepped back and waited patiently for company.

In less than ten seconds, the blond man from before rushed in and asked, “What happened?”

“The ‘captain’ has escaped,” Alger answered in an annoyed manner as he panted. “I didn’t know he still had some of his Beyonder powers.”

“Damn it!” the blond man cursed softly.

He went up to the opening and stared into the distance. However, nothing was visible except for the waves and the rain.

“Forget it, he was just extra loot,” the blond man said, waving his arm, “We will still be rewarded for finding this ghost ship from the Tudor Era.”

Even if he was a Keeper of the Sea, he would not have hastily dived into the sea under this weather condition.

“The ‘captain’ will not be able to survive much longer if the storm continues.” Alger said, as he nodded in approval. The wooden wall was repairing itself at a discernible rate.

He gazed at the wall and turned his head subconsciously towards the rudder and the sail.

He was perfectly aware of what was going on behind all the wooden planks.

The chief mate, the second mate, the crew, and the sailors were not present. There was no living person on board!

Amidst all the emptiness, the rudder and the sail moved eerily by themselves.

Alger again pictured “The Fool” who was covered in grayish-white fog and sighed.

He turned back and looked outside at the mighty waves and spoke as though in a reverie while filled with anticipation and awe, “A new era has begun…”

…

Empress Borough, Backlund, capital of the Loen Kingdom.

Audrey Hall pinched her cheeks in disbelief of her encounter a while ago.

On the dressing table in front of her, the old bronze mirror had shattered into pieces.

Audrey cast her gaze downwards and saw the swirling “crimson” on the back of her hand; it was like a tattoo depicting a star.

The “crimson” gradually faded and disappeared into her skin.

Only at this point in time was Audrey certain that it was not a dream.

Her eyes twinkled as she grinned. She could not help but stand up before bending down to lift up the hem of her dress.

She curtseyed towards thin air and started dancing lively. It was the “Ancient Elf Dance, “the most popular dance among royalty at the moment.

She had a bright smile on her face as she moved about gracefully.

Knock! Knock! Someone suddenly knocked at her bedroom door.

“Who is it?” Audrey immediately stopped her dance and asked as she tidied her dress to look more elegant.

“My Lady, may I come in? You should start to prepare for the ceremony,” Audrey’s maidservant asked from outside the door.

Audrey looked into a mirror on the dressing table and quickly wiped the smile from her face, leaving only a tiny hint of a smile.

She responded gently after she had ensured everything was presentable, “Come in.”

The doorknob turned and Annie, her maidservant, pushed in.

“Oh, it cracked…” Annie said as she instantly saw the outcome of the old bronze mirror.

Audrey blinked and said slowly, “Erm, Yes! Susie was here just now. I am sure you know she likes to wreak havoc!”

Susie was a golden retriever that was not so much of a purebred. It was a gift given to her father, Count Hall, when he bought a foxhound. Nevertheless, Audrey adored it.

“You should train it well,” Annie said, as she picked up the pieces of the bronze mirror adeptly and with care, lest it hurt her mistress.

As she finished tidying up, she asked Audrey with a smile, “Which dress do you want to put on?”

Audrey thought for a while and answered,” I like the dress designed by Mrs. Guinea for my 17th birthday.”

“No, you can’t wear the same dress twice to a formal ceremony or others will gossip about and question the Hall family’s financial ability,” Annie said, shaking her head in disagreement.

“But I really like it!” Audrey insisted in a gentle manner.

“You can wear it at home or when you attend an event that isn’t so formal,” Annie said firmly, suggesting that it was not negotiable.

“Then it will have to be the one with the lotus design along the sleeves given by Mr. Sades two days ago,” Audrey said as she drew in a gasp inconspicuously, maintaining her sweet smile.

“You always have such a good taste,” Annie said as she stepped back and shouted towards the door, “The sixth dressing room! Ah, forget it, I shall fetch it myself.”

Maidservants began to work. The dress, accessories, footwear, hat, makeup, and hairstyle—everything had to be taken care of.

When it was almost ready, Count Hall appeared at the door wearing a dark brown waistcoat.

He had a hat sharing the same color as his clothes and a nice mustache. His blue eyes were filled with joy, but his loosening muscles, widening waist, and wrinkles were obviously destroying his handsome youth.

“The brightest jewel of Backlund, it is time for our departure,” Count Hall said, knocking at the door twice.

“Father! Stop calling me that,” Audrey protested as she got up with the help of the maidservants.

“Well then, it’s time to set off, my beautiful little princess,” Count Hall said as he bent his left arm, signaling Audrey to hold his arm.

Audrey shook her head slightly and said, “That is for my mother, Mrs. Hall, the Countess.”

“Then this side,” Count Hall bent his right arm with a smile and said, “This is for you, my greatest pride.”

…

The Royal Navy base, Pritz Harbor, Oak Island.

When Audrey took her father’s arm and walked down the carriage, she was suddenly shocked by the juggernaut in front of her.

In the military port not far away, there was a huge ship shimmering with metallic reflections. It did not have a sail, leaving only an observatory deck, two towering chimneys, and two turrets at the ends of the ship.

It was so majestic and large that the fleet of sails nearby were like newborn dwarfs clustering around a giant.

“Holy Lord of Storms…”

“Oh, m’lord.”

“An ironclad warship!”

…

Amidst the furore, Audrey was also shocked by this unprecedented miracle created by mankind. It was an ocean miracle that had never been seen before!

It took a while for the aristocrats, ministers, and members of parliament to compose themselves. Then, a black spot on the sky started to grow in size until it occupied a third of the sky and entered everyone’s view. The atmosphere suddenly became solemn.

It was a gigantic flying machine with a beautiful streamlined design hovering in mid-air. The deep blue machine had airbags made of cotton which were supported by alloy structures that were strong but light. The alloy structure’s bottom had openings mounted with machine guns, projectile launchers, and muzzles. The exaggerated humming noise from the ignition steam engine and the tail blades produced a symphony that left everyone amazed.

The King’s family arrived on their airship, exuding a lofty and indisputable authority.

Two swords, each with a ruby crown at the handle, were pointing vertically down and reflected the sunlight on both sides of the cabin. They were the “Sword of Judgment” emblem which symbolized the Augustus family and has been passed down from the previous epoch.

Audrey was not yet eighteen, so she had not attended the “introductory ceremony,” which was an event led by the Empress that marked one’s debut into the Backlund social scene, to announce her adult status. Therefore, she could not be nearer to the airship and had to remain silent at the back to watch the entire event.

Nevertheless, it did not matter to her. In fact, she was relieved that she did not need to deal with the princes.

The ‘miracle’ that mankind used to conquer the sky touched down gently. The first ones to step down the stairs were the handsome young guards who wore red ceremonial uniforms with white trousers. Decorated with medals, they formed two lines with rifles in hand. They were awaiting the appearances of King George III, his queen, and the prince and princess.

Audrey was not new to meeting important people so she showed no interest at all. Instead, she had her attention on the two statue-like black-armored cavalry flanking the king.

In this era of iron, steam, and cannons, it was surprising that there was still someone who could bear wearing full armor.

The cold metallic luster and the dull black helmet conveyed solemnity and authority.

“Could they be the higher-order Disciplinary Paladins…” Audrey recalled snippets of a casual conversation among adults. She was curious but did not dare go close.

The ceremony commenced with the arrival of the king’s family. The incumbent Prime Minister, Lord Aguesid Negan, went up to the front.

He was a member of the Conservative Party and the second non-aristocrat to become the Prime Minister till this very day. He was given the title of a Lord for his great contributions.

Of course, Audrey knew more. The main supporter of the Conservative Party was the present Duke of Negan, Pallas Negan, who was the brother of Aguesid!

Aguesid was a slender and almost bald fifty plus year old man with a sharp gaze. He surveyed the area before speaking.

“Ladies and Gentlemen, I believe you have witnessed this history-making ironclad warship. It has dimensions of 101 by 21 meters. It has an amazing port and starboard design. The armor belt is 457 millimeters thick. The displacement is 10060 tonnes. There are four 305-millimeter main cannons, six rapid-fire cannons, 12 six-pound cannons, 18 six-barrel machine guns, and four torpedo launchers. It can reach a speed of 16 knots!

“It will be the real hegemon! It will conquer the seas!”

The crowd was roused. The mere descriptions were enough to instill fearful images in them, let alone the fact that the actual thing was right in front of them.

Aguesid smiled and spoke a few more lines before saluting the king and requested, “Your Majesty, please give it a name!”

“Since it will set sail from Pritz Harbor, it should be named “The Pritz,” George III responded. His expression showed his delight.

“The Pritz!”

“The Pritz!”

…

The words spread from the Navy Minister and the Admiral of the Royal Navy to all the soldiers and officers on the deck. They all exclaimed in unison, “The Pritz!”

George III ordered the Pritz to set sail for a trial in the midst of the gun salutes and the celebratory atmosphere.

Honk!

Thick smoke spewed out from the chimneys. The sound from the machinery could be heard faintly beneath the sound of the ship horn.

The juggernaut departed from the harbor. Everyone was shocked when the two main cannons at the ship’s bow fired at an uninhabited island in its path.

Boom! Boom! Boom!

The ground shook as dust shot up into the sky. Shock waves spread out, producing waves in the sea.

Satisfied, Aguesid turned back to the crowd and announced, “From this day on, doomsday will fall on the seven pirates who call themselves Admirals and the four who call themselves Kings. They can only shiver in fear!

“It is the end of their era. Only the ironclad warship will roam the seas no matter whether the pirates have the powers of the Beyonders, ghost ships, or cursed ships.”

Aguesid’s chief secretary deliberately asked, “Can’t they build their own ironclad warships?”

Some of the nobles and Members of Parliament nodded, feeling that such a possibility could not be eliminated.

Aguesid immediately smiled and shook his head slowly as he answered, “Impossible! It will never be possible! Building our ironclad warship required three big coal and steel amalgamators, a scale of more than twenty steel factories, 60 scientists and senior engineers from the Backlund Cannon Academy and Pritz Nautical Academy, two royal shipyards, almost hundred factories for spare parts, an Admiralty, a ship-building committee, a Cabinet, a determined king with excellent foresight, and a great country with an annual steel production of 12 million tonnes!

“The pirates will never achieve it.”

Having said that, he paused and raised his arms before shouting in agitation, “Ladies and Gentlemen, the era of cannons and warships has dawned upon us!”',
                        3
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        29,
                        'Chapter 1',
                        '“Fang Yuan, quietly hand over the Spring Autumn Cicada and I’ll give you a quick death!”

“Old bastard Fang, stop attempting to resist anymore, today all of the major factions of justice have combined together just to destroy your devil lair. This place is already covered in inescapable nets, this time you will definitely be decapitated!”

“Fang Yuan you damn demon, just because you wanted to cultivate the Spring Autumn Cicada, you’ve gone and killed thousands of people. You’ve committed too many unforgivable, heinous sins!“

“Demon, 300 years ago you insulted me, took away my body’s purity, killed my entire family and executed my nine generations. From that moment onwards, I hated you with a burning passion! Today, I want you to die!”

……

Fang Yuan was in deep green robes that had been torn to shreds. His hair was disheveled and his entire body was covered in blood. He looked around.

The bloody robes waved lightly in the mountain breeze like a war flag.

Fresh blood flowed from the numerous wounds on the body. Just by standing there for a short while, Fang Yuan had already accumulated a large pool of blood beneath his feet.

Enemies surrounded him all around; there was already no way out.

It was a forgone conclusion that he would die here.

Fang Yuan understood his situation clearly, but even in the face of death his expression did not change, it was calm.

His gaze was quiet, his eyes like deep pools of water in a well, so deep that there seemed to be no end.

The major factions of justice that had surrounded him were not just the experienced elders, but also young and talented heroes. Around the heavily surrounded Fang Yuan, some were roaring, some were sneering; there were eyes that were gleaming with light, some holding onto their wounds while looking on fearfully.

They did not move; everyone was wary of Fang Yuan’s final attack.

For 6 hours this tense moment went on until the evening came, the sun casting its rays upon the side of the mountain. In that moment, it was as if the place was on fire.

Fang Yuan, who had been silent as a sculpture the entire time, slowly turned his body.

The group of warriors was suddenly alerted and they all took a big step backwards.

By now the gray mountain rock beneath Fang Yuan’s feet had long been stained a deep red. Due to losing too much blood, his face had become deathly pale; in the afterglow of the sunset, it suddenly had a brilliant luster upon it.

Looking at the setting sun, Fang Yuan lightly laughed. “The sun sets above the blue mountain, the autumn moon with the wind of spring. The morning is fine like hair and night is like snow, whether you succeed or fail when you look back there’s nothing left.”

As he said this, memories of his previous life on Earth emerged before his eyes.

He was originally a Chinese scholar on Earth who chanced upon this world. He endured a hard life for 300 years and went through another 200 years; about over 500 years of his life flew by in the blink of an eye.

So many memories that were buried deep inside the heart begun to relive themselves, sprouting into life before his eyes.

“I failed in the end.” Fang Yuan sighed in his heart emotionally, yet there were no regrets.

This end result was something he had foreseen. When he made his decision in the beginning, he had prepared himself for this.

To be a demon is to be merciless and cruel, a murderer and destroyer. There is no place in heaven or earth for such a thing – turning into an enemy to the world, still having to face the consequences.

“If the Spring Autumn Cicada that I have just cultivated is effective, I shall still be a demon in my next life!” With this thought, Fang Yuan couldn’t help but let out a big laugh.

“Wicked demon, what are you laughing about?”

“Be careful everyone, the demon is going to attack before his final moments!”

“Hurry up and surrender the Spring Autumn Cicada!!”

The group of warlords surged forward; at this moment, with a loud bang, Fang Yuan was engulfed in a blinding surge of energy.

……

The spring rain quietly rained down on Qing Mao Mountain.
It was already late in the night, a slight breeze blowing with the light rain.

Yet Qing Mao Mountain was not covered in darkness; from the side down to the foot of the mountain, dozens of tiny lights shone like a bright band.

These lights shone from tall buildings, even though it could not be said to match up to ten thousand lights, yet it was still a few thousand in number.

Situated on the mountain was Gu Yue(1) Village, giving the vast lonely mountain a rich touch of human civilization.

In the middle of the Gu Yue Village was a magnificent pavilion. A grand ceremony was being held at this moment, and the lights were even brighter than ever, radiating with glory.

“Ancestors, please bless us! We pray that this ceremony will bring many young men of outstanding talent and intelligence, bringing their families new blood and hopes!” The head of the Gu Yue clan had a middle-aged appearance, his sideburns were graying and he was clothed in ceremonial white robes, kneeling on the brownish yellow floor. His body was straight with his hands held together, eyes tightly shut as he prayed sincerely.

He was facing a tall black case; there were three layers on the case, all housing memorial tablets of ancestors. On both sides of the tablets was copper incense, the smoke rising.

Behind him were over 10 people kneeling in a similar fashion as him. They wore loose white ceremonial garments, and were all the clan’s elders, important members, and those who had much authority.

After finishing prayers, the Gu Yue clan head bent his waist with his two hands pressing against the floor and kowtowed. As the forehead knocked against the brownish yellow floor, light thuds could be heard.

Behind him, the elders and important clan members solemnly and quietly followed suit.

With this, the hall was filled with light thuds as the heads knocked against the floor.

When the ceremony was over, the crowd of people slowly got up from the ground and silently walked out of the sacred temple.

In the hallway, sighs of reliefs were heard from the crowd of elders and the atmosphere loosened up. The noise of discussion slowly rose.

“Time flies too quickly, in the blink of an eye, a year has gone by.”

“The previous ceremony feels like it just happened yesterday, I can still recall it vividly.”

“Tomorrow is the opening of the annual grand ceremony, I wonder what new clan blood will show up this year?”

“Ah, I hope that some highly talented youths will appear. The Gu Yue clan hasn’t seen a genius emerge for three years now.”

“Agreed. The Bai Village, Xiong Village these few years all had some talented geniuses appear. Especially that Bai Ning Bing from the Bai clan, his natural talent is quite terrifying.”

It was unclear who had brought up the name Bai Ning Bing, but the faces of the elders started to show worry.

The boy’s qualifications were splendid; in just a short period of two years worth of training, he had already reached the level of a level three Gu Master.
In the younger generation, he could be said as the most outstanding one. It was to the point that even the older generation could feel pressured from the promising youth.

In time, he would inevitably become the pillar of the Bai clan. At the very least he would also be an independently strong warrior. No one ever doubted this fact.

“But for this year’s youths that will be participating in the ceremony, not all hope is lost.”

“You’re right, Fang Zhi’s side has appeared a young genius. Able to start talking after three months, able to walk after four. At five years of age he was able to recite poetry, seems exceptionally intelligent, especially talented. What a pity that his parents died early, now he is being raised by his uncle and aunt.”

“Yes, this one has wisdom at a young age, also harboring big ambitions. In the recent years I have heard his creations ‘Jiang Jing Jiu’, ‘Yong Mei’ and ‘Jiang Cheng Zi’, what a genius!”

The Gu Yue clan head was the last to walk out of the ancestral temple. After slowly closing the door, he heard the discussions that were going on in the corridor among the clan elders.

He knew at once that the elders were discussing about the youth known as Gu Yue Fang Yuan at that moment.
As the head of the clan, it is natural to pay attention to the outstanding and prominent young ones. And it so happens that Gu Yue Fang Yuan was the most eye-catching one amongst the juniors.

Experience has shown that those who have photographic memory at a young age, or those who possess strength that could rival an adult, or had other great inborn talents, all had outstanding cultivation qualifications.

“If this child shows A grade potential, with great care he could even compete against Bai Ning Bing. Even if it is B grade, in future he could also become a banner of the Gu Yue Clan. But with this sort of early intelligence, the percentage of B grade is not that big, but highly possible to be an A grade.” With this thought, the Gu Yue clan head curled up his lips slowly into a smile.

At once, with a cough he faced the clan elders and said, “Everyone, the hour is late, for tomorrow’s opening ceremony you should all rest well tonight and take care of your energy levels.”

At his words, the elders looked startled. They looked at each other with a hint of caution in their eyes.

The clan head’s words meant well, but everyone knew what he was aiming to convey.

Every year to compete for these young geniuses, the elders would fight among themselves to the point of reddened ears and bleeding heads.

They should stay well rested and replenish themselves until tomorrow comes where the competition begins.

Especially with that Gu Yue Fang Yuan, whose A grade potential was extremely huge. Not counting the fact that both his parents were deceased, and also that he was one of the two only descendants of Fang Zhi’s bloodline left. If one was able to get their hands on and bring him into their own family line, with great care and training, one could secure himself a hundred years of prosperity!

“However, I’m going to go ahead and say what needs to be said first. When you compete, do it fair and square; no tricks and conspiracies are allowed, or damage to the clan’s unity. Please keep this in mind, all of you!” The clan head strictly instructed.

“We wouldn’t dare, we wouldn’t dare.”
“We’ll keep it in mind.”

“Then this is good night, please take care.”

The clan elders slowly dispersed with deep thoughts.

Not long after that, the long corridor became quiet. The wind from the spring rain breezed through the window, and the clan head lightly walked towards the window.

Immediately, he breathed in the fresh moist air of the mountain, how refreshing it felt.

This was the third floor of the garret; the clan head looked out of the window. He could see half of the entire Gu Yue Village.

Even if it was late in the night, most of the homes in the village still had lights on, which was unusual.

Tomorrow is the opening ceremony, and it affects everyone’s best interests. A kind of excited yet tense atmosphere had enveloped the hearts of the people of the clan, and thus naturally many people could not sleep well.

“This is the hopes for the clan’s future.” With the many lights dancing in his eyes, the clan head sighed.

At the very same moment, a pair of clear eyes quietly looked at the same lights sparkling in the night, full of complex feelings inside.

“Gu Yue Village, this is 500 years ago?! Looks like the Spring Autumn Cicada really worked…” Fang Yuan quietly gazed, standing by the window, letting the rain from the wind hit his body.

The use of the Spring Autumn Cicada is to reverse time. In the Ten Big Mystical Gu rankings, the Spring Autumn Cicada managed to be ranked seven, naturally it was no mere creature.

In short, it is the ability to be reborn.

“With the use of the Spring Autumn Cicada I have been reborn, going back to the time of 500 years ago!” Fang Yuan stretched out his hand, his sight fixated on his own young and soft, pale palms, then slowly clenched them, embracing the truth of this reality with all his might.

The sound of the drizzling rain hitting softly against the window sill filling his ears, he slowly closed his eyes, opening them after a long while. He sighed, “500 years of experience, it really feels like a dream.”

But he knew it clearly: This was definitely not a dream.',
                        5
                    );

INSERT INTO chapter (
                        id,
                        title,
                        content,
                        book_id
                    )
                    VALUES (
                        30,
                        'Chapter 2',
                        'It is said in legend that a river of time exists in this world. It supports the world’s time flow and circulation. And by using the Spring Autumn Cicada’s power, one can travel back upstream and return to the past.

There is much conflicting opinion on this mythical tale. Many do not believe in it, and some are skeptical to the truth.

Few people actually dare to believe it.

Because every time one uses the Spring Autumn Cicada one must pay with his life, letting his entire body and cultivation be the driving force to use its power.

Such a price is just too expensive, and the thing that people just cannot accept is the fact that after paying with your life, you don’t even know what the outcome is.

So even if someone has the Spring Autumn Cicada, they would not dare use it so indiscriminately. What if the rumors were fake, and it was just a scam?

If Fang Yuan were not cornered into such a state, he would also not use it so hurriedly. But now, Fang Yuan is thoroughly convinced. Because the reality of the truth has been laid before his eyes and there was no denying it. He has really been reborn!

“It’s just a pity… From the start I had wasted an absurd amount of effort, killing hundreds of thousands of people, making even the heavens furious and inciting people’s vengeance, went through suffering and multiple hardships to finally attain and refine this good Gu…” Fang Yuan thought with a sigh. Even though he had been reborn, the Spring Autumn Cicada did not come with him.

Humans are the greatest among thousands of creatures, Gu are the essence of heaven and earth.

Gu comes in thousands of shapes and sizes of strange and mysterious variety – there are too many to count. Some Gu after being used once or even twice or thrice will completely dissipate. And some Gu can be reused again and again as long as it is not used over its limits.

That said, it is probable that the Spring Autumn Cicada is one of those types that can only be used once before disappearing for good.

“But even if its gone, I can still refine another. I have done it in my previous life, why can’t I do it in this life?” After the thoughts of pity were put aside, Fang Yuan’s heart burst forth ambitious and determined feelings.

To be able to be reborn, this fact made the loss of the Spring Autumn Cicada entirely acceptable.

Not to mention he had something precious with him, so its not like he lost everything.

This precious treasure was his 500 years worth of memories and experience.

In his memories are a multitude of all kinds of treasures and precious items that no one has opened yet in this time. All the big events and incidents he can easily grasp by the veins of history. There are a countless number of figures: some are predecessors of hidden levels; some are geniuses, some people not even born yet. Also in these 500 years of life are memories of painstaking cultivation and rich combat experience.

With all these memories and experiences, he had undeniably grasped the overall situation and upcoming opportunities. With good planning and execution, he could empower the situation with great fierceness and elegance. It was not a problem now that he could take a step ahead of others, breaking the higher boundaries!

“So how do I go about this hmmm…” Fang Yuan was incredibly sensible. He collected himself together and faced the night rain outside the window, pondering. With this thought, things started to feel complicated. After thinking for a moment, his brows wrinkled deeper.

500 years of time was a rather long period. Don’t mention those long muddled memories that cannot be recalled, even remembering the hidden locations of treasures or special encounters of people were a lot, but the main issue was that the locations were separated among a long distance and had to be accessed or visited at certain periods of time.

“The most important thing is cultivation. The me right now has not even opened my Primeval Sea, hasn’t stepped on the path to be a Gu Master. I’m just a mortal! I have to hurry and cultivate, catching up to history and seize the opportunities with the best advantage.”

Not to forget, many of these hidden locations of treasures were useless without proper foundation. Instead it would just be walking into a wolf’s den, looking for death.

The problem in front of Fang Yuan right now was cultivation.

He had to increase the level of his foundation as fast as possible. If he were slow like his previous life, he would just be too late.

“To cultivate as fast as possible, I would have to borrow the resources from the clan. With the state I am right now, I have no power or ability to travel back and forth across the dangerous mountains. Even an ordinary mountain boar can take my life. If I can reach the cultivation of a Third level Gu Master, I’d have the means to protect myself and leave the mountain.”

Through the eyes of a 500 year old person who has cultivated in the Demonic Way, Qing Mao Mountain was just way too small, Gu Yue Village even feels like a cage.

But while the cage restricted freedom, the sturdy bars of the cage also brought about a certain kind of safety.

“Hmm, in this short period of time I’ll just stay in this cage. As long as I can reach Third level Gu Master, I can leave this poor mountain. Luckily tomorrow is the Awakening Ceremony, I’ll be able to start training as a Gu Master soon after.”

When he thought about the Awakening Ceremony, old memories that had long been buried away in his heart resurfaced themselves.

“Talent huh…” He sneered, his gaze focused out the window.

At this moment, the door to his room was lightly pushed open and a young teenager walked in.

“Big brother, why are you standing in the rain by the window side ?”

The youth was thin, slightly shorter than Fang Yuan. His face resembled Fang Yuan’s features greatly. As Fang Yuan turned his head to look at this young man, a complicated look flickered across his face.

“It’s you huh, my twin little brother.” He raised his eyebrows, his expression returning to that of cold indifference. Fang Zheng lowered his head and looked at his own toes; this is his signature stance.

“I saw that big brother’s window was not shut closed, so I thought I’d come in here and close it. Tomorrow is the Awakening Ceremony, it’s so late and you haven’t gone to bed yet big brother. If Uncle and Aunty knew, they would probably be worried.”

Fang Zheng was not surprised at Fang Yuan’s coldness. Ever since he was a small child, his older brother had always been like that. Sometimes he would wonder, maybe a genius is just like this, being rather different from ordinary people. Even though he had the same look as his older brother, he felt that he was ordinary like an ant.

They were born from the same womb at the same time, and yet why are the heavens so unfair? His older brother had been endowed with gleaming talent, while he himself was as ordinary as a stone.

Everyone around him would say, “This is Fang Yuan’s little brother-” when they mentioned him. His aunt and uncle would constantly tell him to learn from his older brother. Even when he looked into the mirror sometimes, he would feel disgusted as he saw his own face!

These thoughts had been ongoing for many years, accumulating day and night deeply into his heart. Like a giant stone pressing against his heart, these few years Fang Zheng’s head lowered more and more, and he also grew quieter.

“Worried…” At the thought of his aunt and uncle, Fang Yuan laughed silently. He could still remember clearly how the parents of this world had both lost their lives in one of the clan missions. When he was only 3 years old, he and his little brother became orphans.

In the name of upbringing, his aunt and uncle grabbed hold of the inheritance left behind by his parents while inflicting harsh treatment against his younger brother and himself.

He originally planned to just be a normal person, even planning to conceal his abilities and bide his time. However his life was difficult, making Fang Yuan have no choice but to choose to expose some of his talents.

The so-called talent is merely but a mature and intellect soul that carried a few of Earth’s popular ancient poems.

With this he managed to startle people and capture attention. Because of pressure from the outside world, the young Fang Yuan made a decision to keep a cold indifferent expression to protect himself, reducing the possibility of revealing any secrets. Over time the coldness would become a habit that he was accustomed to expressing.

Thus his aunt and uncle were no longer harsh on him and his younger brother. As the years passed and they got older, the future became more optimistic and better treatment increased. This was not lover, but a type of investment.

It’s hilarious how his little brother never saw this truth,; not only was he deceived by their aunt and uncle, he also started burying resentments inside. Although he looked like a good-natured and honest boy now, in Fang Yuan’s memories when his brother was found out to be an A grade talent the clan spent much effort in raising him with all they had. After that all the buried resentment and jealous and hate inside was released, and many a time Fang Zheng would target, suppress and make life difficult for his own older brother.

As for his own grade, it was only C grade talent.

Fate loved to play a joke.

A pair of twins – The older one only had C grade talent, but had been known as a genius for a dozen years. The younger one who was always overlooked was the one with A grade talent instead.

The results of the Awakening Ceremony had left the clan shocked. The treatment of the two brothers had suddenly reversed after that.

The younger brother was like a dragon rising up to the heavens; the older brother was like a phoenix that fell down to the earth.

After that came the many hardships and troubles from his own younger brother, the cold eyes of his aunt and uncle, the contempt of the clans people.

Did he hate it?

Fang Yuan in his previous life hated it. He hated his own lack of talent, he hated how heartless the clan was, hated how fate was so unfair. But now, with his 500 years of life experiences, using this to rethink this course his heart was actually calm, not a shred of hatred.

What was there to be gain from resentment?

Thinking about if from another point of view, he could understand his younger brother, aunt and uncle, even those enemies from 500 years later who attacked him.

The strong eat the weak, survival of the fittest; these have always been the rules of this world.  Everyone has self-ambitions, always struggling to grasp the opportunities. Among all the war and killing what is there not to be understood?

500 years of life experience have long allowed him to understand all of this, with the heart that wants to gain immortality.

If someone tries to prevent this pursuit of his, no matter who it is he will kill and live through it. The aspirations in his heart were too big, stepping onto this road was to be making the world your enemy, and it was destined to be alone, destined to kill.

This was the conclusion of 500 years of life.

“Revenge is not my intention, the Demonic path does not compromise.” With that he couldn’t help but laugh and gave his younger brother a faint glance. “You can leave.”

Fang Zheng’s heart shook as he felt like his brother’s eyes were sharp like an ice blade, seemingly penetrating the deepest parts of his heart.

Under such a gaze, he felt like he was naked in the snow, unable to hold any secrets.

“Then I’ll see you tomorrow, big brother.” Not daring to say anymore, Fang Zheng slowly closed the door and left.',
                        5
                    );


-- Table: chapter_comment
CREATE TABLE chapter_comment (
    id         INTEGER NOT NULL,
    user_id    INTEGER,
    chapter_id INTEGER,
    content    TEXT    NOT NULL,
    likes      INTEGER,
    dislikes   INTEGER,
    PRIMARY KEY (
        id
    ),
    FOREIGN KEY (
        user_id
    )
    REFERENCES user (id),
    FOREIGN KEY (
        chapter_id
    )
    REFERENCES chapter (id) 
);

INSERT INTO chapter_comment (
                                id,
                                user_id,
                                chapter_id,
                                content,
                                likes,
                                dislikes
                            )
                            VALUES (
                                1,
                                1,
                                8,
                                'I''m still a beginner in here
',
                                0,
                                0
                            );

INSERT INTO chapter_comment (
                                id,
                                user_id,
                                chapter_id,
                                content,
                                likes,
                                dislikes
                            )
                            VALUES (
                                2,
                                3,
                                8,
                                'batia first chapter palang
',
                                0,
                                0
                            );

INSERT INTO chapter_comment (
                                id,
                                user_id,
                                chapter_id,
                                content,
                                likes,
                                dislikes
                            )
                            VALUES (
                                3,
                                3,
                                9,
                                'samot kabati',
                                0,
                                0
                            );

INSERT INTO chapter_comment (
                                id,
                                user_id,
                                chapter_id,
                                content,
                                likes,
                                dislikes
                            )
                            VALUES (
                                4,
                                3,
                                10,
                                'drop this novel guys, it sucks
',
                                0,
                                0
                            );

INSERT INTO chapter_comment (
                                id,
                                user_id,
                                chapter_id,
                                content,
                                likes,
                                dislikes
                            )
                            VALUES (
                                5,
                                5,
                                8,
                                'eww so cringe
',
                                0,
                                0
                            );

INSERT INTO chapter_comment (
                                id,
                                user_id,
                                chapter_id,
                                content,
                                likes,
                                dislikes
                            )
                            VALUES (
                                6,
                                1,
                                21,
                                'PEAK PEAK PEAK ABSOLUTE CINEMA',
                                0,
                                0
                            );

INSERT INTO chapter_comment (
                                id,
                                user_id,
                                chapter_id,
                                content,
                                likes,
                                dislikes
                            )
                            VALUES (
                                7,
                                3,
                                21,
                                'THE LEGEND THE MYTH',
                                0,
                                0
                            );


-- Table: chapter_like
CREATE TABLE chapter_like (
    id         INTEGER      NOT NULL,
    user_id    INTEGER,
    chapter_id INTEGER,
    like_type  VARCHAR (10),
    PRIMARY KEY (
        id
    ),
    FOREIGN KEY (
        user_id
    )
    REFERENCES user (id),
    FOREIGN KEY (
        chapter_id
    )
    REFERENCES chapter (id) 
);

INSERT INTO chapter_like (
                             id,
                             user_id,
                             chapter_id,
                             like_type
                         )
                         VALUES (
                             1,
                             1,
                             8,
                             'like'
                         );

INSERT INTO chapter_like (
                             id,
                             user_id,
                             chapter_id,
                             like_type
                         )
                         VALUES (
                             2,
                             3,
                             8,
                             'dislike'
                         );

INSERT INTO chapter_like (
                             id,
                             user_id,
                             chapter_id,
                             like_type
                         )
                         VALUES (
                             3,
                             3,
                             9,
                             'dislike'
                         );

INSERT INTO chapter_like (
                             id,
                             user_id,
                             chapter_id,
                             like_type
                         )
                         VALUES (
                             4,
                             5,
                             8,
                             'dislike'
                         );

INSERT INTO chapter_like (
                             id,
                             user_id,
                             chapter_id,
                             like_type
                         )
                         VALUES (
                             5,
                             1,
                             21,
                             'like'
                         );

INSERT INTO chapter_like (
                             id,
                             user_id,
                             chapter_id,
                             like_type
                         )
                         VALUES (
                             6,
                             3,
                             21,
                             'like'
                         );


-- Table: comment
CREATE TABLE comment (
    id       INTEGER NOT NULL,
    user_id  INTEGER,
    book_id  INTEGER,
    content  TEXT    NOT NULL,
    likes    INTEGER,
    dislikes INTEGER,
    PRIMARY KEY (
        id
    ),
    FOREIGN KEY (
        user_id
    )
    REFERENCES user (id),
    FOREIGN KEY (
        book_id
    )
    REFERENCES book (id) 
);


-- Table: user
CREATE TABLE user (
    id       INTEGER       NOT NULL,
    username VARCHAR (80)  NOT NULL,
    email    VARCHAR (120) NOT NULL,
    password VARCHAR (200) NOT NULL,
    PRIMARY KEY (
        id
    ),
    UNIQUE (
        username
    ),
    UNIQUE (
        email
    )
);

INSERT INTO user (
                     id,
                     username,
                     email,
                     password
                 )
                 VALUES (
                     1,
                     'andre',
                     'andre@gmail.com',
                     'scrypt:32768:8:1$4axKdoZg7bm0tHzH$698d2c66788408ba37166995b8107cd53c3bc3a52d7093a6d07fe7c0cb706923bd21b9ba42d7c825aefacd8c593ed4d05371d68814dddd697ecb767b9771a1fa'
                 );

INSERT INTO user (
                     id,
                     username,
                     email,
                     password
                 )
                 VALUES (
                     2,
                     'lee',
                     'lee@gmail.com',
                     'scrypt:32768:8:1$qUUBImxDWHiS5OU4$f3f94f6950c086eb4b122bbab2a23237e886bc0b156754d5d8eb86973b68565dfbb674ae99c61dea181987954e55dec7b66b49556e13e06243ffe2f1ab453a8a'
                 );

INSERT INTO user (
                     id,
                     username,
                     email,
                     password
                 )
                 VALUES (
                     3,
                     'peter',
                     'peter@gmail.com',
                     'scrypt:32768:8:1$yKzRtAC2sGV3vLnv$b2971a4e9775d467933357e9e1be84f9896364a788294e6c2d13d2c755857494bea6a253111fb3cc6c9fbce08eba3117faf945e92f9146aa5a42a10c2af86e83'
                 );

INSERT INTO user (
                     id,
                     username,
                     email,
                     password
                 )
                 VALUES (
                     4,
                     'gab',
                     'gab@gmail.com',
                     'scrypt:32768:8:1$Csm5xL7PaIAo39Tx$74fe13340740699d3e79ffd2e329a37a6f6593f677dd26e5a2f503c4bedb73feb2faec3f02b3d0a5767fd03c714e05345a02537e475eb0c3157a15d87702405e'
                 );

INSERT INTO user (
                     id,
                     username,
                     email,
                     password
                 )
                 VALUES (
                     5,
                     'jade',
                     'jade@gmail.com',
                     'scrypt:32768:8:1$RWep8o9vkChRksVQ$3b0e149195899fcdeafacf9d66f167fc0e057a5fc8809efadd48ba038eed14086c538dd2b184bde768b0268f04e7a73b5e84002b4b2b98271fbced3528931856'
                 );

INSERT INTO user (
                     id,
                     username,
                     email,
                     password
                 )
                 VALUES (
                     6,
                     'ely',
                     'ely@gmail.com',
                     'scrypt:32768:8:1$ikPON4LG2i9DV6op$fcc6a948c7409aa9460506f10156a5b832094993f1c00120ef110b27c03d1b9ae40d1ffb88f9ee49e563179013b03978cd3d874200407cdb8b26b0c43976be35'
                 );

INSERT INTO user (
                     id,
                     username,
                     email,
                     password
                 )
                 VALUES (
                     7,
                     'cas',
                     'cas@gmail.com',
                     'scrypt:32768:8:1$zdFnBTLD55MB7NIQ$565825114e4d83c6d33b9561faabf1381e0202adbbe97451b8c3ce14cf1e869439d4675f3132688f0d5665a77cfff131ef25f528346d1be806a5827a090e392c'
                 );

INSERT INTO user (
                     id,
                     username,
                     email,
                     password
                 )
                 VALUES (
                     8,
                     'turtleme',
                     'turtleme@gmail.com',
                     'scrypt:32768:8:1$4ZAtoF5wUShTsFAb$ab88158dd28c3e58fb8f1bc9e71083967246c5dfe81a53647c21cb7c33c5b4262a44ba84ae1a1f0d4ca1600e6be3ce3e46252f8297c388eac010240041feb5c2'
                 );

INSERT INTO user (
                     id,
                     username,
                     email,
                     password
                 )
                 VALUES (
                     9,
                     'gu',
                     'gu@gmail.com',
                     'scrypt:32768:8:1$CuLExojeAXD3QbOV$74758765c89a0d9df1da75d3de1e0d6e192bee81f8985e250a11a422a1b72f4a12367a7f37b54e98dbb19dc5491152b453e2b8554cbed944d788ac985fe2b3a3'
                 );


COMMIT TRANSACTION;
PRAGMA foreign_keys = on;
